CHAPTER 4
The Union in Peril
1850-1877
JOHREROlBCT
As you read this textbook, you will encounter various historical eras. 7ou will use your knowledge of these eras, the unit's content, and the major characteristics of U.S. history to create a webpage that, identifies the eras in this unit and describes their defining characteristics. Use pages 192-197 to help you organize your thoughts.
Sigdng of the Constitution by Howard Chandler Christy
to 1877

iR




te $




■1

• ■ \
. r-
■yir-



*

and Skills (TEKS)
SECTION 1: The Americas, West Africa, and Europe
Main Idea On the eve of their interaction, Native American, West African, and European peoples lived in complex societies.
is founded.
b.c. corresponds to b.c.e., or “before the common era" a.d. corresponds to c.e., or “common era”
2 Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
SECTION 2: Spanish North America Main Idea Beginning with the voyage of Christopher Columbus, the Spanish built a vast colonial empire in the Americas.
SECTION 3: Early British Colonies Main Idea Beginning in the early 1600s, the English established colonies along the eastern shore of North America.
SECTION 4: The Colonies Come of Age Main Idea Even though both Northern and Southern colonies prospered, many colonists began to question British authority.
: [c. 20,000 Bdh]
: Asian peoples • migrate to America,
AMERICAS
WORLD
20,000 1000


HISTORY
Mexico's Ancient Civilizations
7\ lhmhsocialstudies.com
VIDEO

I NT ERAGT



You live in the 15th century. Your society hunts freely, grows crops of great variety, and trades with nearby cultures. Now you sense that your world is about to change; the ships you see approaching are like nothing you have encountered before.
As you read the chapter and explore the issues below, use the annotation tools in your eBook to record your thoughts.
Explore the Issues
• How would you react to a people whose appearance and language are unlike anything you have ever known?
•What can happen when one culture imposes its values on another?
: ’1492; Columbus : first reaches : North America.
: [1521] The : Spanish destroy the Aztec empire.
[1607) Jamestown is founded.
1620; “Pilgrims” ; : settle in Plymouth.
1400
1500
1600
1440; Johann Gutenberg develops his printing press.
1534 The Reformation begins in England with the Act of Supremacy.
jl681| William Penn founds Pennsylvania.
: 117541 French : and Indian : War begins.
3-588	:	1642 English Civil
England	>	War begins between	i
defeats	:	royalist forces and	|
Spanish	•	parliamentary forces
Armada.	:	led by Oliver Cromwell.
17631 With the Treaty of Paris, Britain acquires a vast North American empire.
Review Unit 3

The Americas,
West Africa, and Europe
MAIN IDEA J ( WHY IT MATTERS NOW J !
Terms & Names On the eve of their interaction, Native American, West African, and European peoples lived in complex societies.	The interaction of these cultures helped create the present-day culture of the United States.	•nomadic •Aztec •Anasazi • Pueblo •Iroquois •Benin	•Kongo •Islam •Christianity •Reformation •Renaissance
One American'sStory

TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on how trade and commerce affected particular societies.
Essie Parrish, a Native American spiritual leader and healer, kept alive stories from a time when her people, the Kashaya Porno, flourished along the northern California coast. One day in 1958, she invited Robert Oswalt, an anthropologist at the University of California, to time travel with her to the 1540s. As Parrish spoke, the centuries rolled back.
A
Personal Voice essie parrish “In the old days, before the white people came up here, there was a boat sailing on the ocean from the south. Because before that...
[the Kashaya Porno] had never seen a boat, they said, “Our world must be coming to an end. Couldn’t we do something? This big bird floating on the ocean is from somewhere, probably from up high....” [T]hey promised Our Father [a feast,] saying that destruction was upon them. When they had done so, they watched [the ship] sail way up north and disappear.... They were saying that nothing had happened to them —the big bird person had sailed northward without doing anything— because of the promise of a feast.... Consequently they held a feast and a big dance.99
—quoted in Kashaya Texts
Dressed for a ceremony in the 1950s, spiritual leader Essie Parrish wears a feathered headdress and holds two bead-covered staffs.
In this chapter, you will learn about three complex societies that met in North America in the late 1400s: the European, the West African, and the Native American. However, it is with the ancient peoples of the Americas that American history actually begins.
Ancient Cultures in the Americas
No one knows for sure when the first Americans arrived, but it may have been as long as 22,000 years ago. At that time, the glaciers of the last Ice Age had frozen
4	Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
What were the effects of agriculture on the hunting and gathering people of the Americas?
vast quantities of the earth's water, lowering sea levels and possibly creating a land bridge between Asia and Alaska across what is now the Bering Strait. Ancient hunters may have trekked across the frozen land, known as Beringia, into North America.
HUNTING AND GATHERING
Archaeologists believe that the earliest Americans lived as big-game hunters. That way of life changed around 12,000 to 10,000 years ago when temperatures warmed, glaciers melted, and sea levels rose once again. The land bridge disappeared under the Bering Sea, bringing to an end land travel between the Asian and North American continents. As the climate grew warmer, the large animals no longer thrived. People gradually switched to hunting smaller game and fish and gathering nuts and berries. AGRICULTURE DEVELOPS
While many ancient groups settled in North America, others continued south into what is now Mexico and South America. Between 10,000 and 5,000 years ago, an agricultural revolution quietly took place in what is now central Mexico. There, people began to plant crops. Eventually, agricultural techniques spread throughout the Americas. The introduction of agriculture made it possible for people to settle in one place and to store surplus food. From this agricultural base developed larger communities. However, some Native American cultures never adopted agriculture and remained nomadic, moving from place to place in search of food and water. Other tribes mixed nomadic and non-nomadic lifestyles.
MAYA, AZTEC, AND INCA SOCIETIES FLOURISH
The first empire of the Americas emerged as early as 1200 b.c. in what is now southern Mexico, where the Olmec people created a thriving civilization. In the wake of the Olmec's mysterious collapse, around 400 b.c., the Maya built a dynamic culture in Guatemala and the Yucatan Peninsula between a.d. 250 and 900. Later, the Aztec settled the Valley of Mexico in the 1200s and developed a sophisticated civilization. In South America, the most prominent empire builders were the Inca. Around a.d. 1400, the Inca created a glittering empire that stretched nearly 2,500 miles along the mountainous western coast of South America.
COMPLEX SOCIETIES ARISE IN NORTH AMERICA
In time, several North American groups, including the Hohokam and the Anasazi (a'ne-sa'ze), introduced crops into the arid deserts of the Southwest. Later, between 300 b.c. and a.d. 1400, each group had established its own culture. Hunters roaming over 10,000 years ago in what is now southern Arizona may have used this spear point to kill large prey.
Artist’s rendering of Tenochtitlan, the Aztec capital in the middle of Lake Texcoco.

Review Unit 5
«. I.
HISTORY
VIDEO
Secret Mounds of Pre-Historic
America
A
Northwest powwow, or multitribal gathering, in Cashmere, Washington state, 1989. Gatherings like these preserve a 500-year cultural tradition. ▼
To the east and west of the Mississippi River, another series of complex societies developed—the Adena, the Hopewell, and the Mississippian. These societies excelled at trade and at building massive earthen mounds as tombs and as platforms for temples and other buildings. Bj>
These early peoples were the ancestors of the many Native American groups that inhabited North America on the eve of its encounter with the European world.
Native American Societies of the 1400s
The varied regions of the North American continent provided for many different ways of life. The native groups that populated the continent's coasts, deserts, and forests 500 years ago were as diverse as their surroundings.
DIVERSE PEOPLES
The inhabitants of California adapted to the region's varied environments. The Kashaya Porno lived in marshlands along the central coast, hunting waterfowl with slingshots and nets. To the north of them, the Yurok and Hupa searched the forests for acorns and trapped fish in mountain streams. The waterways and forests of the Northwest Coast sustained large communities year-round. On a coastline that stretched from what is now southern Alaska to northern California, groups such as the Kwakiutl, Nootka, and Haida collected shellfish from the beaches and hunted the ocean for whales, sea otters, and seals.
In the dry Southwest, the Pueblo and Pima tribes, descendants of the Anasazi and Hohokam, lived in multistory houses made of stone or adobe, a sun-dried brick of clay and straw, and grew maize (corn), beans, melons, and squash.
Beneath the forest canopy of the Northeast, members of the Iroquois (Tr'e-kwof) nation hunted fish and game, such as wild turkeys, deer, and bear. In the Northeast, where winters could be long and harsh, Northeast peoples relied heavily on wild animals for clothing and food. In the warmer Southeast, groups lived mainly off the land, growing such crops as maize, squash, and beans.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
In what ways did early Native American societies leave their mark upon the landscape?
Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
0
|gjjg| Southeastern Southwest
O
Great Basin | ] Mesoamerican ■ Caribbean
-----Major trade routes
500 miles
Kwakiutl of the Northwest Coast
□ Subarctic |	|	Northwest	Coast
|	|	California
r	1	Plateau
r	|	Plains
E J
Eastern Woodlands 0 250 250	500 kilometers
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Region What does this map reveal about North America in the 1400s?
2.	Location Why do you think some regions had more trade routes than others?
Review Unit 7
COMMON CHARACTERISTICS
Many of the Native American cultures had in common certain patterns of trade, attitudes toward land use, religious beliefs, and social values. As in other parts of the world, trade helped the spread of customs and beliefs. Tribes traded among each other both locally and over long distances. So extensive was the network of forest trails and river roads that an English sailor named David Ingram claimed in 1568 to have walked along Native American trade routes all the way from the Gulf of Mexico to Nova Scotia. Native Americans traded many things, but land was not one of them. Land was regarded as the source of life, not as a commodity to be sold. "We cannot sell the lives of men and animals," said one Blackfoot chief in the 1800s, "therefore we cannot sell this land.
Nearly all Native Americans thought of the natural world as filled with spirits. Every object—both living and nonliving—possessed a voice that might be heard if one listened closely. Some cultures worshiped one supreme being, variously called "Great Spirit," "Great Mystery," or "the Creative Power."
The basic unit of organization among all Native American groups was the family, which included aunts, uncles, cousins, and other relatives. Some tribes further organized the families into clans, or groups of families descended from a common ancestor.
In the late 1400s, on the eve of the first encounter with Europeans, the rhythms of Native American family life were highly developed. All phases of a person's life—birth, marriage, and death—were guided by traditions that often went back hundreds or perhaps thousands of years. On the other side of the Atlantic, in West Africa, customs equally ancient guided another diverse group of people.
goods that passed through their realms. In 1067 an Arab geographer in Spain, named A1 Bakri, described the duties (import and export taxes) levied in Ghana.
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
© Why would Native American attitudes toward land ownership lead to conflict with Europeans?
A
Personal Voice al bakri “For every donkey loaded with salt that enters the country, the king takes a duty of one golden dinar [about one-eighth ounce of gold], and two dinars from every one that leaves. From a load of copper the duty due to the king Is five mithquals [also about one-eighth ounce of gold], and from a load of merchandise ten mithquals. . . . The [gold] nuggets found in all the mines .. . are reserved for the king, only gold dust being left for the people. ”
—quoted in Africa in the Days of Exploration
With such wealth, the rulers who controlled the north-south trade routes could raise large armies and conquer new territory. They could also build cities, administer laws, and support the arts and education.
KINGDOMS OF BENIN AND KONGO
At its height in the 1500s, Songhai's power extended across much of West Africa. However, it did not control the forest kingdoms along the southern coast. In the 1400s, one of these kingdoms, Benin, dominated a large region around the Niger Delta. Leading the expansion was a powerful oba, or ruler, named Ewuare, who developed Benin City. Within another stretch of rain forest, in West Central Africa, the powerful kingdom of Kongo arose on the lower Congo (Zaire) River. In the late 1400s, Kongo consisted of a series of small kingdoms ruled by a single leader called the manikongo, who lived in what is today Angola.
West African Societies of the 1400s
A desert caravan approaches the fabled Songhai city of Timbuktu.
Like North America, West Africa in the 1400s was home to a variety of long-established, sophisticated societies. From this region, especially from the coasts, originated most of the people who were enslaved and brought to the Americas in the centuries that followed. Their African traditions and beliefs played a major role in forming American history and culture. Notable among West African societies in the late 1400s were three powerful kingdoms: Songhai, Benin, and Kongo.
THE KINGDOM OF SONGHAI
From about 600 to 1600, a succession of empires— first Ghana, then Mali, and finally Songhai—gained power and wealth by controlling the trans-Sahara trade. The rulers of these empires grew rich by taxing the MAIN IDEA
Comparing
What did the kingdoms of West Africa have in common?
WEST AFRICAN CULTURE
Most West Africans lived in small villages, where life revolved around family, the com-munity, and tradition. Bonds of kinship—that is, family ties—formed the basis of most aspects of life. Political leaders claimed authority on the basis of religion. Although West Africans might worship a variety of gods and ancestral spirits, most believed in a single creator.
Throughout West Africa, people supported themselves by farming, herding, hunting, fishing, and by mining and trading. Almost all groups believed in collective ownership of land. Individuals farmed the land, but it reverted to family or village ownership when not in use.
TRADING PATTERNS WITH THE WIDER WORLD
By the 1400s, West Africa had long been connected to the wider world through trade. The city of Timbuktu was the hub of a well-established trading network that connected most of West Africa to the ports of North Africa, and through these ports to markets in Europe and Asia. Along trade routes across the Sahara Desert, merchants carried goods from Mediterranean cities and salt from Saharan mines to exchange for gold, ivory, and dyed cotton cloth.
Along with goods, traders from North Africa also brought across the Sahara the Islamic faith, which increasingly influenced West African cultures. Islam is a monotheistic religion—that is, one based on the belief in a single god. The religion of Islam was founded in Arabia in 622 by Muhammad and spread quickly across the Middle East and North Africa.
SPOTLIGHT
HISTORICAL
ISLAM
Islam was founded by Muhammad (about a.d. 570-632), who worked as a merchant in Mecca, a trading city on the Arabian peninsula. When he was about 40, he believed the angel Gabriel appeared to him and told him to preach a new religion to the Arabs. This religion became known as Islam, which in Arabic means “surrender [to Allah].” (Allah is the Arabic word for God.) The followers of Islam are called Muslims, “those who submit to God’s will.”
The words that Muhammad claimed he had received from the angel were recorded by his followers in the Qur’an, the holy book of Islam. The Qur’an teaches that “there is no God but Allah, and Muhammad is His Prophet.” The Qur’an also sets forth certain duties for righteous Muslims, including a series of daily prayers, the giving of charity, and a pilgrimage to the holy city of Mecca.
Review Unit 9
PLAY£#
“KING” ISABELLA 1451-1504
Queen Isabella, who played a central role in European exploration by sponsoring Christopher Columbus’s voyages to the Americas, made her mark on the Old World as well. As co-ruler of Spain, Isabella actively participated in her country’s religious and military affairs.
In championing Spain’s Catholicism, the queen often fought openly with the pope to make sure that her candidates were appointed to positions in the Spanish church. In addition, Isabella had tasted battle far more than most rulers, either male or female. The queen rode among her troops in full armor, personally commanding them in Ferdinand’s absence. Whenever Isabella appeared on a horse, her troops shouted, “Castile, Castile, for our King Isabella!”
THE PORTUGUESE
Mariners from Portugal made trading contacts along the West African coast starting in the 1440s. These early contacts with Portuguese traders had two significant consequences for West Africa and the Americas. First, direct trade between the Portuguese and the coastal people of West Africa bypassed the routes across the Sahara and pulled the coastal region into a closer relationship with Europe. Second, the Portuguese began the European trade m enslaved West Africans. European Societies of the 1400s
In the late 1400s, most Europeans, like most Native Americans and most Africans, lived in small villages, bound to the land and to rhythms of life that had been in place for centuries. For the majority of Europeans, change came slowly.
THE SOCIAL HIERARCHY
European communities were based on social hierarchy, that is, they were organized according to rank. At the top of the hierarchy were monarchs and the aristocracy, the landowning elite, who held most of the wealth and power. Members of the clergy also ranked high in the social order. At the bottom were agricultural laborers, or peasants. Few individuals rose above the social position of their birth. One group that did achieve mobility was the growing number of artisans and merchants, the people who created and traded goods for money. There were relatively few members of this group in the 1400s. However, the profit they earned from trade would eventually make them a valuable source of tax revenue to monarchs seeking to finance costly overseas exploration and expansion. O
CHRISTIANITY SHAPES THE EUROPEAN OUTLOOK
The dominant religion in Western Europe was Christianity, a religion based on the life and teachings of Jesus. The leader of the church—the pope—and his bishops held great political as well as spiritual authority. As the influence of Christianity and Islam spread, the two religions came into conflict. In 1096, Christian armies from all over Western Europe responded to the church's call to force the Muslims out of the Holy Land around Jerusalem. Over the next two centuries, Europeans launched the Crusades, a series of military expeditions to the Middle East in the name of Christianity.
In the end, these bloody Crusades failed to "rescue" the Holy Land, but they resulted in two consequences that encouraged European exploration and expansion. First, the Crusades opened up Asian trade routes, supplying Europeans with luxuries from the East, especially spices such as cinnamon, cloves, nutmeg, and pepper. Second, the Crusades weakened the power of European nobles, many of whom lost their lives or fortunes in the wars. Monarchs eventually took advantage of the nobles' weakened ranks to consolidate their own power.
By the early 1500s, many church leaders and ordinary people were eager for reforms. This desire for change led to a movement called the Reformation, which criticized church practices and challenged the authority of the pope.
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
Why were merchants able to achieve social mobility?
Background
Spices were important in the Middle Ages when European farmers preserved meat by packing it between layers of salt. Spices helped disguise the bad taste of the meat.
10 Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
History Through
Arty
JUNE, FROM LES TRES RICHES HEURES DU DUC DE BERRY
This miniature painting, representing the month of June, is a page from a prayer book calendar begun by the Limbourg brothers around the year 1412. The book was made for a younger son of the French king, and tells us a great deal about the aristocratic view of the European social order.
In the background, the walls of the city of Paris protect a palace and the royal chapel, buildings that represent the two most powerful institutions in medieval European society: church and aristocracy.
In the foreground, peasants mow the fields, in an orderly world of peace and tranquility. However, the image is a fantasy, an idealized vision painted to please the aristocracy. There is no hint of the peasants’ grinding poverty or of the violence of the Hundred Years’ War that was at that moment devastating northern France.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Visual Sources 1.	What does the painting tell you about the importance of gender in the division of labor during the 1400s?
2.	Why might images of poverty have displeased the aristocracy?
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing Causes $ How did religious events in Europe help spur exploration and settlement of new lands?
Vocabulary medieval: of or
during the Middle Ages, often dated from a.d. 476 to 1453
The Reformation led to a religious schism, or split, throughout Europe: those who supported the Reformation became known as Protestants because of their opposition to the established Catholic church. This split deepened the rivalries among European nations during the period of North American colonization a century later and sent some Protestants and some Catholics across the Atlantic to seek religious freedom. ®
EUROPEAN NATIONS TAKE SHAPE
During the 1400s, four major nations were taking shape in Europe: Portugal, Spain, France, and England. Ambitious monarchs extended their reach by collecting new taxes, raising professional armies, and forming stronger governments. Among their new allies were the merchants, who paid taxes in exchange for the protection and expansion of trade. THE RENAISSANCE
The 1400s also saw a cultural awakening in Europe, known as the Renaissance (renT-sans")_a term meaning "rebirth" of the kind of interest in the physical world that had characterized ancient Greece and Rome. In the arts, this meant rejecting the flat, two-dimensional images of medieval painting in favor of the deep perspectives and fully rounded forms of ancient sculpture and painting. Starting in Italy, a region stimulated by commercial contact with Asia and Africa, the Renaissance soon spread throughout Europe. Renaissance artists created works of lasting influence, while European scholars reexamined the texts of ancient philosophers, mathematicians, geographers, and scientists. Although their themes were still often religious in nature, Renaissance artists portrayed their subjects more realistically than had medieval artists, using new
Review Unit 11
THE CARAVEL
The caravel, the ship used by most early Portuguese and Spanish explorers, had many advantages over earlier vessels |§p It was lighter, swifter, and more maneuverable than other ships.
techniques such as perspective. Leonardo da Vinci, investigating how things worked, kept notebooks in which he made detailed drawings of human anatomy and of his inventions, including a flying machine. This energetic spirit of inquiry infused the early explorers and adventurers who, like Christopher Columbus, grew up during the Renaissance.
The spread of the Renaissance was advanced by Johann Gutenberg's introduction of printing from movable type in the 1450s. This development made books easier and cheaper to produce, which aided the spread of ideas.
The Renaissance encouraged people to think of themselves as individuals, to have confidence in their capabilities, and to look forward to the fame their achievements might bring. This attitude prompted many to seek glory through adventure, discovery, and conquest.
EUROPE ENTERS A NEW AGE OF EXPANSION
The European interest in overseas expansion probably began in the 1200s with the journey of Marco Polo to China. Later, the publication in 1477 of the first printed edition of Polo's vivid—and sometimes exaggerated—account caused renewed interest in the East. Like other merchants, Polo traveled to Asia by land. The expense and peril involved in such journeys led Europeans to seek alternative routes. In the 1400s, Europeans used the work of Ptolemy, a second-century scholar, along with the work of Arab and j MAIN IDEA
Developing
Historical
Perspective
How did Renaissance attitudes encourage the European age of exploration?
.2 Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
Vocabulary
bureaucracies:
government departments staffed with nonelected officials
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What military advantages did Europeans have over Africans and Native Americans?
The best ships that
Jewish scholars, to revive the art of cartography, or mapmaking. Although imper-
fect, the new maps inspired Europeans to start exploring for water routes to Asia.
European monarchs had powerful motives to finance the search for new lands and trading routes: they needed money to maintain their growing armies and administrative bureaucracies. By the mid-1400s, Europe's gold and silver mines were running low. So the monarchs of Portugal, Spain, France, and England began looking overseas for wealth.
Beginning in the 1300s, monarchs invested some of their tax revenues in new weapons—such as longbows and cannons—which they used to limit the power of the independent nobles. These new weapons, along with the hand-held firearms that were developed in the 1400s, also gave them military advantages over the Africans and Native Americans whom they later encountered.
SAILING TECHNOLOGY IMPROVES
European ship captains in the 1400s experimented with new sailing vessels such as the car- avel and navigating tools such as the compass and the astrolabe, Sailed the seas . . / which helped sailors plot direction at sea. They also took advan- alvise da cadamosto, of the caravel tage of sailing innovations, like those that allowed caravels to sail against the wind.
One leader in developing and employing these innovations was Prince Henry the Navigator of Portugal, who gathered mariners, geographers, and navigators to his court. According to a contemporary chronicler, Gomes Eanes de Zurara, the prince's driving motivation was the need to know.
For almost 40 years, Prince Henry sent his captains sailing south along the west coast of Africa. Exploration continued after the prince's death. In 1488,
Portuguese sailor Bartolomeu Dias rounded the southern tip of Africa; fellow Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama reached India ten years later. By sailing around Africa to eastern Asia via the Indian Ocean, Portuguese traders were able to cut their costs and increase their profits.
As cartographers redrew their maps to show this eastern route to Asia, an Italian sea captain named Christopher Columbus believed there was an even shorter route—one that headed west across the Atlantic.
(Yj/ assessment
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•	nomadic	•	Pueblo	• Kongo
•	Aztec	•	Iroquois	• Islam
•Anasazi	•	Benin	•Christianity
•	Reformation
•	Renaissance
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
For each region and time period shown, write two or three sentences to describe how it was affected by trade and commerce.
CRITICAL THINKING
MAKING INFERENCES
Why do you think other European nations lagged behind Portugal in overseas exploration? Support your reasons with details from the text.
Think About:
•	the geography of Portugal
•	the power of monarchs in the 1400s
•	the economic and political situation of European nations during this time
ANALYZING CAUSES
What factors do you think contributed to the thriving trade system that flourished in West Africa? Use evidence from the text to support your response.
ANALYZING EFFECTS
What effects did Portuguese trade have on West Africa?
Review Unit 13
Spanish North America
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Beginning with the voyage of Christopher Columbus, the Spanish built a vast colonial empire in the Americas.
The Spanish left an impact on the cultures of North and South America that helped to shape present-day America.
•Christopher
Columbus
•Taino •Treaty of Tordesillas •Columbian Exchange
•conquistador •Hernando Cortes •Montezuma •mestizo • encomlenda •New Spain •New Mexico
One. European’s Stor
hmhsocialstudies.com!
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on significant dates of Columbus's voyages and the Spanish exploration of the New World.
On August 3, 1492, the Genoese mariner Christopher Columbus set out on a bold expedition: to find a route to Asia by sailing west across the Atlantic Ocean. It was a journey destined to change the course of world history. A seeker of fame and fortune, Columbus began his travel journal by restating the deal he had struck with the Spanish rulers financing his voyage.
A
Personal Voice Christopher columbus “ Based on the information that I had given Your Highnesses about the land of India and about a Prince who is called the Great Khan [of China] . . . Your Highnesses decided to send me ... to the regions of India, to see . . . the peoples and the lands, and to learn of. . . the measures which could be taken for their conversion to our Holy Faith. ... I was to go by way of the west, whence until today we do not know with certainty that anyone has gone. . . . —The Log of Christopher Columbus
Columbus never reached Asia. He landed on an island he thought was off the Christopher coast of Asia but was actually in the Caribbean Sea. Instead of finding the Great columbus from Khan, Columbus set in motion a process that brought together the American, a painting done European, and African worlds.	in 1519.
Columbus Crosses the Atlantic
In October 1492, roughly two months after leaving Spain, Columbus's small fleet of ships, the Nina, the Pinta, and the Santa Maria, reached land. Columbus went ashore, where he encountered a group of people who would become known as the Taino (tfno), from their word for "noble ones." He planted Spanish banners and renamed their island San Salvador ("Holy Savior"), claiming it for Spain. Columbus spent 96 days exploring four coral islands in the Bahamas and the coastlines of two larger Caribbean islands, known today as Cuba and Hispaniola.
Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
Vocabulary colonize: to
establish
settlements under the control of a parent country
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Events
What did Spain and Portugal agree to do in the Treaty of Tordesillas?
Convinced that he had landed on islands off Asia, known to Europeans as the Indies, Columbus called the people he met los indios. Thus the name Indian came to be mistakenly applied to all the diverse peoples of the Americas. The Spanish monarchs were thrilled with Columbus's discoveries and funded three more of his voyages—this time to colonize the lands he had claimed.
THE IMPACT ON NATIVE AMERICANS
By the time Columbus set sail for his return to Hispaniola in 1493, Europeans had already developed a pattern for colonization. They had glimpsed the profitability of the plantation system, realized the economic benefits of using native or local peoples for forced labor, and learned to use European weapons to dominate native peoples. These tactics would be used in the Americas. The arrival of the Europeans devastated Native Americans by another means: disease. The Taino, for example, had not developed any natural immunity to measles, mumps, chickenpox, smallpox, typhus, or other diseases Europeans had unknowingly brought with them. Consequently, the Taino died by the thousands once they were exposed.
THE IMPACT ON AFRICANS
With the decline of the native work force the European settlers of the Americas eventually turned to Africa for slaves. The Atlantic slave trade devastated many African societies, particularly in West Africa. Starting in the 1500s, African cultures lost many of their young and more able members. Before the Atlantic slave trade ended in the 1800s, it had drained Africa of at least 12 million people. THE IMPACT ON EUROPEANS
Columbus's voyages had profound effects on Europeans as well. In search of new lives, Europeans began to cross the Atlantic by the thousands in what would become one of the biggest voluntary migrations in world history. Overseas expansion inflamed national rivalries in Europe. In 1494, Spain and Portugal signed the Treaty of Tordesillas (tor'de-se'es), in which they agreed to divide the Western Hemisphere between them. £ THE COLUMBIAN EXCHANGE
The voyages of Columbus and those after him led to the discovery of plants and animals in the Americas that were new to Europeans and Africans. Ships took items such as corn, potatoes, and tobacco from the Americas to Europe and to Africa. From these countries, they brought back livestock, grains, fruit, and coffee. This global transfer of living things, called the Columbian Exchange, began with Columbus's first voyage and continues today. HISTORY
VIDEO
Christopher
Columbus: Explorer
of the New World	I
’/I hmhsocialstudies.com^
i
i
I * J
Sweet Vcorn Avocado C0SSaVa PeanUt
K-^t0	-	“ -	-
.^ericAS
A-
WhgSPPle Peppers rkey	ATLANTIC OCEAN
< Coffee	■
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
OnionCitrus ^nai Human-environment	AFK,CA AND ASIA TO
interaction How do you think
tho r^l. r-.,„i_■ - . 
The Columbian Exchange
>rn Avocaao vaooava reanut ^R^otato
ff&ttOPE, A™™, AM> ASIA
^nilla ^Beans
-..uvcMvuint nuw uu yuu 1111 J the Columbian Exchange has
enriched each hemisphere?

Review Unit 15
The Spanish Claim a New Empire _______________________
In the wake of Columbus's voyages, Spanish explorers took to the seas to claim new colonies for Spain. These explorers were lured by the prospect of vast lands filled with gold and silver. Known as conquistadors (kong-ke sta-dorz ) (conquerors), they conquered much of the Americas.
CORTES SUBDUES THE AZTEC
Soon after landing in Mexico in 1519, Hernando Cortes learned of the vast and wealthy Aztec empire in the region's interior. With a force of 600 soldiers, 17 horses, 10 cannons, and numerous dogs, the VIDEO
The Arrival of the Spanish
\<V.Y PLAY£fl
HERNANDO CORTES 1485-1547
conquistador marched inland.
The Spaniards marveled at Tenochtitlan, the Aztec capital, with its towering temples and elaborate engineering works—including a system that brought fresh water into the city. "We were amazed," one of Cortes's soldiers said of his first glimpse of Tenochtitlan. "Some of our soldiers even asked whether the things we saw were not a dream." While the Aztec city astonished the Spaniards, the capital's glittering gold stock seemed to hypnotize them. "They picked up the gold and fingered it like monkeys," one native witness recalled. "They hungered like pigs for that gold."
The Aztec emperor, Montezuma, convinced at first that Cortes was an armor-clad god, agreed to give the Spanish explorer a share of the empire's existing gold supply. The conquistador was not satisfied. Cortes eventually forced the Aztec to mine more gold and silver. In the spring of 1520, the Aztec rebelled against the Spaniards' intrusion. Regarding Montezuma as a traitor, the Aztec are believed to have stoned their ruler to death before driving out Cortes's forces.
While they had successfully repelled the Spanish invaders, the Aztec were falling victim to the diseases that the Spanish had brought with them. By the time Cortes launched a counterattack in 1521, the Spanish and their native allies overran an Aztec force that had been greatly reduced by smallpox and measles. After several months of fighting, the invaders sacked and burned Tenochtitlan, and the Aztec surrendered. While flames still flickered in the shattered capital, Cortes laid plans for the colony of New Spain.
THE SPANISH PATTERN OF CONQUEST
In building their American empire, the Spaniards lived among the native people and sought to impose their own culture upon them. The settlers, mostly men, tended to intermarry with native women. This practice eventually created a large mestizo (mestizo)—or mixed Spanish and Native American— population in the Spanish colonies. Nonetheless, the Spanish also oppressed the people among whom they lived. In their effort to exploit the land for its resources, they forced Native American workers to labor in an encomienda (eng-ko-myen'da) system. Under that system, natives farmed, ranched, or mined for Spanish landlords, who received the rights to their labor from Spanish authorities. Cortes made himself the enemy of thousands of Native Americans, but the daring conquistador did not have many friends among Spaniards. Spanish authorities on Cuba, where Cortes owned land, accused the conquistador of murdering his wife, Catalina Juarez. "There were ugly accusations, but none proved," wrote Juarez’s biographer.
In addition, the Cuban governor, Diego Velazquez, who resented Cortes’s arrogance, relieved him of the command of a gold-seeking expedition to the mainland. Cortes left Cuba anyway. As he fought his way through Mexico, Cortes had to battle not only the Native Americans but also the Spanish forces that Velazquez sent to arrest him.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Jj) What factors enabled the Spanish to conquer the Aztec?
Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
120°W
European Exploration of the Americas. 1492-1682
Cabeza de Vaca 1528-36
Tenochtitlan (Mexico City)
120<JW
1Q0°W
Columbus
4^ French English Dutch
0 1,000
2,000 miles
PACIFIC dX^S. OCEAN
----Tropic of Cancer-
-20°N-
Nt
&
Juan de la Cosa, pilot-navigator on Columbus’s ship Nina, drew the known world on this oxhide map in 1500.
1,000	2,000 kilometers
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Movement How many voyages to the Americas did Columbus make?
2.	Place In what years did England
■ and France sail to the Americas and } which regions did they explore?
Review Unit 17
I	missions are still standing and some are still in use. They remain as lasting
memorials to the great cultures reflected in their architecture.
RESISTANCE TO THE SPANISH
The impact of the Spanish missions on Native American cultures has been a subject of much historical controversy. Recent his-i| i torians assert that the mission system negatively affected many Native American communities in several ways. The Spanish required Native Americans who converted to Christianity to live inside the missions, separating them from their families and cultures. Native Americans who tried to leave were punished. The Spanish also forced Native Americans to provide labor for farming and construction, give up their self-government, and adopt European dress, diet, and living arrangements. During the 1670s, priests and soldiers around Santa Fe began forcing Native Americans to help support the missions by paying a tribute, an offering of either goods or services. The tribute was usually a bushel of maize or a deer hide, but the Spanish also forced Native Americans to work for them and sometimes abused them physically. Native Americans who practiced their native religion or refused to pay a tribute were beaten.
Spanish priests punished the Pueblo religious leader Pope for his worship practices, which they interpreted as witchcraft. In 1680, the
angered leader led a well-organized uprising against the Spanish that involved some 17,000 warriors from villages all over New Mexico. The triumphant fighters destroyed Catholic churches, executed priests and settlers, and drove the Spaniards back into New Spain. For the next 12 years—until the Spanish regained control of the area—the southwest region of the future United States once again belonged to its original inhabitants.
But Spain would never again have complete control of the Americas. In 1588, England had defeated the Spanish Armada, a naval fleet assembled to invade England, ending Spain's naval dominance in the Atlantic. In time, England began forging colonies along the eastern shore of North America, thus extending its own empire in the New World. But Spain's influence continues in the people and customs of the Southeast and Southwest.
“The heathen have concealed a mortal hatred for our holy faith and enmity for the Spanish nation. ”
SPANISH OFFICER,
WRITING OF POPE’S REBELLION
SB
1.
•Christopher Columbus •Taino
•Treaty of Tordesillas
TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence
•Columbian Exchange •conquistador •Hernando Cortes
explaining its
•Montezuma
•mestizo
•encomienda
significance.
New Spain New Mexico
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a time line of the major events and significant dates of Columbus’s voyages and the Spanish exploration of the New World. Use the dates already plotted on the time line below as a guide.
11492[ 11494 |	11513 |
I -
l1493|	f 1520-211
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING EFFECTS
What do you think were the most important long-term consequences of Columbus’s encounters in the Americas? Think About:
•	conquering and claiming land
•	forced labor of Native Americans and Africans
•	the impact on Africa, Europe, and the Americas
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
State three conclusions about Spanish exploration and settlement north of Mexico and the Spaniards’ interaction with Native Americans there. Why did the Native Americans of New Mexico revolt against the Spanish settlers?
Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
Early British Colonies
MAIN IDEA

WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Beginning in the early 1600s, the English established colonies along the eastern shore of North America.
The original 13 English colonies in North America formed the foundation of what would become the United States of America.
•John Smith	•John Winthrop
•Jamestown	• King Philip’s War
•joint-stock	•William Penn
companies	• Quaker
• indentured	• mercantilism
servant	• Navigation Acts
•Puritan
One. European's Story
A
John Smith was a self-proclaimed soldier of fortune, sea captain, and poet.
John Smith craved adventure. Smith's father had urged him to be a merchant, but the restless Englishman wanted to see the world. In 1606, he offered his services as a colonist to the Virginia Company, a group of merchants charged with starting an English colony in North America. He later recalled his vision of the opportunities that awaited those who settled the Americas.
A
Personal Voice john smith ‘‘What man who is poor or who has only his merit to advance his fortunes can desire more contentment than to walk over and plant the land he has obtained by risking his life? . . . Here nature and liberty . . . give us freely that which we lack or have to pay dearly for in England. ... What pleasure can be greater than to grow tired from . . . planting vines, fruits, or vegetables? . . . ”
—The General History of Virginia
Smith would need all of his abilities to steer the new colony, Jamestown, through what turned out to be a disastrous beginning. In time, however, the colony survived to become England's first permanent settlement in North America.

BBQ
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the cause-and-effect relationships identified in the section.
The English Settle at Jamestown
In April of 1607, nearly four months after the Virginia Company's three ships had left England, they reached the North American shore. Sailing part way up a broad river leading into Chesapeake Bay, the colonists selected a small, defensible peninsula and built Fort James to protect the settlement of Jamestown, named for their king.
A DISASTROUS START
Unlike Spanish colonies, which were funded by Spanish rulers, the English colonies were originally funded by joint-stock companies. Stock" companies allowed several investors to pool their wealth in support of a colony that would, they hoped, yield a profit. Investors in the Jamestown colony demanded a quick return on their investment, and the colonists hoped to find gold to satisfy them. Consequently, they neglected farming and soon Review Unit 21
n
Rediscovering Fort James
about ten feet from the fort’s walls. Houses measured sixteen by forty feet and several colonists lived In each.
Erosion turned the Jamestown Peninsula into an island and, for many years, the site of the original Fort James was assumed to be under water. However, in 1996, archaeologists from the Association for the Preservation of Virginia Antiquities discovered artifacts on what they concluded was the original site of the fort.
Since then, archaeologists have discovered armor, weapons, even games used by the first colonists. Archaeologists and historians are constantly learning more and more about this long-buried treasure of American history,
This illustration re-creates what historians and archaeologists now believe Fort James looked like early in its history.
Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
Why was the early settlement at Jamestown a near disaster?
suffered the consequences. Disease from contaminated river water struck them first, followed soon by hunger. After several months, one settler described the terrifying predicament: "Thus we lived for the space of five months in this miserable distress, . . . our men night and day groaning in every corner of the fort, most pitiful to hear."
Smith held the colony together by forcing the colonists to farm and by securing food and support from the native Powhatan peoples. Then Smith was injured and returned to England. Without Smith's leadership, the colony eventually deteriorated to the point of famine. The settlement was saved, however, by the arrival of new colonists and by the development of a highly profitable crop, tobacco.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
Why were Virginia’s frontier settlers frustrated with their government?
TOBACCO REQUIRES A SUPPLY OF LABOR
In order to grow tobacco, the Virginia Company needed field laborers. Immigration jumped in 1618, when the company introduced the headright system, offering 50 acres of land to "adventurers" who would pay their own or another's transportation from England. Many of those who arrived in Virginia, however, came as indentured servants. In exchange for passage to North America and food and shelter upon arrival, an indentured servant agreed to a limited term of servitude— usually four to seven years. Indentured servants were main-	__________
ly from the lower classes of English society and therefore had little to lose by leaving for a new world.
The first enslaved Africans arrived in Virginia aboard a Dutch merchant ship in 1619. After a few years, most of them received land and freedom. It would be several decades before the English colonists in North America began the systematic use of enslaved Africans as laborers.
COLONISTS CLASH WITH NATIVE AMERICANS
The colonists' desire for more land—to accommodate their growing population and the demand for more crop space— led to warfare with the original inhabitants of Virginia.
Unlike the Spanish, the English followed a pattern of driving away the people they defeated. Their conquest over the native peoples was total and complete, which is one reason a large mestizo-like population never developed in the United States.
ECONOMIC DIFFERENCES SPLIT VIRGINIA
The English colonists who migrated to North America in increasing numbers battled not only Native Americans but sometimes each other. By the 1670s, one-quarter of the free white men in Virginia were poor former indentured servants who lived mainly on the western frontier of Virginia, where they constantly fought with Native Americans for land. Although Virginia's governor, William Berkeley, proposed building forts to protect the settlers, the settlers refused to pay taxes to maintain these forts. The colonists, under the leadership of a young planter named Nathaniel Bacon, marched on Jamestown in September of 1676.
Bacon confronted colonial leaders with a number of grievances, including the frontier's lack of representation in Virginia's colonial legislature, or law-making body, the House of Burgesses. Although Bacon's Rebellion ultimately failed, it exposed the restlessness of the colony's former indentured servants.
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
EARLY REPRESENTATIVE GOVERNMENT
As the English settlers colonized North America, they sowed the seeds of the representative style of government that would become the foundation of American democracy.
Virginia’s House of Burgesses served as the first representative body in colonial America. The House first met in Jamestown in 1619 and included two citizens, or burgesses, from each of Virginia’s eleven districts. The body claimed the authority to raise taxes and pass legislation—subject to veto by the English governor.
The Mayflower Compact, which the Pilgrims crafted as they sailed to North America in 1620, created a civil government and pledged loyalty to the king. It stated that the purpose of their government in America would be to frame “just and equal laws ... for the general good of the colony.”
Created in 1639, the Fundamental Orders of Connecticut extended voting rights to a greater number of white males in that colony. It also declared that the colonial legislature could assemble without a call by the governor.
Review Unit 23

Puritans cherished their Bibles, passing them down as family treasures from one generation to the next. This Bible belonged to Governor William Bradford of the Plymouth Colony.
Puritans Create a “New England”
After King Henry VIII (1491-1547) broke with Roman Catholicism in the 1530s, the Church of England was formed. Although the new church was free of Catholic control, one religious group, the Puritans, felt that the church had kept too much Catholic ritual. They wanted to "purify," or reform, the church by eliminating all traces of Catholicism. Some Puritans, called Separatists, wanted to separate from the English Church. They often met in secret to avoid the punishment inflicted upon those who did not follow the Anglican form of worship. Jg/
One congregation of Separatists, known today as the Pilgrims, eventually migrated to America. There, in 1620, this small group of families founded the Plymouth Colony, the second permanent English colony in North America. Their Mayflower Compact, named for the ship on which they sailed to North America, became an important landmark in the development of American democracy.
THE MASSACHUSETTS BAY COLONY
Other Puritans who were not Separatists turned their thoughts toward New England in the 1620s. They felt the burden of increasing religious persecution, political repression, and dismal economic conditions. In 1630, a group of Puritans established the Massachusetts Bay Colony along the upper coast of North America. The port town of Boston soon became the colony's thriving capital. Settlers established other towns nearby and eventually incorporated the Plymouth Colony into the Massachusetts Bay Colony. The Puritans believed they had a special covenant, or agreement, with God. To fulfill their part, they were to create a moral society that would serve as a beacon for others to follow. Puritan leader John Winthrop expressed the sense of mission that bound the Puritans together, in a sermon delivered aboard the flagship Arbella: "We [in New England] shall be as a City upon a Hill; the eyes of all people are on us."
Although Puritans made no effort to create a democracy, the Massachusetts Bay Company extended the right to vote to all adult male members of the Puritan church—40 percent of the colony's men. As their system of self-government evolved, so did the close relationship between the government and the Puritan church. The Puritan view dominated Massachusetts society: taxes supported the Puritan church, and laws required church attendance, jgy
DISSENT IN THE PURITAN COMMUNITY
The Puritans came to America to follow their own form of worship, and they were intolerant of people who had dissenting religious beliefs. One such dissenter was Roger Williams, an extreme Separatist, who expressed two controversial views. First, he declared that the English settlers had no rightful claim to the land unless they purchased it from Native Americans. Second, he argued that every person should be free to worship according to his or her conscience. MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
& Why were the Puritans unhappy with the Church of England?
Vocabulary repression: the
act of putting down by force
MAIN IDEA
Forming
Generalizations
What type of society did the Puritans want to create?
24 Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
main idea
Analyzing
Issues
jy In what principles did the government of Providence differ from that of Massachusetts?
When officials tried to deport Williams back to England, he fled Massachusetts and traveled south. He negotiated with a local Native American group for a plot of land and set up a new colony, which he called Providence. In Providence, later the capital of Rhode Island, Williams guaranteed religious freedom and separation of church and state.
Another dissenter, Anne Hutchinson, taught that worshippers did not need the church or its ministers to interpret the Bible for them. Banished from the colony, Hutchinson, with her family and a band of followers, fled first to Rhode Island and, after her husband died, to New Netherland—which later became part of New York—where she died in a war with Native Americans.
NATIVE AMERICANS RESIST COLONIAL EXPANSION
While Williams and his followers were settling Rhode Island, thousands of other white settlers fanned out to western Massachusetts and to new colonies in New Hampshire and Connecticut. From the beginning, Native Americans had helped the colonists, providing them with land and giving them agricultural advice. Soon, however, disputes between the Puritans and Native Americans arose over land and religion. As Native Americans saw their lands taken over by settlers, they feared an end to their way of life. In addition, Native Americans resented the Puritans' efforts to convert them and bristled under Puritan laws such as the prohibition of hunting and fishing on Sunday. KING PHILIP’S WAR
Great tension continued between Native Americans and settlers for nearly 40 years. Eventually, the Wampanoag chief Metacom, whom the English called King Philip, organized his tribe and several others into an alliance to wipe out the invaders. The eruption of King Philip's War in the spring of 1675 startled the Puritans with its intensity. Native Americans attacked ■n
New England Colonies to 1675
Middle Colonies to 1700

[XA New Netherland ICZJ (ceded to England in 1664) 0	50	100 miles
50 100 kilometers
1. Location wnai was uic oldest English settlement in New England?
Region What major river formed part of the border separating New Netherland from the English middle colonies?
Review Unit 25
yjORLD STXq£
and burned outlying settlements throughout New England. Within months ey were striking the outskirts of Boston. The alarmed and angered colonists responded by killing as many Native Americans as they could, even some from friendly tribes. For over a year, the two sides waged a war of mutual brutality and destruc-tion. Finally, food shortages, disease, and heavy casualties wore down the Native Americans' resistance, and they gradually surrendered or fled.
Settlement of the Middle Colonies
While English Puritans were establishing colonies in New England, the Dutch were founding one to the south. As early as 1609, Henry Hudson—an Englishman employed by the Dutch—had sailed up the river that now bears his name. The Dutch soon established a fur trade with the Iroquois and built trading posts on the Hudson River.
THE DUTCH FOUND NEW NETHERLAND
In 1621, the Dutch government granted the newly formed Dutch West India Company permission to colonize New Netherland and expand the thriving fur trade. New Amsterdam (now New York City), founded in 1625, became the capital of the colony (see map on page 25). In 1655, the Dutch extended their claims by taking over New Sweden, a tiny colony of Swedish and Finnish settlers that had established a rival fur trade along the Delaware River. To encourage settlers to come and stay, the colony opened its doors to a variety of ethnic and religious groups. In 1664, the English took over the colony without a fight. The duke of York, the new proprietor, or owner, of the colony, renamed it New York. The duke later gave a portion of this land to two of his friends, naming this territory New Jersey for the British island of Jersey.
THE QUAKERS SETTLE PENNSYLVANIA
The acquisition of New Netherland was one step in England's quest to extend its American empire after 1660, when the English monarchy was restored after a period of civil war and Puritan rule. The new king, Charles II, owed a debt to the father of a young man named William Penn. As payment, Charles gave the younger Penn a large property that the king insisted be called Pennsylvania, or "Penn's Woods," after the father. Following this, in 1682, Penn acquired more land from the duke of York, the three counties that became Delaware. William Penn belonged to the Society of Friends, or Quakers, a Protestant sect that held services without formal ministers, allowing any person to speak as the spirit moved him or her. They dressed plainly, refused to defer to persons of rank, opposed war, and refused to serve in the military. For their radical views, they were scorned and harassed by Anglicans and Puritans alike.
Penn wanted to establish a good and fair society in keeping with Quaker ideals of equality, cooperation, and religious toleration. Penn guaranteed every adult male settler 50 acres of land and the right to vote. His plan for government called for a representative assembly and freedom of religion. Like Roger Williams before him, Penn believed that the land belonged to the Native Americans, and he saw to it that they were paid for it.
j MAIN IDEA
Predicting
Effects
£ What long-term effects would you predict followed King Philip’s War?
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Events
How did the Dutch create an ethnically diverse colony?
THE ENGLISH CIVIL WAR AND RESTORATION
From 1642 to 1651, England was torn apart by great wars between loyalist supporters of King Charles I, and those who supported Parliament, many of whom were Puritans. The parliamentary armies were victorious, and Charles I was tried for treason and executed in 1649. For a decade, England became a commonwealth, or republic, headed first by Oliver Cromwell, a Puritan, and then by his son Richard.
However, the English grew weary of the rather grim and sober Puritan rule, and in 1660 the monarchy was restored under Charles II. The Restoration would have a profound effect on America, leading to the creation of new colonies and to more direct involvement by the Crown in colonial affairs.
6 Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
History Through
COLONIAL MEETINGHOUSES
The Puritans of the northeast, the Quakers of Pennsylvania, and the Anglicans of the southern colonies held profound but often different convictions about community, social responsibility, and individual freedom. These convictions were often expressed in the religious services of each group as well as the architecture of the places of worship where these services were held.
MEN’S SEATS
WOMEN’S
SEATS
Architecture^)
A
Quaker Meetinghouse
Quaker services, which were called “meetings,” relied on the inspiration of the “inner light.” Meetings reflected a respect for conscience and freedom of speech.
Men and women entered by separate doors and sat on opposite sides, facing each other. In some meetinghouses, women sat in slightly elevated seats.
Both men and women could speak during the meeting.
▲
Puritan Meetinghouse
Puritan services focused on preaching. Sermons,
which sometimes lasted for hours, instructed the individual conscience to be mindful of the common good.
The pulpit was the focal point of the meetinghouse. A plain interior reflected a value for austerity and simplicity. Meetinghouses were also used for town meetings.
Anglican Church
The head of the Anglican church was the British monarch. Anglican services valued ritual. Their churches stressed the importance of authority and status.
Anglican churches emphasized the altar through ornamentation and elaborate windows. A screen separated the altar from the congregation. Elaborate pews were reserved for wealthy church members.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Visual Sources 1.	In what ways do the Puritan and Quaker meetinghouses resemble each other? In what ways are they different?
2.	How does the interior of the Anglican church show a respect for hierarchy?
Review Unit 27
Penn himself spent only about four years in Pennsylvania. Meanwhile, his idealistic vision had faded but did not disappear. The Quakers became a minority in a colony thickly populated by people from all over western Europe. Slavery was introduced, and, in fact, many prominent Quakers in Pennsylvania owned slaves. However, the principles of equality, cooperation, and religious tolerance on which he had founded his vision would eventually become fundamental values of the new American nation.
England and Its Colonies Prosper
THIRTEEN COLONIES
Throughout the 1600s and 1700s, more British colonies in North America were founded, each for very different reasons. In 1632, King Charles I granted land north of Chesapeake Bay to George Calvert, the first Lord Baltimore. Calvert's son Cecil, the second Lord Baltimore, named the colony Maryland, after Queen Henrietta Maria, Charles's wife. In 1663, King Charles II awarded a group of key supporters the land between Virginia and Spanish Florida, a territory that soon became North and South Carolina. In 1732, an English philanthropist named James Oglethorpe, along with several associates, received a charter for a colony he hoped could be a haven for those imprisoned for debt. Oglethorpe named the colony Georgia, after King George II. Few debtors actually came to Georgia, and the British Crown assumed direct control of the colony in 1752. By that time, the Crown had begun to exercise more and more control over colonial economies and governments.
The thirteen British colonies existed primarily for the benefit of England. The colonies exported to England a rich variety of raw materials, such as lumber and furs, and in return they imported the manufactured goods that England produced. The thirteen colonies that became the original United States were founded over a period of 125 years. Together, the colonies represented a wide variety of people, skills, motives, industries, resources, and agricultural products.
MERCANTILISM AND THE NAVIGATION ACTS
Beginning in the 16th century, the nations of Europe competed for wealth and power through a new economic system called mercantilism (muf ken-te-liz'em), in which the colonies played a critical role. According to the theory of mercantilism, a nation could increase its wealth and power in two ways: by obtaining as much gold and silver as possible, and by establishing a favorable balance of trade, in which it sold more goods than it bought. A nation's ultimate goal was to become self-sufficient so that it did not have to depend on other countries for goods. The key to this process was the establishment of colonies. Colonies provided products, especially raw materials, that could not be found in the home country.
In 1651, England's Parliament, the country's legislative body, moved to tighten control of colonial trade by passing a series of measures known as the Navigation Acts. These acts enforced the following rules:
•	No country could trade with the colonies unless the goods were shipped in either colonial or English ships.
•	All vessels had to be operated by crews that were at least three-quarters English or colonial.
•	The colonies could export certain products, including tobacco and sugar—and later rice, molasses, and furs—only to England.
•	Almost all goods traded between the colonies and Europe first had to pass through an English port.
The system created by the Navigation Acts obviously benefited England. It proved to be good for most colonists as well. By restricting trade to English or colonial
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
How did Penn’s actions toward Native Americans differ from those of the Puritans in Massachusetts?
Vocabulary charter: A
document issued by a monarch or other authority creating a public or private corporation
Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
85 :W
75°W
The Thirteen Colonies to the 1700s
MASSACHUSETTS (Plymouth, 1620; Mass. Bay, 1630)
Economic Activities	
New England colonies	
Massachusetts . . .	.shipbuilding, shipping, fishing, lumber, rum, meat products
New Hampshire . . .	.ship masts, lumber, fishing, trade, shipping, livestock, foodstuffs
Connecticut		. rum, iron foundries, shipbuilding
Rhode Island		.snuff, livestock
Middle colonies	
New York		. furs, wheat, glass, shoes, livestock, shipping, shipbuilding, rum, beer, snuff
Delaware		.trade, foodstuffs
New Jersey		.trade, foodstuffs, copper
Pennsylvania		.flax, shipbuilding
Southern colonies	
Virginia		.tobacco, wheat, cattle, iron
Maryland		. tobacco, wheat, snuff
North Carolina . . . .	. naval supplies, tobacco, furs
South Carolina. . . .	. rice, indigo, silk
Georgia		. indigo, rice, naval supplies, lumber
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
Region Which colonies are noted for their industrial activity, such as building, rather than agricultural activity?	
|	~~|	New England colonies
■	- j	Middle colonies
|	|	Southern colonies
[ Other British possessions
I
French possessions Spanish possessions
0	100___________200 miles
0	100	200 kilometers
The date provided for each colony indicates the date of the first permanent settlement.
Review Unit 29
ships, the acts spurred a boom in the colonial shipbuilding industry and helped support the development of numerous other colonial industries.
COLONIAL GOVERNMENTS
Whatever their form of charter, by the mid 1700s, most colonies were similar in the structure of their governments. In nearly every colony, a governor appointed by the Crown served as the highest authority. The governor presided over an advisory council, usually appointed by the governor, and a local assembly elected by landowning white males. The governor had the authority to appoint and dismiss judges and oversee colonial trade. In addition to raising money through taxes, the colonial assembly initiated and passed laws. The governor could veto any law but did so at a risk—because in most colonies the colonial assembly, not the Crown, paid the governor's salary. Using this power of the purse liberally, the colonists influenced the governor in a variety of ways, from the approval of laws to the appointment of judges.
GROWING SPIRIT OF SELF-DETERMINATION
The colonies were developing a taste for self-government that would ultimately create the conditions for rebellion. Nehemiah Grew, a British mercantilist, voiced one of the few early concerns when he warned his compatriots about the colonies' growing self-determination in 1707. MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
What effects did the Navigation Acts have on both Britain and its colonies?
A
Personal Voice nehemiah grew “The time may come . . . when the colonies may become populous and with the increase of arts and sciences strong and politic, forgetting their relation to the mother countries, will then confederate and consider nothing further than the means to support their ambition of standing on their [own] legs. ”
—quoted in The Colonial Period of American History
Aside from a desire for more economic and political breathing room, however, the colonies had little in common that would unite them against Britain. In particular, the Northern and Southern colonies were developing distinct societies, based on sharply contrasting economic systems.

ASSESSMENT
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
John Smith Jamestown joint-stock companies
•indentured servant
•Puritan
•John Winthrop
•King Philip's War •William Penn •Quaker
•mercantilism •Navigation Acts
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Identify the effects of each of the causes listed in the chart below.
Cause	Effect
Virginia colonists need labor to grow tobacco	
Puritans are persecuted in England	
William Penn acquires Pennsylvania	
Parliament passes the Navigation Acts	
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	EVALUATING
In your judgment, what were the benefits and drawbacks of using indentured servants for labor in Virginia? Support your judgment with references to the text. Think About:
•	the labor demands of growing tobacco
•	the characteristics and cost of indentured servants
•	the causes and consequences of Bacon’s Rebellion
PREDICTING EFFECTS
Reread Nehemiah Grew’s prediction for the colonies in the Personal Voice above. How do you think the British government would respond to his prediction? What issues do you see arising as potential sources of tension between the colonies and Great Britain?
'Hapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
The Colonies Come of Age
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
j j Terms & Names Even though both Northern and Southern colonies prospered, many colonists began to question British authority.
Regional differences between Northern and Southern colonies have survived in the culture and politics of the modern United States.
•triangular trade •middle passage •Enlightenment •Benjamin Franklin •Great Awakening •Jonathan Edwards
•French and
Indian War
•William Pitt • Pontiac •Proclamation of 1763
--OneAmerican's Storyj^^^H
hmhsocialstudies.coml
■TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on developments in the colonies during the 18th century.
In 1773, Philip Vickers Fithian left his home in Princeton, New Jersey, for the unfamiliar world of Virginia. Fithian, a theology student, had agreed to tutor the children of Robert Carter III and his wife at their magnificent brick manor house. In Fithian's journal of his one-year stay there, he recalled an evening walk along the property.
A
Personal Voice philip vickers fithian “We stroll’d down the Pasture quite to the River, admlr-Ing the Pleasantness of the evening, & the delightsome Prospect of the River, Hills, Huts on the Summits, low Bottoms, Trees of various Kinds, and Sizes, Cattle & Sheep feeding some near us, & others at a great distance on the green sides of the Hills. ” —Journal & Letters of Philip Vickers Fithian
The Shirley plantation house in Virginia is representative of many old Southern mansions. Built in 1723, it was the birthplace of Ann Hili Carter, the mother of Civil War general Robert E. Lee.
Plantations, or large farms, like the Carters' played a dominant role in the South's economy, which had come to rely heavily on agriculture. The development of this plantation economy led to a largely rural society, in which enslaved Africans played an unwilling yet important role.
A
Plantation Economy Arises in the South While there were cities in the South, on the whole the region developed as a rural society of self-sufficient plantations. Plantations sprang up along the rivers, making it possible for planters to ship their goods directly to the Northern colonies and Europe without the need for public dock facilities. Because plantation owners produced much of what they needed on their property, they did not often need shops, bakeries, and markets.
Review Unit 31
Plantations specialized in raising a single cash crop—one grown primarily for sale rather than for livestock feed. In Maryland, Virginia, and North Carolina, planters grew tobacco. Planters in South Carolina and Georgia harvested rice and later indigo (for blue dye) as cash crops.
LIFE IN A DIVERSE SOUTHERN SOCIETY
In addition to English settlers, thousands of German immigrants as well as Scots and Scots-Irish settled in the South. Women in Southern society, as in the North, endured second-class citizenship. For the most part they could not vote, preach, or own property. While small farmers made up the majority of the Southern population, prosperous plantation owners controlled much of the South's economy as well as its political and social institutions.
At the bottom of Southern society were enslaved Africans. In the 18th century, Southerners turned increasingly to slavery to fill the labor needs of their agricultural economy. By 1690, about 13,000 slaves were working in the Southern colonies. By 1750, the number of slaves had increased to around 200,000.
THE MIDDLE PASSAGE
During the 17th century, Africans had become part of a transatlantic trading network described as the triangular trade. This term refers to a trading process in which goods and enslaved people were exchanged across the Atlantic Ocean. For example, merchants carrying rum and other goods from the New England colonies exchanged their merchandise for enslaved Africans. Africans were then transported to the West Indies where they were sold for sugar and molasses. These goods were then sold to rum producers in New England and the cycle began again. The voyage that brought Africans to the West Indies and later to North America was known as
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Describe the social structure of Southern society.
STOWAGE OF THE BRITISH SLAVE SHIP BROOKES UNDER THE REGULATED SLAVE TRADE
Attof uaa.




-r-r-

PLAN OF LOWER
OtCK WITH THE STOWAGE OF 294 SLAVES »F THESE SEIKO STOWED UNDER THE SHELVES AS SHEWN IN FIGURE S AFIOVRC J. 

SB
the middle passage,
after the middle leg of the transatlantic trade triangle. Extreme cruelty characterized this journey. In the ports of West Africa, European traders branded Africans for identification and packed them into the dark holds of large ships. On board a slave ship, Africans were beaten into submission and often fell victim to diseases that spread rapidly. Some committed suicide by jumping overboard. Nearly 13 percent of the Africans aboard each slave ship perished during the
| This plan and section of the British slave ship Brookes was published in London around 1790 by a leading British antislavery advocate named Thomas Clarkson. The image effectively conveys the degradation and inhumanity of the slave trade, which reduced human beings to the level of merchandise.
i* ^, ********^‘Tr**'*
h MtWINO THE aTmASt «FI» AOtHTtMAL SU»(( ROUflO THE WMM OR SIMS OF TMt LOWER OtCK ST MEAH& OF FLATFORME M SHELVE*
HE«AM«OFOALL«RH.,NAOH«RCH)™£OUTttSFOW,B0_«THt,H(WMAHO.K^T»WIHAFEOHLT*H«H>HTXF»«T,ZHT
OtTWCRK TMt .CAIM ANS AAR LU* UNDER THE BEAM* .



Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
brutal trip to the New World. One enslaved African, Olaudah Equiano, recalled the inhumane conditions on his trip from West Africa to the West Indies in 1762 when he was 12 years old.
A
Personal Voice olaudah equiano “ The closeness of the place and the heat of the climate, added to the number in the ship, which was so crowded that each had scarcely room to turn himself, almost suffocated us. This produced copious perspirations, so that the air soon became unfit for respiration from a variety of loathsome smells, and brought on a sickness among the slaves, of which many died. ...” —The Interesting Narrative of the Life of Olaudah Equiano
AFRICANS COPE IN THEIR NEW WORLD
Africans who survived the ocean voyage entered an extremely difficult life of bondage in North America. Probably 80 to 90 percent worked in the fields. The other 10 to 20 percent worked as domestic slaves or as artisans. Domestic slaves worked in the houses of their masters, MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
If 13 percent of the enslaved Africans died on the journey to America, why did the merchants treat them so badly?
MAIN IDEA
Drawing
Conclusions
Cj How did enslaved Africans maintain their sense of self esteem?
Vocabulary tallow: fat from livestock used to make candles and soap
Olaudah Equiano
cooking, cleaning, and helping to raise the master's children. Artisans developed skills as carpenters, blacksmiths, and bricklayers and were sometimes loaned out to the master's neighbors.
In the midst of the horrors of slavery, Africans developed a way of life based on their cultural heritage. They kept alive their musical, dance, and storytelling traditions. When a slave owner sold a parent to another plantation, other slaves stepped in to raise the children left behind.
Slaves also resisted their position of subservience. Throughout the colonies, planters reported slaves faking illness, breaking tools, and staging work slowdowns. A number of slaves tried to run away, even though escape attempts brought severe punishment.
Some slaves even pushed their resistance to open revolt. One uprising, the Stono Rebellion, began on a September Sunday in 1739. That morning, about 20 slaves gathered at the Stono River just south of Charles Town (later Charleston), South Carolina. Wielding guns and other weapons, they killed several planter families and marched south, beating drums and inviting other slaves to join them in their plan to flee to Spanish-held Florida. Many slaves died in the fighting that followed. Those captured were executed. Despite the rebellion's failure, it sent a chill through many Southern colonists and led to the tightening of harsh slave laws already in place.
Commerce Grows in the North
The development of thriving commercial cities and diverse economic activities gradually made the North radically different from the South. Grinding wheat, harvesting fish, and sawing lumber became thriving industries. By the 1770s, the colonists had built one-third of all British ships and were producing more iron than England did. Many colonists prospered. In particular, the number of merchants grew. By the mid-1700s, merchants were one of the most powerful groups in the North. In contrast to the South, where Charles Town was the only major port, the North boasted Boston, New York, and Philadelphia.
COLONIAL CITIES AND TRADE
The expansion of trade caused port cities to grow. Philadelphia became the second largest port in the British empire, after London. Toward the end of the 1700s, Yankee traders were sailing around Cape Horn at the tip of South America to trade with Spanish missionaries as far away as California. There they exchanged manufactured goods for hides, tallow, wine, olive oil, and grain raised with the help of the Native American labor on the missions. Review Unit 33
Daily Urban Life in Colonial Times
By the mid-18th century, colonial cities were prosperous and growing. Brick rowhouses were replacing the wooden structures of the 17th century, while large mansions and churches, built of brick or stone, were rising everywhere.
English colonists had brought with them a preference for houses (as opposed to apartments, which were the norm in the cities of other European countries). As in Britain, the size of the house indicated the social position of its occupant.
In contemporary Philadelphia, Elfreth’s Alley preserves the scale and appearance of a mid-18th-century city street. Narrow rowhouses like these were occupied by artisans and shopkeepers. A neighborhood like this could have commercial and residential uses. Many people lived above the shops where they worked.
◄ The house known as Cliveden, also in Philadelphia, was completed in 1767. In contrast to the artisan or lower-middle-class housing of Elfreth’s Alley, this large freestanding mansion shows the kind of building that the rich could afford.
The Northern colonies attracted a variety of immigrants. During the 18th century about 463,000 Europeans migrated to America. Before 1700, most immigrants came as indentured servants from England, but by 1755, over one-half of all European immigrants were from other countries. They included large numbers of Germans and Scots-Irish. Other ethnic groups included the Dutch in New York, Scandinavians in Delaware, and Jews in such cities as Newport and Philadelphia.
FARMING IN THE NORTH
Unlike Southern plantations, a farm in New England and the middle colonies typically produced several cash crops rather than a single one. Because growing wheat and corn did not require as much labor as did growing tobacco and rice, Northerners had less need to rely on slave labor. However, slavery did exist in New England and was extensive throughout the middle colonies, as was racial prejudice against blacks—free or enslaved. As in the South, women in the North had extensive work responsibilities but few legal or social rights. The Enlightenment
During the 1700s, the Enlightenment, an intellectual movement that began in Europe, and the Great Awakening, a colonial religious movement, influenced people's thinking throughout the thirteen colonies.
EUROPEAN IDEAS INSPIRE THE COLONISTS
During the Renaissance in Europe, scientists had begun looking beyond religious beliefs and traditional assumptions for answers about how the world worked. Careful observation and reason, or rational thought, led to the discovery of some of the natural laws and principles governing the world and human behavior. The work of Nicolaus Copernicus, Galileo Galilei, and Sir Isaac Newton established that the earth Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
BMAINI IE>EA
Analyzing
Effects
What effects did the Enlightenment have on political thought in the colonies?
Vocabulary revival: a time of reawakened interest in religion
revolved around the sun and not vice versa. This observation, which challenged the traditional assumption that the earth was the center of the universe, was at first fiercely resisted. It was thought to contradict the Bible and other religious teachings. The early scientists also concluded that the world is governed by fixed mathematical laws rather than solely by the will of God. These ideas about nature led to a movement called the Enlightenment, in which philosophers valued reason and scientific methods.
Enlightenment ideas spread from Europe to the colonies, where people such as Benjamin Franklin embraced the notion of obtaining truth through experimentation and reason. For example, Franklin's most famous experiment—flying a kite in a thunderstorm—demonstrated that lightning is a form of electrical power.
Enlightenment ideas spread quickly through the colonies by means of books and pamphlets. Literacy was particularly high in New England because the Puritans had long supported public education, partly to make it possible for everyone to read the Bible. However, Enlightenment views were disturbing to some people. The Enlightenment suggested that people could use science and logic—rather than the pronouncements of church authorities—to arrive at truths. As the English poet John Donne had written, "[The] new philosophy calls all in doubt."
The Enlightenment also had a profound effect on political thought in the colonies. Colonial leaders such as Thomas Jefferson reasoned that human beings are born with natural rights that governments must respect. Enlightenment principles eventually would lead many colonists to question the authority of the British monarchy.
lAK
HISTORY
VIDEO
Did You Know: Ben Franklin
I hmhsocialstudies.com!
The Great Awakening
By the early 1700s, the Puritans had lost some of their influence. Under the new Massachusetts charter of 1691, Puritans were required to practice religious tolerance and could no longer limit voting privileges to members of their own church. Furthermore, as Puritan merchants prospered, they developed a taste for fine houses, stylish clothes, and good food and wine. As a result, their interest in maintaining the strict Puritan code declined. A series of religious revivals aimed at restoring the intensity and dedication of the early Puritan church swept through the colonies. These came to be known collectively as the Great Awakening.
The British minister George Whitefield was a major force behind the Great Awakening. In his seven journeys to the American colonies between 1738 and 1769, Whitefield preached dramatic sermons that brought many listeners to tears.

Review Unit 35
1*
KEY PLAYERS
BENJAMIN FRANKLIN 1706-1790
A true student of the Enlightenment, Benjamin Franklin devised an orderly method to develop moral perfection in himself. In his autobiography, he records how he decided on a list of virtues he thought he should have.
Then, every night, he reviewed whether his behavior lived up to those standards and recorded his faults in a notebook.
Originally, he concentrated on only 12 virtues until a Quaker friend told him he was too proud. Franklin promptly added a 13th virtue to the list—the virtue of humility, which he felt he never quite achieved.
Franklin took great pleasure in seeing his character improve. He wrote: “I was surpris’d to find myself so much fuller of faults than I had imagined; but I had the satisfaction of seeing them diminish.”
JONATHAN EDWARDS 1703-1758
Unlike Benjamin Franklin, Jonathan Edwards did not believe that humans had the power to perfect themselves. Descended from a long line of Puritan ministers, he believed that “however you may have reformed your life in many things,” all were sinners who were destined for hell unless they had a “great change of heart.”
Edwards was a brilliant thinker who entered Yale College when he was only 13. His preaching was one of the driving forces of the Great Awakening. Ironically, when the religious revival died down, Edwards’s own congregation rejected him for being too strict about doctrine. Edwards moved to Stockbridge, Massachusetts, in 1751, where he lived most of his remaining years as a missionary to a Native American settlement.
RELIGIOUS REVIVALS
Among those clergy who sought to revive the fervor of the original Puritan vision was Jonathan Edwards, of Northampton, Massachusetts. One of the most learned religious scholars of his time, Edwards preached that it was not enough for people simply to come to church. In order to be saved, they must feel their sinfulness and feel God's love for them. In his most famous sermon, delivered in 1741, Edwards vividly described God's mercy toward sinners. A
Personal Voice JONATHAN EDWARDS
“The God that holds you over the pit of Hell, much as one holds a spider, or some loathsome insect over the fire, abhors [hates] you, and is dreadfully provoked: His wrath towards you burns like fire;
He looks upon you as worthy of nothing else but to be cast into the fire . . . and yet it is nothing but His hand that holds you from falling into
the fire every moment. ”
—“Sinners in the Hands of an Angry God”
While the Great Awakening, which lasted throughout the 1730s and 1750s, restored many colonists' Christian religious faith, the movement also challenged the authority of established churches. Preachers trav-
eled from village to village, attracting thousands to outdoor revival meetings, giving impassioned sermons, and stirring people to rededicate themselves to God. Some colonists abandoned their old Puritan or Anglican congregations, while independent denominations, such as the Baptists and Methodists, gained new members.
EFFECTS OF THE GREAT AWAKENING AND ENLIGHTENMENT
Although the Great Awakening emphasized emotionalism and the Enlightenment emphasized reason, the two movements had similar consequences. Both caused people to question traditional authority. Moreover, both stressed the importance of the individual: the Enlightenment by emphasizing human reason, and the Great Awakening by de-emphasizing the role of church authority. Because these movements helped lead the colonists to question Britain's authority over their lives, they were important in creating the intellectual and social atmosphere that eventually led to the American Revolution. MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
& What effects did the Great Awakening have on organized religion in the colonies?
iapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
Background
Hats made from beaver skin were popular in Europe beginning in the late 16th century. Because of the demand for beaver, the fur trade was enormously successful.
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
@ How was the French colony in North America unlike the British colonies?
The french and Indian War
-««^«»««am««sa«w«»«(«aww«wiiBMBwaweaB««ewaMiK9wwssa9SW!®R«!!as!#3BB
As the French empire in North America expanded, it collided with the growing British empire. During the late 17th and first half of the 18th centuries, France and Great Britain had fought three inconclusive wars. Each war had begun in Europe but spread to their overseas colonies. In 1754, after six relatively peaceful years, the French-British conflict reignited. This conflict is known as the French and Indian War.
RIVALS FOR AN EMPIRE
From the start the French colony in North America, called New France, differed from the British colonies. Typical French colonists were young, single men who engaged in the fur trade and Catholic priests who sought to convert Native Americans. The French were more interested in exploiting their territories than in settling them. However, they usually enjoyed better relations with Native Americans, in part because they needed the local people as partners in the fur trade. In fact, several military alliances developed out of the French-Native American trade relationship. JF) WAR ERUPTS
One major area of contention between France and Great Britain was the rich Ohio River valley just west of Pennsylvania and Virginia. In 1754, the French built Fort Duquesne in the region despite the fact that the Virginia government had already granted 200,000 acres of land in the Ohio country to a group of wealthy planters. In response, the Virginia governor sent militia, a group of ordinary citizens who performed military duties, to evict the French. This was the opening of the French and Indian War, the fourth war between Great Britain and France for control of North America. In the first battle of the war, the French delivered a crushing defeat to the outnumbered Virginians and their leader, an ambitious 22-year-old officer named George Washington.
A year after his defeat, Washington again headed into battle, this time as an aide to the British general Edward Braddock. Braddock's first task was to relaunch an attack on Fort Duquesne. As Braddock and nearly 1,500 soldiers neared the fort, French soldiers and their Native American allies ambushed them. The startled British soldiers turned and fled.

In this scene from the French and Indian War, the British general Edward Braddock meets defeat and death on his march to Fort Duquesne in July of 1755.




I
European Claims in North America
mm ■ A 1WVV I IL7VV I I llg)l IL LI l\> Ls/\|UC<I IOIL7i I VI
the British Empire have affected its relationship with the colonies?
The weakness of the British army surprised Washington, who showed great courage. As Washington tried to rally the troops, two horses were shot from under him and four bullets pierced his coat—yet he escaped unharmed. Many other colonists began to question the competence of the British army, which suffered defeat after defeat during 1755 and 1756.
BRITAIN DEFEATS AN OLD ENEMY
Angered by French victories, Britain's King George II selected new leaders to run his government in 1757. One of these was William Pitt the elder, an energetic, self-confident politician. Under Pitt, the British and colonial troops finally began winning battles. These successes earned Britain the support of the powerful Iroquois, giving Britain some Native American allies to counterbalance those of France. In September 1759, the war took a dramatic and decisive turn on the Plains of Abraham just outside Quebec. Under cover of night, British troops scaled the high cliffs that protected the city and defeated the French in a surprise attack. The British triumph at Quebec brought them victory in the war.
The war officially ended in 1763 with the signing of the Treaty of Paris. Great Britain claimed Canada and virtually all of North America east of the Mississippi River. Britain also took Florida from Spain, which had allied itself with France. The treaty permitted Spain to keep possession of its lands west of the Mississippi and the city of New Orleans, which it had gained from France in 1762. France retained control of only a few islands and small colonies near Newfoundland, in the West Indies, and elsewhere.
38 Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
How did Great Britain’s victory over France affect Native Americans?
CHANGES FOR NATIVE AMERICANS
Others who lost ground in the war were the Native Americans, who found the victorious British harder to bargain with than the French had been. Native Americans resented the growing number of British settlers crossing the Appalachian Mountains and feared the settlers would soon drive away the game they depended on for survival. In the spring of 1763, the Ottawa leader Pontiac recognized that the French loss was a loss for Native Americans. A
Personal Voice pontiac “When I go to see the English commander and say to him that some of our comrades are dead, instead of bewailing their death, as our French brothers do, he laughs at me and at you. If I ask for anything for our sick, he refuses with the reply that he has no use for us. For all this you can well see that they are seeking our ruin. Therefore, my brothers, we must all swear their destruction and wait no longer. ”
—quoted in Red and White
Led by Pontiac, Native Americans captured eight British forts in the Ohio Valley and the Great Lakes area and laid siege to another. In response, British officers deliberately presented blankets contaminated with smallpox to two Delaware chiefs during peace negotiations, and the virus spread rapidly among the Native Americans. Weakened by disease and tired of fighting, most Native American groups negotiated treaties with the British by the summer of 1766.
To avoid further costly conflicts with Native Americans, the British government prohibited colonists from settling west of the Appalachian Mountains. The Proclamation of 1763 established a Proclamation Line along the Appalachians, which the colonists were not allowed to cross. However, the colonists, eager to expand westward from the increasingly crowded Atlantic seaboard, ignored the proclamation and continued to stream onto Native American lands.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its signficance. •triangular trade	•Benjamin Franklin	• French and Indian War
•middle passage	• Great Awakening	•William Pitt
• Enlightenment	• Jonathan Edwards
•	Pontiac
•	Proclamation of 1763
i
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Re-create the tree diagram below. Fill in the diagram to show developments that took place in the colonies during the 18th century.
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING CAUSES
Why did the plantation system come to play such an important role in the Southern economy?
4.	SUMMARIZING
How did the Enlightenment affect the colonies?
ANALYZING PRIMARY SOURCES
Read the following quotation, written in 1774 by the African-American poet, Phillis Wheatley. How does the quotation express both religious belief and Enlightenment thought?
ANALYZING ISSUES
In what ways was slavery a brutal system? Support your statement with examples from the text. Think About:
•	how people were taken from Africa
•	the working conditions of enslaved people
•	the attitudes toward enslaved people
Which events or developments helped prepare the colonies for independence?
“For in every human breast God has implanted a principle, which we call love of freedom.”
Review Unit 39
DAILY LIFE
(1630-1763) Colonial Courtship
The concept of dating among teenagers was nonexistent in colonial times. Young people were considered either children or adults, and as important as marriage was in the colonies, sweethearts were older than one might suspect. The practices of courtship and marriage varied among the different communities.




FRONTIER OR BACKCOUNTRY PEOPLE
Andrew Jackson, depicted with his wife in the painting below, “stole” his wife (she was willing) from her family. Jackson was following a custom of the backcountry people, who lived along the western edge of the colonies.
These colonists, mostly Scots-Irish, based their marriages on the old custom of “abduction”—stealing the bride—often with her consent. Even regular marriages began with the groom and his friends coming to “steal” the bride. Much drinking and dancing accompanied these wild and hilarious weddings.
QUAKERS
Quaker couples intent on marrying needed the consent not only of the parents but also of the whole Quaker community. Quakers who wanted to marry had to go through a 16-step courtship phase before they could wed. Quaker women, however, were known to reject men at the last minute.








is®
PURITANS
For Puritans, marriage was a civil contract, not a religious or sacred union. Although adults strictly supervised a couple’s courting, parents allowed two unusual practices. One was the use of a courting stick, a long tube into which the couple could whisper while the family was in another room. The other was the practice of “bundling”: a young man spent the night in the same bed as his sweetheart, with a large bundling board (shown above) between them.
Before marrying, the couple had to allow for Puritan leaders to voice any objections to the marriage at the meeting house. Passing that, the couple would marry in a very simple civil ceremony and share a quiet dinner.
Chapter 1
DATA
FILE
WHO MARRIED?
Puritans:
•	98% of males and 94% of females married
•	Grooms were usually a few years older than brides
•	Discouraged marriages between first cousins
Virginians:
•	25% of males never married; most females married
•	Grooms nearly 10 years older than brides
•	Allowed first-cousin marriages
Quakers:
•	16% of women single at age 50
•	forbade first-cousin marriages
THE SOUTH
Many African slaves married in a “jumping the broomstick” ceremony, in which the bride and groom jumped over a broomstick to seal their union. Although there is disagreement among African-American scholars, some suggest that the above painting depicts a slave wedding on a South Carolina plantation in the late 1700s.
Frontier People:
•	Almost all women and most men married
•	Ages of bride and groom about the same
•	Youngest group to marry

VIRGINIA
In Virginia, marriage was a sacred union. Since the marriage often involved a union of properties, and love was not necessary, parents were heavily involved in the negotiations. In this illustration from a dance manual (above), a young upper-class couple work to improve their social graces by practicing an elaborate dance step.
Average Age at Marriage
Group	Males	Females
Puritan	26	23
Virginians	26	19
Quakers in Delaware	31	29
in Penn. & N.J.	26	22
Philadelphians	26	23
Frontier People	21	19
Modern Americans	27	25
i
Review Unit 41
REVIEW
CHAPTER
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its connection to exploration and the colonial era.
1.	nomadic
2.	Reformation
3.	Christopher Columbus
4.	Columbian Exchange
5.	indentured servant
6.	Puritan
7.	Navigation Acts
8.	triangular trade
9.	Enlightenment 10. French and
Indian War
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
The Americas, West Africa, and Europe
(pages 4-13)
1.	What effects did Portuguese trade routes have on West Africa?
2.	In what ways did Renaissance ideas and attitudes inspire and motivate European explorers?
Spanish North America (pages 14-20)
3.	What impact did the Columbian Exchange have on people’s lives throughout the world?
4.	Why did the Spanish want to colonize the Americas?
Early British Colonies (pages 21-30)
5.	How did the goals of the Jamestown colonists differ from those of the Puritan colonists in Massachusetts?
6.	Why did the English Parliament pass the Navigation Acts? What effects did they have?
The Colonies Come of Age (pages 31-39)
7.	How did immigration contribute to the ethnic diversity of the American colonies after 1700?
8.	How did the differences between the Northern and Southern economies lead to the development of two distinct cultural regions?
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one shown, compare and contrast Spanish and British colonial policies toward Native Americans. Colonial Policies Toward Native Americans	
Spanish	British
	
DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
What were some of the cultural characteristics of the ancient civilizations that flourished in the Americas? INTERPRETING MAPS
Look at the map on page 29. Compare the economic activities of the three regions of British colonies in the Americas—New England, Middle, and Southern. 42 Chapter 1 Exploration and the Colonial Era

TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the cartoon below and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
Benjamin Franklin drew and published this cartoon in 1754, soon after the start of the French and Indian War. The cartoon depicts a snake divided into eight parts representing the eight colonies at the time. What message did Franklin intend?
A
The colonies have been broken apart by the war. B
The colonies should unite to protect themselves from the French and the Native Americans. C
The colonies should join with the French to protect themselves from the Native Americans. D
The colonies should unite to declare independence from Britain. 2.	Anne Hutchinson was banished from
Massachusetts because she taught that —
F colonists should remain loyal to the English king.
G individuals could interpret the Bible for themselves.
H the colonists should not trade with local Native Americans.
J the Puritans should break away from the Church of England.
3,	In the 1700s an intellectual movement known as the Enlightenment developed in Europe and spread to the colonies. Benjamin Franklin and Thomas Jefferson were among those colonists heavily influenced by Enlightenment ideas. In which of the following ways did the Enlightenment affect the colonists?
A
Enlightenment ideas led people to expand the trade in enslaved persons. B
Enlightenment ideas stirred people to rededicate themselves to God. C
Enlightenment ideas persuaded people to establish colonies in order to generate a favorable balance of trade. D
Enlightenment ideas convinced people of the importance of civil rights. 71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests •Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
"^WriteSmart COLLABORATIVE LEARNI

Think about the issues you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Now that you know how Native Americans’ way of life was changed by the arrival of the Europeans, form small groups and discuss the following question: Would you have resisted or helped the Europeans if you had been a Native American during the days of European colonization? Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write a paragraph summarizing your group’s discussion.
Working in small groups, do library or
Internet research to learn more about the history of one of the 13 colonies. Create an exhibit documenting the first 100 years of the colony’s development. Find images and write text to highlight key events and important people in the early history of the colony.
mvWriteSmart
You have been living in the Massachusetts Bay Colony for nearly a year. You have been asked by leaders of the colony to write an advertisement that will persuade new settlers to come to Massachusetts. Focus your advertisement on the advantages of living in the Massachusetts Bay Colony. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your advertisement.
Review Unit 43

End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Using Academic and
Social Studies Vocabulary
DEFINING THE SKILL
Within this textbook, there are two main types of words. The first, academic words, includes words that are important in all classes, not just in social studies. These are words that your teacher may use during classroom instruction, such as interpret or distribute.
A second type, social studies words, include words and phrases you will see as you read social studies materials. Words like civilization, century, and democracy are considered social studies words and are used primarily to describe social studies content.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: IDENTIFY AND USE SOCIAL STUDIES TERMS
To identify the social studies terms, locate boldface terms and other key terms that explain the historical content. This excerpt is about life in the early American colonies. Read the strategies to learn how to identify and use social studies terms in a historical context. Life in the Early American Colonies
Slavery existed in all the colonies, but it became a vital source of labor in the South.© During the 1600s, enslaved Africans were brought to North America through a network of transatlantic trade ©also known as the©triangular trade. ©Through this ©trading network, goods and enslaved Africans were exchanged between three points—England, its colonies, and Africa.
By contrast, the New England and middle colonies did not rely on slave labor or the production of a single© commodity, also© called a single staple crop, such as tobacco or rice. Most people were farmers, but they grew a wide variety of crops.The New England colonies traded actively with the islands of the West Indies. In addition to foods, they ©ex ported all kinds of other items, ranging from barrels to horses. In return, they©imported sugar and molasses. All this trade resulted in the growth of small towns and larger port cities.
© Identify academic and social studies words. Look for terms that are in boldface print or are defined in the margin. Sometimes, specialized academic or social studies words are highlighted.
© Ask questions to understand what each term means. Reread text to understand the meaning of each term. Look for words that indicate a definition or key term is approaching. Often terms such as called and known as indicate that a definition is coming up. In this case, single staple crop is a definition of single commodity.
© Read the surrounding text to further clarify meaning. Why was the transatlantic trade called the triangular trade?
© Think about what you know about the time frame or ideas being discussed. Use your prior knowledge to put the idea into context. What do you already know about slavery in the colonies in the 1600s and 1700s?
© Consider the topic at hand. What words help convey the topic? This alerts you to their relevance to the topic and helps you better understand the historical concept being discussed. What is a trading network?
43 SKI
STRATEGY: MAKE A DIAGRAM
Making a diagram can help you to understand the vocabulary terms that you will encounter throughout the text. Sometimes, your own background knowledge or the use of context clues may not be enough to determine what a word means. In that case, ask a teacher or classmate to help you develop your background knowledge so that you can understand the definition of the word. You may also look the word up in a dictionary to find the actual definition. APPLYING THE SKILL
Turn to page 28 in your book and read the section titled "Mercantilism and the Navigation Acts." Choose one of the unfamiliar vocabulary terms that you encounter in this section and use a diagram to help you understand it.
1.	Identify academic and social studies words.
What social studies terms can you find in the text and in the margin?
You may recognize a term from seeing it in the section opener. What is mercantilism?
2.	Ask questions to understand what each term means.
What does mercantalism mean? What terms and grammatical marks help you know what it means? Why did colonies play a critical role in mercantilism?
3.	Read the surrounding text to help further clarify meaning.
Which sentence helps you better understand what the theory of mercantilism entails? How does reading this help your understanding of the term?
4.	Think about what you know about the time frame or ideas being discussed.
Use your prior knowledge to help put the term or idea into context. What do you already know about how and when the colonies in North America were established?
5.	Consider the topic at hand.
What words help convey the concept of economic growth and expansion. How does knowing the topic of economics help your understanding of this section?
43 SK2
HISTORY
The Maya developed one of the most advanced civilizations in the Americas, but their story is shrouded in mystery.
Around a.d. 250, the Maya began to build great cities in southern Mexico and Central America. They developed a writing system, practiced astronomy, and built magnificent palaces and pyramids with little more than stone tools. Around a.d. 900, however, the Maya abandoned their cities, leaving their monuments to be reclaimed by the jungle and, for a time, forgotten.
Explore some of the incredible monuments and cultural achievements of the ancient Maya online. You can find a wealth of information, video clips, primary sources, and more at

Watch the video to learn how the actions of one Spanish missionary nearly destroyed the written record of the Maya world.
"Thus let it he done! Let the emptiness he filled! Let the water recede and make a void, let the earth appear and become solid; let it he done ... "Earth!" they said, and instantly it was made."
Finding the City of Palenque
Watch the video to learn about the great Maya city of Palenque and the European discovery of the site in the eighteenth century.
'VST, •'


Essential Question
myNotebook
What were the causes and major events of the American Revolution, and how did the new American republic develop?
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
A, 1C, 21B, 23A, 23C, 26E, 26F, 29C
SECTION 1: Colonial Resistance and Rebellion
Main Idea Conflicts between Great Britain and the American colonies escalated, until the colonists finally declared their independence.
SECTION 2: The War for Independence
Main Idea Key American victories reversed British advances during the American Revolutionary War.
SECTION 3: Confederation and the Constitution
Main Idea American leaders created the Constitution as a blueprint of government for the United States.
SECTION 4: Launching the New Nation
Main Idea With George Washington as its first president, the United States began creating a working government for its new nation.

The Sons of Liberty pull down a statue of George III on the Bowling Green, New York, July 9,1776.
USA
WORLD
1760 George 111 becomes king of Great Britain.
[17651 British Parliament passes the Stamp Act.
1765
1773 Colonists stage the Boston Tea Party.
• 1774 Parliament : passes the Intolerable : Acts. First Continental : Congress convenes.
1774 Reign of Louis XVI begins in France.
1775
Second
Continental
Congress
convenes.
1776 Colonies declare independence.
1775
1776 Adam Smith’s The Wealth of Nations Is published.

44 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
...................

UICTADV
The Declaration Of HISTORY
Independence El
7\ hmhsocialstudies.com
VIDEO
The year is 1787. You have recently helped your fellow patriots overthrow decades of oppressive British rule. However, it is easier to destroy an old system of government than to create a new one. In a world of kings and tyrants, your new republic struggles to find its place. As you read the chapter and explore the issues below, use the annotation tools in your eBook to record your thoughts.
Explore the Issues
•	Which should have more power, the states or the national government?
•	How can the new nation avoid a return to tyranny?
•	How can the rights of all people be protected?
1781
The British surrender at Yorktown.
1786 Daniel Shays leads a rebellion against higher taxes.
1788 The Constitution is ratified.
:; i?831
; WasbihgtOf; : is elected : president
117921 George Washington is reelected.
'	’ -J

: 1781 Joseph II	: 1785 British
: allows religious	: preacher Edmund
• toleration in	: Cartwright invents
: Austria.	: the first power
	: loom.
1787 Sierra Leone in Africa is made a haven for freed American slaves.
; 1789 ; The : French : Revolution : starts.
1793 French king Louis XVI is executed.
Review Unit 45
Colonial Resistance and Rebellion
MAIN IDEA I [ WHY IT MATTERS NOW |
j~ Terms & Names Conflicts between Great Britain and the American colonies escalated, until the colonists finally declared their independence.
The ideas put forth by the colonists in the Declaration of Independence remain the guiding principles of the United States today.
•King George III	’John Locke
• Sugar Act	• Common Sense
•Stamp Act	•Thomas Jefferson
•Samuel Adams	•Declaration of
•Boston Massacre Independence •Boston Tea Party
^^^^^^^^POneAmerican's Story■
hmhsocialstudies.com!
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the major events of the conflict between Great Britain and the American colonies.
Crispus Attucks was a sailor of African and Native-American ancestry. On the night of March 5, 1770, he was part of a large and angry crowd that had gathered at the Boston Customs House to harass the British soldiers stationed there. More soldiers soon arrived, and the mob began hurling stones and snowballs at them. Attucks then stepped forward.
A
Personal Voice John adams “ This Attucks ... appears to have undertaken to be the hero of the night; and to lead this army with banners ... up to King street with their clubs .... This man with his party cried, ‘Do not be afraid of them,’ . .. He had hardiness enough to fall in upon them, and with one hand took hold of a bayonet, and with the other knocked the man down. ”
—quoted in The Black Presence in the Era of the American Revolution
▲
Crispus Attucks
Attucks's action ignited the troops. Ignoring orders not to shoot civilians, one soldier and then others fired on the crowd. Five people were killed; several were wounded. Crispus Attucks was, according to a newspaper account, the first to die.
The Colonies Organize to Resist Britain
Because the Proclamation of 1763 sought to halt expansion by the colonists west of the Appalachian Mountains, it convinced the colonists that the British government did not care about their needs. A second result of the French and Indian War—Britain's financial crisis—brought about new laws that reinforced the colonists' opinion.
THE SUGAR ACT
Great Britain had borrowed so much money during the war that it nearly doubled its national debt. King George III, who had succeeded his grandfather in 1760, hoped to lower that debt. To do so, in 1763 the king chose a financial expert, George Grenville, to serve as prime minister. Revolution and the Early Republic
Chapter 2
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
How did the Sugar Act cause tension between the colonists and Britain?
j MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
JBj How did the colonists respond to the Stamp Act and the
Townshend Acts?
By the time Grenville took over, tensions between Britain and one colony, Massachusetts, were on the rise.
During the French and Indian War, the British had cracked down on colonial smuggling to ensure that merchants were not doing business in any French-held territories. In 1761, the royal governor of Massachusetts authorized the use of the writs of assistance, a general search warrant that allowed British customs officials to search any colonial ship or building they believed to be holding smuggled goods. Because many merchants worked out of their residences, the writs enabled British officials to enter and search colonial homes whether there was evidence of smuggling or not. The merchants of Boston were outraged.
Grenville's actions, however, soon angered merchants throughout the colonies. The new prime minister noticed that the American customs service, which collected duties, or taxes on imports, was losing money. Grenville concluded that the colonists were smuggling goods into the country without paying duties. In 1764 he prompted Parliament to enact a law known as the Sugar Act.
The Sugar Act did three things. It halved the duty on foreign-made molasses in the hopes that colonists would pay a lower tax rather than risk arrest by smuggling. It placed duties on certain imports that had not been taxed before.
Most important, it provided that colonists accused of violating the act would be tried in a vice-admiralty court rather than a colonial court. There, each case would be decided by a single judge rather than by a jury of sympathetic colonists.
Colonial merchants complained that the Sugar Act would reduce their profits. Merchants and traders further claimed that Parliament had no right to tax the colonists because the colonists had not elected representatives to the body. The new regulations, however, had little effect on colonists besides merchants and traders.
THE STAMP ACT
In March 1765 Parliament passed the Stamp Act. This act imposed a tax on documents and printed items such as wills, newspapers, and playing cards. A stamp would be placed on the items to prove that the tax had been paid. It was the first tax that affected colonists directly because it was levied on goods and services. Previous taxes had been indirect, involving duties on imports. In May of 1765, the colonists united to defy the law. Boston shopkeepers, artisans, and laborers organized a secret resistance group called the Sons of Liberty to protest the law. Meanwhile, the colonial assemblies declared that Parliament lacked the power to impose taxes on the colonies because the colonists were not represented in Parliament. In October 1765, merchants in New York, Boston, and Philadelphia agreed to a boycott of British goods until the Stamp Act was repealed. The widespread boycott worked, and in March 1766 Parliament repealed the law.
But on the same day that it repealed the Stamp Act, Parliament passed the Declaratory Act, which asserted Parliament's full right "to bind the colonies and people of America in all cases whatsoever." Then, in 1767, Parliament passed the Townshend Acts, named after Charles Townshend, the leading government minister The Townshend Acts taxed goods that were imported into the colony from Britain, such as lead, glass, paint, and paper. The Acts also imposed a tax on tea, the most popular drink in the colonies. Led by men such as Samuel Adams, one of the founders of the Sons of Liberty, the colonists again boycotted British goods. E£>
SOW
THEjy PROPOSITION 13
A more recent tax revolt occurred in California on June 6,1978, when residents voted in a tax reform law known as Proposition 13. By the late 1970s, taxes in California were among the highest in the nation. The property tax alone was fifty-two percent above the national norm.
Proposition 13, initiated by ordinary citizens, limited the tax on real property to one percent of its assessed value in 1975-1976. It passed with sixty-five percent of the vote.
Because of the resulting loss of revenue, many state agencies were scaled down or cut. In 1984, California voters approved a state lottery that provides supplemental funds for education.
But Proposition 13 still remains a topic of heated debate, as Californians—like other Americans across the country-struggle with conflicting desires: more government services vs. less taxes.
Review Unit 47
British Actions and Colonial Reactions, 1765-1775
STAMP ACT
British Action Britain passes the Stamp Act, a tax law requiring colonists to purchase special stamps to prove payment of tax.
Colonial Reaction
Colonists harass stamp distributors, boycott British goods, and prepare a Declaration of Rights and Grievances.
TOWNSHEND ACTS
BOSTON MASSACRE
British Action
Britain taxes certain colonial imports and stations troops at major colonial ports to protect customs officers,
Colonial Reaction
Colonists protest “taxation without representation” and organize a new boycott of imported goods.
British Action
Taunted by an angry mob, British troops fire into the crowd, killing five colonists.
Colonial Reaction
Colonial agitators label the conflict a massacre and publish a dramatic engraving depicting the violence.
This colonial engraving was meant to warn of the effects of the Stamp Act.
Tension Mounts in Massachusetts
As hostilities between the colonists and the British mounted, the atmosphere in Boston grew increasingly tense. The city soon erupted in bloody clashes and later in a daring tax protest, all of which pushed the colonists and Britain closer to war.
VIOLENCE ERUPTS IN BOSTON
On March 5, 1770, a mob gathered in front of the Boston Customs House and taunted the British soldiers standing guard there. Shots were fired and five colonists, including Crispus Attucks, were killed or mortally wounded. Colonial leaders quickly labeled the confrontation the Boston Massacre.
Despite strong feelings on both sides, the political atmosphere relaxed somewhat during the next three years. Lord Frederick North, who later followed Grenville as the prime minister, realized that the Townshend Acts were costing more to enforce than they would ever bring in: in their first year, for example, the taxes raised only 295 pounds, while the cost of sending British troops to Boston
History Through
Background
Pounds are the basic monetary unit of British currency.
| Art}--------------------------
THE BOSTON MASSACRE
(1770) Paul Revere was not only a patriot, but a silversmith and an engraver as well. One of the best known of his engravings, depicting the Boston Massacre, is a masterful piece of anti-British propaganda. Widely circulated, Revere’s engraving played a key role in rallying revolutionary fervor.
•	The sign above the soldiers reads “Butcher’s Hall.”
•	The British commander, Captain Preston (standing at the far right of the engraving) appears to be inciting the troops to fire.
In fact, he tried to calm the situation.
•	At the center foreground is a small dog, a detail that gave credence to the rumor that, following the shootings, dogs licked the blood of the victims from the street.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Visual Sources 1.	According to the details of the engraving, what advantages do the soldiers have that the colonists do not? What point does the artist make through this contrast?
2.	What do you think is the intended message behind the artist’s use of smoke spreading out from the soldiers’ rifles?
48 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
H
TEA ACT
British Action Britain gives the East India Company special concessions in the colonial tea business and shuts out colonial tea merchants.
Colonial Reaction
Colonists in Boston rebel, dumping 18,000 pounds of East India Company tea into Boston harbor
INTOLERABLE ACTS
British Action
King George III tightens control over Massachusetts by closing Boston Harbor and quartering troops.
LEXINGTON AND CONCORD
Colonial Reaction
Colonial leaders form the First Continental Congress and draw up a declaration of colonial rights.
British Action
General Gage orders troops to march to Concord, Massachusetts, and seize colonial weapons.
Colonial Reaction
Minutemen intercept the British and engage in battle-first at Lexington, and then at Concord.
A
This bottle contains tea that
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Charts In what ways did colonial reaction to British rule intensify between 1765 and 1775?
was over 170,000 pounds. North persuaded Parliament to repeal the Townshend Acts, except for the tax on tea.
Tensions rose again in 1772 when a group of Rhode Island colonists attacked a British customs schooner that patrolled the coast for smugglers. The colonists boarded the vessel, which had accidentally run aground near Providence, and burned it to the waterline. In response, King George named a special commission to seek out the suspects and bring them to England for trial.
The plan to haul Americans to England for trial ignited widespread alarm. The assemblies of Massachusetts and Virginia set up committees of correspondence to communicate with other colonies about this and other threats to American liber-
ties. By 1774, such committees formed a buzzing communication network linking leaders in nearly all the colonies.
colonists threw into Boston harbor during the Boston Tea Party.
THE BOSTON TEA PARTY
In 1773, Lord North devised the Tea Act in order to save the nearly bankrupt British East India Company. The act granted the company the right to sell tea to the colonies free of the taxes that colonial tea sellers had to pay. This action would have cut colonial merchants out of the tea trade by enabling the East India Company to sell its tea directly to consumers for less. North hoped the American colonists would simply buy the cheaper tea; instead, they protested dramatically. On the moonlit evening of December 16, 1773, a large group of Boston rebels disguised themselves as Native Americans and proceeded to take action against three British tea ships anchored in the harbor. In this incident, later known as the Boston Tea Party, the "Indians" dumped 18,000 pounds of the East India Company's tea into the waters of Boston harbor.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
$ What do you think King George set out to achieve when he disciplined Massachusetts?
THE INTOLERABLE ACTS
An infuriated King George III pressed Parliament to act. In 1774, Parliament responded by passing a series of measures that colonists called the Intolerable Acts. One law shut down Boston harbor. Another, the Quartering Act, authorized British commanders to house soldiers in vacant private homes and other buildings. In addition to these measures, General Thomas Gage, commander-in-chief of British forces in North America, was appointed the new governor of Massachusetts. To keep the peace, he placed Boston under martial law, or rule imposed by military forces. In response to Britain's actions, the committees of correspondence assembled the First Continental Congress. In September 1774, 56 delegates met in Philadelphia and drew up a declaration of colonial rights. They defended the colonies' right to run their own affairs and stated that, if the British used force against the colonies, the colonies should fight back.
Review Unit 49
▲
The Battle of
Lexington, as depicted in a mid-nineteenth-century painting.
The Road to Revolution
After the First Continental Congress met, colonists in many eastern New England towns stepped up military preparations. Minutemen—civilian soldiers who pledged to be ready to fight against the British on a minute's notice—quietly stockpiled firearms and gunpowder. General Thomas Gage soon learned about these activities. In the spring of 1775, he ordered troops to march from Boston to nearby Concord, Massachusetts, and to seize illegal weapons.
FIGHTING AT LEXINGTON AND CONCORD
Colonists in Boston were watching, and on the night of April 18, 1775, Paul Revere, William Dawes, and Samuel Prescott rode out to spread word that 700 British troops were headed for Concord. The darkened countryside rang with church bells and gunshots—prearranged signals, sent from town to town, that the British were coming. The king's troops, known as "redcoats" because of their uniforms, reached Lexington, Massachusetts, five miles short of Concord, on the cold, windy dawn of April 19. As they neared the town, they saw 70 minutemen drawn up in lines on the village green. The British commander ordered the minutemen to lay down their arms and leave, and the colonists began to move out without laying down their muskets. Then someone fired, and the British soldiers sent a volley of shots into the departing militia. Eight minutemen were killed and ten more were wounded, but only one British soldier was injured. The Battle of Lexington, the first battle of the Revolutionary War, lasted only 15 minutes.
The British marched on to Concord, where they found an empty arsenal. After a brief skirmish with minutemen, the British soldiers lined up to march back to Boston, but the march quickly became a slaughter. Between 3,000 and 4,000 minutemen had assembled by now, and they fired on the marching troops from behind stone walls and trees. British soldiers fell by the dozen. Bloodied and humiliated, the remaining British soldiers made their way back to Boston that night. Colonists had become enemies of Britain and now held Boston and its encampment of British troops under siege.
MAIN IDEA
Evaluating
4© Do you think the British underestimated the colonists in 1770-1775?
50 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
Vocabulary reconciliation: the
restoration of a former state of harmony or friendship
MAIN IDEA
Developing
Historical
Perspective
Do you think that the Olive Branch Petition was too little too late?
THE SECOND CONTINENTAL CONGRESS
In May of 1775, colonial leaders called the Second Continental Congress in Philadelphia to debate their next move. The loyalties that divided colonists sparked endless debates at the Second Continental Congress. Some delegates called for independence, while others argued for reconciliation with Great Britain. Despite such differences, the Congress agreed to recognize the colonial militia as the Continental Army and appointed George Washington as its commander. THE BATTLE OF BUNKER HILL
Cooped up in Boston, British general Thomas Gage decided to strike at militiamen on Breed's Hill, north of the city and near Bunker Hill. On June 17, 1775, Gage sent 2,400 British soldiers up the hill. The colonists held their fire until the last minute and then began to mow down the advancing redcoats before finally retreating. By the time the smoke cleared, the colonists had lost 450 men, while the British had suffered over 1,000 casualties. The misnamed Battle of Bunker Hill would prove to be the deadliest battle of the war. By July, the Second Continental Congress was readying the colonies for war though still hoping for peace. Most of the delegates, like most colonists, felt deep loyalty to George III and blamed the bloodshed on the king's ministers. On July 8, Congress sent the king the so-called Olive Branch Petition, urging a return to "the former harmony" between Britain and the colonies,
King George flatly rejected the petition. Furthermore, he issued a proclamation stating that the colonies were in rebellion and urged Parliament to order a naval blockade to isolate a line of ships meant for the American coast.
Contributions of Select Founding Fathers	
Charles Carroll	Served as a delegate to the Continental Congress and signed the Declaration of Independence; helped to write Maryland’s Constitution of 1776; served in the U.S. Senate from 1789 to 1792
John Hancock	Served as president of the Continental Congress and became the first member to sign the Declaration of Independence; commissioned George Washington to lead the Continental Army; as governor, led Massachusetts to ratify the U.S. Constitution
John Peter Muhlenberg	Member of the Virginia House of Burgesses and the Pennsylvania Assembly; commissioned as a general in the Continental Army in 1777; elected to the U.S. Senate
Benjamin Rush	Author of an anti-slavery pamphlet; member of the Continental Congress and signer of the Declaration of Independence; served as surgeon-general of the Continental Army; appointed treasurer of the U.S. Mint in 1797
Jonathan Trumbull Sr.	As governor of the colony of Connecticut, sided with the colonists, the only governor of an English colony to do so; provided much-needed personnel and supplies for the Continental Army
John Witherspoon	A Presbyterian minister who moved to America to be the president of the College of New Jersey (later Princeton University) and became a social and religious leader; served as a delegate to the Continental Congress and signed the Declaration of Independence
SKILLBUILDER
Choose one indivic to lead the colonie ; Interpreting Charts jual from the chart above and explain how his contributions helped !S to independence and to develop the new democratic republic. j u
i!
Review Unit 51

Thomas Paine’s pamphlet Common Sense helped to overcome many colonists’ doubts about separating from Britain.
COMMON
T« TB.
^HABITANTS
A • M E R I C A,
Ob Uib followiog	'
SUB
1 w *•
3 5»
tfMMighd on A* parent Stitt. of Amuitu Afctn,, Of Af -pnftnt Ability at Astrin, witk (Saw aiif.

H »*»«", iaL,. ■	Ttiottto*/
IbADUPHU,
ti« Ijr M. BELL, fa TW-SmBt.
The Patriots Declare Independence
Despite the growing crisis, many colonists were uncertain about the idea of independence. Following the Olive Branch Petition, public opinion began to shift.
THE IDEAS BEHIND THE REVOLUTION
This shift in public opinion occurred in large part because of the Enlightenment ideas that had spread throughout the colonies in the 1760s and 1770s. One of the key Enlightenment thinkers was English philosopher John Locke. Locke maintained that people have natural rights to life, liberty, and property. Furthermore, he contended, every society is based on a social contract—an agreement in which the people consent to choose and obey a government so long as it safeguards their natural rights. If the government violates that social contract by taking away or interfering with those rights, people have the right to resist and even overthrow the government. Other influences on colonial leaders who favored independence were religious traditions that supported the cause of liberty. One preacher of the time, Jonathan Mayhew, wrote that he had learned from the holy scriptures that wise, brave, and virtuous men were always friends of liberty. Some ministers even spoke from their pulpits in favor of liberty.
Yet the ideas of limited government and civil rights had been basic to English law since even before a.d. 1215, when the English nobility had forced King John to sign Magna Carta, or the Great Charter. Magna Carta acknowledged certain specific rights of the barons against the king, including some rights to due process, a speedy trial, and trial by a jury of one's peers. Its main significance, though, was to recognize that the sovereign did not have absolute authority, but was subject like all men and women to the rule of law. This principle was reaffirmed by the English Bill of Rights, accepted by King William and Queen Mary in 1689. To the colonists, however, various Acts of Parliament between 1763 and 1775 had clearly violated their rights as Englishmen. In addition to due process, a speedy trial, and trial by a jury of one's peers, those rights included taxation only by consent of property owners, a presumption of innocence, no standing army in peacetime without consent, no quartering of troops in private homes, freedom of travel in peacetime, and the guarantee of regular legislative sessions.
THOMAS PAINE’S COMMON SENSE
Just as important were the ideas of Thomas Paine. In a widely read 50-page pamphlet titled Common Sense, Paine attacked King George and the monarchy. Paine, a recent immigrant, argued that responsibility for British tyranny lay with "the royal brute of Britain." Paine explained that his own revolt against the king had begun with Lexington and Concord. A
Personal Voice thomas paine “No man was a warmer wisher for a reconciliation than myself, before the fetal nineteenth of April, 1775, but the moment the event of that day was made known, I rejected the hardened, sullen tempered Pharaoh of England for ever... the wretch, that with the pretended title of Father of his people can unfeelingly hear of their slaughter, and composedly sleep with their blood upon his soul/5
—Common Sense
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
Why might the ideals of the Enlightenment appeal to the colonists?
Paine declared that independence would allow America to trade more freely. He also stated that independence would give American colonists the chance to create a better society—one free from tyranny, with equal social and economic opportunities for all. Common Sense sold nearly 500,000 copies in 1776 and was widely applauded. In April 1776, George Washington wrote, "I find Common Sense is working a powerful change in the minds of many men."
52 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
G/
What reasons did Jefferson give to justify revolt by the colonies? DECLARING INDEPENDENCE
By the early summer of 1776, the wavering Continental Congress finally decided to urge each colony to form its own government. On June 7, Virginia delegate Richard Henry Lee moved that “these United Colonies are, and of a right ought to be, free and independent States/' While talks on this fateful motion were under way, the Congress appointed a committee to prepare a formal Declaration of Independence. Virginia lawyer Thomas Jefferson was chosen to prepare the final draft.
Drawing on Locke's ideas of natural rights, Jefferson's document declared the rights of "Life, Liberty, and the pursuit of Happiness" to be "unalienable" rights— ones that can never be taken away. Jefferson then asserted that a government's legitimate power can only come from the consent of the governed, and that when a government denies their unalienable rights, the people have the right to "alter or abolish" that government. Jefferson provided a long list of violations committed by the king and Parliament against the colonists' unalienable rights. On that basis, the American colonies declared their independence from Britain, Gj
The Declaration states flatly that "all men are created equal." When this phrase was written, it expressed the common belief that free citizens were political equals. It did not claim that all people had the same ability or ought to have equal wealth. It was not meant to embrace women, Native Americans, or African-American slaves—a large number of Americans. However, Jefferson's words presented ideals that would later help these groups challenge traditional attitudes. In his first draft, Jefferson included an eloquent attack on the cruelty and injustice of the slave trade. However, South Carolina and Georgia, the two colonies most dependent on slavery, objected. In order to gain the votes of those two states, Jefferson dropped the offending passage.
On July 2, 1776, the delegates voted unanimously that the American colonies were free, and on July 4, 1776, they adopted the Declaration of Independence. The colonists had declared their freedom from Britain. They would now have to fight for it.


1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•King George III	•Samuel Adams	•John Locke
•Sugar Act	• Boston Massacre	• Common Sense
•Stamp Act	• Boston Tea Party	-Thomas Jefferson
•Declaration of Independence
t
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a cluster diagram like the one shown and fill it with events that demonstrate the conflict between Great Britain and the American colonies.
Choose one event to further explain in a paragraph.
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	EVALUATING
Explain whether you think the British government acted wisely in its dealings with the colonies between 1765 and 1775. Support your explanation with examples from the text. Think About:
•	the reasons for British action
•	the reactions of colonists
•	the results of British actions
ANALYZING EFFECTS
While Jefferson borrowed John Locke’s ideas, he changed Locke’s definition of the rights of men from “life, liberty, and property” to “life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.” How do you think Jefferson’s rewording of Locke’s words has affected American life? Think About:
•	the experience of immigrants seeking new lives
•	the experience of African Americans and Native Americans
•	the socioeconomic groups living in America
Review Unit 53

The Declaration of Independence
Thomas Jefferson’s Declaration of Independence is one of the most important and influential legal documents of modern times. Although the text frequently refers to eighteenth-century events, its Enlightenment philosophy and politics have continuing relevance today. For more than 200 years the Declaration of Independence has inspired leaders of other independence movements and has remained a crucial document in the struggle for civil rights and human rights.
In Congress, July 4, 1776.
Jefferson begins the Declaration by attempting to legally and philosophically justify the revolution that was already underway. Here Jefferson is saying that, now that the colonists have begun to separate themselves from British rule, it is time to explain why the colonists have taken this course of action.
These passages reveal the influence of the English philosopher John Locke. In Two Treatises of Government (1690), Locke argued that if a government does not allow its citizens to enjoy certain rights and freedoms, the people have a right to replace that government.
A
Declaration by the Representatives of the United States of America, in General Congress assembled. When in the Course of human events, it becomes necessary for one people to dissolve the political bands which have connected them with another, and to assume among the powers of the earth, the separate and equal station to which the Laws of Nature and of Nature's God entitle them, a decent respect to the opinions of mankind requires that they should declare the causes which impel them to the separation.
We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that
among these are Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness; that, to secure these rights, Governments are instituted among Men, deriving their just powers from the consent of the governed; that whenever any Form of Government becomes destructive of these ends, it is the Right of the People to alter or to abolish it, and to institute new Government, laying its foundation on such principles and organizing its powers in such form, as to them shall seem most likely to effect their Safety and Happiness. Prudence, indeed, will dictate that Governments long established should not be changed for light and transient causes; and accordingly all experience hath shewn that mankind are more disposed to suffer, while evils are sufferable, than to right themselves by abolishing the forms to which they are accustomed. But when a long train of abuses and usurpations, pursuing invariably the same Object, evinces a design to reduce them under absolute Despotism, it is their right, it is their duty, to throw off such Government, and to provide new Guards for their future security.
Such has been the patient sufferance of these Colonies; and such is now the necessity which constrains them to alter their former Systems of Government. The history of the present King of Great Britain is a history of repeated injuries and usurpations, all having in direct object the establishment of an absolute Tyranny over these States. To prove this, let facts be submitted to a candid world.
Here begins the section in which ------------
Jefferson condemns the behavior of King George, listing the king’s many tyrannical actions that have forced his American subjects to rebel.
He has refused his Assent to Laws, the most wholesome and necessary for the public good.
He has forbidden his Governors to pass Laws of immediate and pressing importance, unless suspended in their operation till his assent should be obtained; and, when so suspended, he has utterly neglected to attend to them.
He has refused to pass other Laws for the accommodation of large districts of people, unless those people would relinquish the right of Representation in the Legislature, a right inestimable to them, and formidable to tyrants only.
54 Chapter 2
He has called together legislative bodies at places unusual, uncomfortable, and distant from the depository of their public Records, for the sole purpose of fatiguing them into compliance with his measures.
He has dissolved Representative Houses repeatedly, for opposing with manly firmness his invasions on the rights of the people.
He has refused for a long time, after such dissolutions, to cause others to be elected; whereby the Legislative powers, incapable of Annihilation, have returned to the people at large for their exercise; the State remaining in the mean time exposed to all the dangers of invasions from without, and convulsions within.
He has endeavoured to prevent the population of these States; for that purpose obstructing the Laws for Naturalization of Foreigners; refusing to pass others to encourage their migration hither, and raising the conditions of new Appropriations of Lands.
He has obstructed the Administration of Justice, by refusing his Assent to Laws for establishing Judiciary powers.
He has made Judges dependent on his Will alone, for the tenure of their offices, and the amount and payment of their salaries.
He has erected a multitude of New Offices, and sent hither swarms of Officers to harass our people and eat out their substance.
He has kept among us, in times of peace, Standing Armies, without the I Consent of our legislatures.	|
He has affected to render the Military independent of and superior to the Civil power.
He has combined with others to subject us to a jurisdiction foreign to our constitution and unacknowledged by our laws; giving his Assent to their Acts of pretended Legislation:
For quartering large bodies of armed troops among us;
For protecting them, by a mock Trial, from punishment for any Murders which they should commit on the Inhabitants of these States;
For cutting off our Trade with all parts of the world;
For imposing Taxes on us without our Consent;
For depriving us, in many cases, of the benefits of Trial by Jury;
For transporting us beyond Seas to be tried for pretended offenses;
For abolishing the free System of English Laws in a neighboring Province, establishing therein an Arbitrary government, and enlarging its Boundaries so as to render it at once an example and fit instrument for introducing the same absolute rule into these Colonies;
For taking away our Charters, abolishing our most valuable laws, and altering fundamentally the Forms of our Governments;
For suspending our own Legislatures, and declaring themselves invested with power to legislate for us in all cases whatsoever.
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
INDEPENDENCE AND SLAVERY
The Declaration of Independence went through many revisions before the final draft. Jefferson, a slaveholder himself, regretted having to eliminate one passage in particular—a condemnation of slavery and the slave trade. However, in the face of opposition of delegates from Southern states, the anti-slavery passage was deleted.
This is a reference to the 10,000 troops that the British government stationed in North America after the French and Indian War. Although the British government saw the troops as protection for the colonists, the colonists themselves viewed the troops as a standing army that threatened their freedom.
Here Jefferson condemns both the king and Parliament for passing the Intolerable Acts. Most of these laws were intended to punish the people of Massachusetts for the Boston Tea Party. For example, the Quartering Act of 1774 forced colonists to provide lodging for British troops. Another act allowed British soldiers accused of murder to be sent back to England for trial. The Boston Port Bill closed the port of Boston, “cutting off our Trade with all parts of the world.”
Here Jefferson refers to the Quebec Act, which extended the boundaries of the province. He then refers to another act that changed the charter of Massachusetts and restricted town meetings.
Review Unit 55
vV.RSPICI/V;
MEN WOULD BE TYRANTS IF THEY COULD.”
Although the Declaration dealt with issues of equality, justice, and independence, it did not address conditions of inequality within the colonies themselves. Husbands dominated their wives, for example, and slaves lived under complete control of their owners. Speaking on behalf of women, Abigail Adams (above) had this to say to her husband John, who served in the Continental Congress:
“Remember the Ladies, and be more generous and favourable to them than your ancestors.
Do not put such unlimited power into the hands of the Husbands. Remember all Men would be tyrants if they could. If particular care ... is not paid to the Ladies, we are determined to foment a Rebellion.”
Here Jefferson turns his attention away from the king and toward the British people. Calling the British the "common kindred" of the colonists, Jefferson reminds them how often the Americans have appealed to their sense of justice. Reluctantly the colonists are now forced to break their political connections with their British kin.
In this passage, the delegates declare independence.
He has abdicated Government here, by declaring us out of his Protection and waging War against us.
He has plundered our seas, ravaged our Coasts, burnt our towns, and destroyed the lives of our people.
He is at this time transporting large Armies of foreign Mercenaries to com-pleat the works of death, desolation, and tyranny, already begun with circumstances of Cruelty & perfidy scarcely paralleled in the most barbarous ages, and totally unworthy the Head of a civilized nation.
He has constrained our fellow Citizens, taken Captive on the high Seas, to bear Arms against their Country, to become the executioners of their friends and Brethren, or to fall themselves by their Hands.
He has excited domestic insurrections amongst us, and has endeavoured to bring on the inhabitants of our frontiers the merciless Indian Savages, whose known rule of warfare is an undistinguished destruction of all ages, sexes and conditions.
In every stage of these Oppressions We have Petitioned for Redress in the most humble terms; Our repeated Petitions have been answered only by repeated injury. A Prince, whose character is thus marked by every act which may define a Tyrant, is unfit to be the ruler of a free people.
Nor have We been wanting in attentions to our British brethren. We have warned them from time to time of attempts by their legislature to extend an unwarrantable jurisdiction over us. We have reminded them of the circumstances of our emigration and settlement here. We have appealed to their native justice and magnanimity, and we have conjured them by the ties of our common kindred, to disavow these usurpations, which would inevitably interrupt our connections and correspondence. They too have been deaf to the voice of justice and of consanguinity. We must, therefore, acquiesce in the necessity, which denounces our Separation, and hold them, as we hold the rest of mankind, Enemies in War, in Peace Friends.
We, therefore, the Representatives of the United States of America, in General Congress, Assembled, appealing to the Supreme Judge of the world for the rectitude of our intentions, do, in the name, and by the Authority of the good People of these Colonies solemnly publish and declare, That these United Colonies are, and of Right ought to be, Free and Independent States; that they are Absolved from all Allegiance to the British Crown, and that all political connection between them and the State of Great Britain is, and ought to be, totally dissolved; and that as Free and Independent States, they have full Power to levy War, conclude Peace, contract Alliances, establish Commerce, and do all other Acts and Things which Independent States may of right do.
56 Chapter 2
, congress.
And for the support of this Declaration, with a firm reliance on the pro-— tection of divine Providence, we mutually pledge to each other our Lives, our . Fortunes, and our sacred Honor.
[Signed by]
John Hancock [President of the Continental Congress]
[Georgia]	[Maryland]	[Delaware]
Button Gwinnett	Samuel Chase	Caesar Rodney
Lyman Hall	William Paca	George Read
George Walton	Thomas Stone Charles Carroll	Thomas McKean
[Rhode Island]		[New York]
Stephen Hopkins	[Virginia]	William Floyd
William Ellery	George Wythe	Philip Livingston
	Richard Henry Lee	Francis Lewis
[Connecticut]	Thomas Jefferson	Lewis Morris
Roger Sherman	Benjamin Harrison	
Samuel Huntington	Thomas Nelson, Jr.	[New Jersey]
William Williams	Francis Lightfoot Lee	Richard Stockton
Oliver Wolcott	Carter Braxton	John Witherspoon Francis Hopkinson
[North Carolina]	[Pennsylvania]	John Hart
William Hooper	Robert Morris	Abraham Clark
Joseph Hewes	Benjamin Rush	
John Penn	Benjamin Franklin	[New Hampshire]
	John Morton	Josiah Bartlett
[South Carolina]	George Clymer	William Whipple
Edward Rutledge	James Smith	Matthew Thornton
Thomas Heyward, Jr.	George Taylor	
Thomas Lynch, Jr.	James Wilson	[Massachusetts]
Arthur Middleton	George Ross	Samuel Adams John Adams Robert Treat Paine Elbridge Gerry
The Declaration ends with the delegates’ pledge, or pact. The delegates at the Second Continental Congress knew that, in declaring their independence from Great Britain, they were committing treason—a crime punishable by death. "We must all hang together," Benjamin Franklin reportedly said, as the delegates prepared to sign the Declaration, "or most assuredly we shall all hang separately."
yV.Y PLAY£fi

-At
JOHN HANCOCK 1737-1793
Born in Braintree, Massachusetts, and raised by a wealthy uncle, John Hancock became one of the richest men in the colonies. He traveled around Boston in a luxurious carriage and dressed only in the finest clothing. “He looked every inch an aristocrat,” noted one acquaintance, “from his dress and powdered wig to his smart pumps of grained leather.”
Beneath Hancock’s refined appearance, however, burned the heart of a patriot. He was only too glad to lead the Second Continental Congress. When the time came to sign the Declaration of Independence, Hancock scrawled his name in big, bold letters. “There,” he reportedly said, “I guess King George will be able to read that.”
Review Unit 57
The War for Independence
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Key American victories reversed British advances during the American Revolutionary War.
The American Revolution is today a national, even international, symbol of the fight for freedom.
•Loyalists •Patriots •Saratoga •Valley Forge •inflation •Marquis de Lafayette
•Charles
Cornwallis
•Yorktown •Treaty of Paris •egalitarianism

hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the significant events of the Revolutionary War.
Benjamin Franklin, the famous American writer, scientist, statesman, and diplomat, represented the colonies in London throughout the growing feud with Britain. As resistance in the colonies turned to bloodshed, however, Franklin fled London in 1775 and sailed home to Philadelphia.
Ironically, the issue of loyalty versus independence that was dividing the American colonies from their mother country was also dividing Franklin's own family. Franklin's son William, the royal governor of New Jersey, was stubbornly loyal to King George and opposed the rebellious atmosphere in the colonies. In one of his many letters to British
authorities regarding the conflict in the colonies,
William stated his position and that of others who resisted revolutionary views.
A
Personal Voice william franklin “There is indeed a dread in the minds of many here that some of the leaders of the people are aiming to establish a republic. Rather than submit... we have thousands who will risk the loss of their lives in defense of the old Constitution. [They] are ready to declare themselves whenever they see a chance of its being of any avail. ” —quoted in A Little Revenge: Benjamin Franklin and His Son
Because of William's stand on colonial issues, communication between him and his father virtually ceased. The break between Benjamin Franklin and his son mirrored the chasm that now divided the colonies from Britain. The notion of fighting Britain frightened and horrified some colonists even as it inspired others. Both sides believed that they were fighting for their country and being loyal to what was best for America.
A
William Franklin
S8
Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic MAIN IDEA
Forming
Generalizations
How did the thinking of Loyalists differ from that of Patriots?
HISTORY
VIDEO
Saratoga: Force Surrender
7\ hmhsocialstudies.com
Weaknesses
•	large distance separating Britain from battlefields
•	troops unfamiliar with terrain
•	weak military leaders
•	sympathy of certain British
politicans for the American cause
UNITED STATES
Strengths •	familiarity of home ground
•	leadership of George Washington and other officers
•	inspiring cause-independence
GREAT BRITAIN
Strengths •	strong, well-trained army and navy
•	strong central government with available funds
•	support of colonial Loyalists and Native Americans
65°W
The War Begins
As they took on the mighty British Empire, the colonists suffered initial losses in the Middle States, which served as the Revolutionary War's early battleground. In time, however, the colonists would battle their way back.
LOYALISTS AND PATRIOTS
As the war began, Americans found themselves on different sides of the conflict. Loyalists—those who opposed independence and remained loyal to the British king—included judges and governors, as well as people of more modest means. Many Loyalists thought that the British were going to win and wanted to avoid punishment as rebels. Still others thought that the Crown would protect their rights more effectively than the new colonial governments would. Patriots—the supporters of independence—drew their numbers from people who saw political and economic opportunity in an independent America. Many Americans remained neutral,
The conflict presented dilemmas for other groups as well. Many African Americans fought on the side of the Patriots, but others joined the Loyalists because the British promised freedom to slaves who would fight for the Crown. Most Native Americans supported the British because they viewed colonial settlers as a greater threat to their lands.
EARLY VICTORIES AND DEFEATS
As part of a plan to stop the rebellion by isolating New England, the British quickly attempted to seize New York City. The British sailed into New York harbor in the summer of 1776 with a force of about 32,000 soldiers. They included thousands of German mercenaries, or hired soldiers, known as Hessians because many of them came from the German region of Hesse.
Weaknesses
•	most soldiers untrained and undisciplined
•	shortage of food and ammunition
•	inferior navy
•	no central government to enforce wartime policies
Revolutionary War, 1775-1778
75 W
70°W
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
Location From which city did General Burgoyne march his troops to Saratoga?
Place What characteristic did many of the battle sites have in common? Why do you think this was so?
Although the Continental Army attempted to defend New York in late August, the untrained and poorly equipped colonial troops soon retreated. By late fall, the British had pushed Washington's army across the Delaware River into Pennsylvania.
Desperate for an early victory, Washington risked everything on one bold stroke set for Christmas night, 1776. In the face of a fierce storm, he led 2,400 men in small rowboats across the ice-choked Delaware River. They then marched to their objective—Trenton, New Jersey—and defeated a garrison of Hessians in a surprise attack. The British soon regrouped, however, and in September of 1777, they captured the American capital at Philadelphia.
SARATOGA AND VALLEY FORGE
In the meantime, one British general was marching straight into the jaws of disaster. In a complex scheme, General John Burgoyne planned to lead an army down a route of lakes from Canada to Albany, where he would meet British troops as they arrived from New York City. The two regiments would then join forces to isolate New England from the rest of the colonies. As Burgoyne traveled through forested wilderness, militiamen and soldiers from the Continental Army gathered from all over New York and New England. While he was fighting off the colonial troops, Burgoyne didn't realize that his fellow British officers were preoccupied with holding Philadelphia and weren't coming to meet him. American troops finally surrounded Burgoyne at Saratoga, where he surrendered on October 17, 1777.
The surrender at Saratoga turned out to be one of the most important events of the war. Although the French had secretly aided the Patriots since early 1776, the Saratoga victory bolstered France's belief that the Americans could win the war. As a result, the French signed an alliance with the Americans in February 1778 and openly joined them in their fight.
While this hopeful turn of events took place in Paris, Washington and his Continental Army—desperately low on food and supplies—fought to stay alive at winter camp in Valley Forge, Pennsylvania. More than 2,000 soldiers died, yet the survivors didn't desert. Their endurance and suffering filled Washington's letters to the Congress and his friends.
MAIN IDEA
Developing
Historical
Perspective
Why were these early victories so important to the Continental Army?
BGEORGE WASHINGTON 1732-1799
During the Revolutionary War, Commander in Chief George Washington became a national hero. An imposing man, Washington stood six feet two inches tall. He was broad-shouldered, calm, and dignified, and he was an expert horseman. But it was Washington’s character that won hearts and, ultimately, the war.
Washington persistently roused dispirited men into a fighting force. At Princeton, he galloped on his white horse into the line of fire, shouting and encouraging his men. At Valley Forge, he bore the same cold and privation as every suffering soldier. Time and again, Washington’s tactics saved his smaller, weaker force to fight another day. By the end of the war, the entire nation idolized General Washington, and adoring soldiers crowded near him just to touch his boots when he rode by.
A
Personal Voice george Washington “It may be said that no history . . . can furnish an Instance of an Army’s suffering uncommon hardships as ours have done. ... To see the men without clothes to cover their nakedness, without blankets to lie upon, without shoes,. . . and submitting without a murmur, is a proof of patience and obedience which in my opinion can scarcely be paralleled/’ —quoted in Ordeal at Valley Forge
Life During the Revolution
One huge problem that the Continental Congress faced was paying the troops. When the Congress ran out of hard currency-silver and gold—it printed paper money called Continentals (like the Revolutionary soldiers). As Congress printed more and more money, its value plunged, causing rising prices, or inflation. The Congress also struggled against great odds to equip the beleaguered army.
60 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
Molly Pitcher was the heroine of the Battle of Monmouth in New Jersey, which was fought in 1778. Afterward, General Washington appointed her as a noncommissioned officer to honor her brave deeds.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
$ What important contributions did women make in the Revolutionary War?
In 1781, the Congress appointed a rich Philadelphia merchant named Robert Morris as superintendent of finance. His associate was Haym Salomon, a Jewish political refugee from Poland. Morris and Salomon begged and borrowed on their personal credit to raise money to provide salaries for the Continental Army. They raised funds from Philadelphia's Quakers and Jews. On September 8, 1781, a Continental major wrote in his diary, "This day will be famous in the Annals of History for being the first on which the Troops of the United States received one Month's Pay in Specie [coin]."
The demands of war also affected civilians. When men
marched off to fight, many wives stepped into their husbands' shoes, managing farms and businesses as well as households and families. Hundreds of women also followed their husbands to the battlefield, where they washed and cooked for the troops—while some, including Molly Pitcher, even risked their lives in combat. &
The war opened some doors for African Americans. Thousands of slaves escaped to freedom in the chaos of war. About 5,000 African Americans served in the Continental Army, where their courage, loyalty, and talent impressed white Americans. Native Americans, however, remained on the fringes of the Revolution, preferring to remain independent and true to their own cultures.
Winning the War
In February 1778, in the midst of the frozen winter at Valley Forge, American troops began an amazing transformation. Friedrich von Steuben, a Prussian captain and talented drill-master, helped to train the Continental Army. Other foreign military leaders, such as the Marquis de Lafayette (mar-ke' da laf'e-et'), also arrived to offer their help. Lafayette lobbied France for French reinforcements in 1779, and led a command in Virginia in the last years of the war. With the help of such European military leaders, the raw Continental Army became an effective fighting force.
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
JOHN PAUL JONES
As the Revolutionary War raged on land, Britain and the colonies also engaged each other at sea. The newly formed Continental navy was no match for the mighty British fleet. It was only after France and Spain joined the colonists’ cause that Britain lost its maritime supremacy.
Nonetheless, the colonists scored several morale-boosting victories over the British navy, due in large part to the heroics of American naval commander John Paul Jones. The Scottish-born Jones captured a number of British vessels, including the Serapis in 1779. It was during his epic battle against this ship that Jones rejected the British demand that he surrender by uttering the famous line, “I have not yet begun to fight.”
I
|S
Review Unit 61

GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Place Where were most of the later Revolutionary War battles fought?
2.	Movement Why might General Cornwallis’s choice of Yorktown as a base have left him at a military disadvantage?
ATLANTIC
OCEAN
	American/French campaign
	British campaign
*	American/French victory
*	British victory
□	Thirteen Colonies
n	Other British territory
0	100	200 miles
0	100	200 kilometers
35°N
THE BRITISH MOVE SOUTH
After their devastating defeat at Saratoga, the British began to shift their operations to the South. At the end of 1778, a British expedition easily took Savannah, Georgia. In their greatest victory of the war, the British under Generals Henry Clinton and Charles Cornwallis captured Charles Town, South Carolina, in May 1780. Clinton then left for New York, while Cornwallis continued to conquer land throughout the South. In early 1781, despite several defeats, the colonists continued to battle Cornwallis—hindering his efforts to take the Carolinas. The British general then chose to move the fight to Virginia. He led his army of 7,500 onto the peninsula between the James and York rivers and camped at Yorktown. Cornwallis planned to fortify Yorktown, take Virginia, and then move north to join Clinton's forces.
THE BRITISH SURRENDER AT YORKTOWN
Shortly after learning of Corwallis's actions, the armies of Lafayette and Washington moved south toward Yorktown. Meanwhile, a French naval force defeated a British fleet and then blocked the entrance to the Chesapeake Bay, thereby obstructing British sea routes to the bay. By late September, about 17,000 French and American troops surrounded the British on the Yorktown peninsula and began bombarding them day and night. Less than a month later, on October 19, 1781, Cornwallis finally surrendered. The Americans had shocked the world and defeated the British. Peace talks began in Paris in 1782. The American negotiating team included John Adams, John Jay of New York, and Benjamin Franklin. In September 1783, the delegates signed the Treaty of Paris, which confirmed U.S. independence and set the boundaries of the new nation. The United States now stretched from the Atlantic Ocean to the Mississippi River and from Canada to the Florida border.
Vocabulary peninsula: a
piece of land that projects into a body of water
MAIN IDEA
Evaluating
What was the most important challenge that faced the new United States?
62 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
How had the American Revolution affected the lives of Native Americans?
The War Becomes a Symbol of Liberty
Revolutionary ideals set a new course for American society. During the war, social distinctions had begun to blur as the wealthy wore homespun clothing and as military leaders showed respect for all of their soldiers. Changes like these stimulated the rise of egalitarianism (i-gan-tar'e-e-niz'om)—a belief in the equality of all people. This belief fostered a new attitude: the idea that ability, effort, and virtue, not wealth or family background, defined one's worth.
The egalitarianism of the 1780s, however, applied only to white males. It did not bring any new political rights to women. A few states made it possible for women to divorce, but common law still dictated that a married woman's property belonged to her husband.
Moreover, most African Americans were still enslaved, and even those who were free usually faced discrimination and poverty. However by 1804, many New England and Middle states had taken steps to outlaw slavery.
For Native Americans, the Revolution brought uncertainty. During both the French and Indian War and the Revolution, many Native American communities had been either destroyed or displaced, and the Native American population living east of the Mississippi had declined by about 50 percent. Postwar developments further threatened Native American interests, as settlers began taking triballands left unprotected by the Treaty of Paris.
In the closing days of the Revolution, the Continental Congress had chosen a quotation from the works of the Roman poet Virgil as a motto for the reverse side of the Great Seal of the United States. The motto, Novus Ordo Seclorum, means "a new order of the ages." Establishing a government and resolving internal problems in that new order would be atremendous challenge for citizens of the newborn United States.
▲
English potter Josiah Wedgwood designed this anti-slavery cameo and sent copies of it to Benjamin Franklin.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
• Loyalists	’Valley Forge	’Charles Cornwallis	’Treaty of Paris
•Patriots	’Inflation	’Yorktown	’egalitarianism
•Saratoga	’Marquis de Lafayette
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
On a chart like the one below, list five significant events of the Revolutionary War in the column on the left. Note the significance of each event towards the American cause in the column on the right.
Event	Significance
	
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	EVALUATING
Do you think the colonists could have won their independence without aid from foreigners? Explain.
Think About:
•	the military needs of the Americans and the strengths of the French
•	the colonists’ military efforts
in the South
•	the Americans’ belief in their fight for independence
ANALYZING EFFECTS
What were the effects of the Revolutionary War on the American colonists? Think About:
•	political effects
•	economic effects
•	social effects
Review Unit 63
TRACING THEMES
Women and Political Power
In their families and in the workplace, in speeches and in print, countless American women have worked for justice for all citizens. Throughout the history of the United States, women have played whatever roles they felt were necessary to better this country. They also fought to expand their own political power, a power that throughout much of American history has been denied them.
PROTEST AGAINST BRITAIN
In the tense years leading up to the Revolution, American women found ways to participate in the protests against the British. Homemakers boycotted tea and British-made clothing. In the painting at right, Sarah Morris Mifflin, shown with her husband Thomas, spins her own thread rather than use British thread. Some businesswomen, such as printer Mary Goddard, who produced the official copies of the Declaration of Independence, took more active roles.
A WOMAN’S DECLARATION
SENECA FALLS

ELIZABETH CAD' '
the cruel and unju; the office of her f< s	child, to find a way
\	to the abolitionist 1
ly into the curren foundation for the for woman's right inspiring leader. 1
executed the first Falls, New York, J,
As America grew, women became acutely aware of their unequal status in society, particularly their lack of suffrage, or the right to vote.
In 1848, two women—Elizabeth Cady Stanton, shown above, and Lucretia Mott—launched the first woman suffrage movement in the United States at the Seneca Falls Convention in Seneca Falls, New York. During the convention, Stanton introduced her Declaration of Sentiments, in which she demanded greater rights for women, including the right to vote.
64 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
THE EQUAL RIGHTS AMENDMENT MOVEMENT
During the mid-1900s, as more women entered the workforce, many women recognized their continuing unequal status, including the lack of equal pay for equal work. By passing an Equal Rights Amendment, some women hoped to obtain the same social and economic rights as men.
Although millions supported the amendment, many men and women feared the measure would prompt unwanted change. The ERA ultimately failed to be ratified for the Constitution.

WOMEN IN CONGRESS
In spite of the failure of the ERA, many women have achieved strong positions for themselves—politically as well as socially and economically.
In the 111th Congress, 73 women served in the House of Representatives and 17 served in the Senate. Shown above is Nancy Pelosi, the first woman to serve as Speaker of the House.
THE RIGHT TO VOTE
More than a half-century after organizing for the right to vote, women finally won their struggle. In 1920, the United States adopted the Nineteenth Amendment, which granted women the right to vote.
Pictured above is one of the many suffrage demonstrations of the early 1900s that helped garner public support for the amendment.
Review Unit 65
TEKS 1AZ21B,26E,26F
Confederation and the Constitution
MAIN IDEA
j | WHY IT MATTERS NOW j ' Terms & Names American leaders created the Constitution as a blueprint of government for the United States.
More than 200 years after its creation, the Constitution remains the nation’s guiding document for a working government.
•	republic	• federalism
•	Articles of	• checks and
Confederation	balances
•	Northwest	• ratification
Ordinance of 1787	• Federalists
•	Shays’s Rebellion	• Antifederalists
•James Madison • Bill of Rights
^3
hmhsodalstudies.com
■TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about issues debated at the Constitutional Convention.
^^^^^^rOneAmerican's
John Dickinson understood, perhaps better than other delegates to the Continental Congress, the value of compromise. In 1776 Dickinson hoped for reconciliation with Britain and refused to sign the Declaration of Independence. Yet, eight days after the Declaration was adopted, Dickinson presented Congress with the first draft of a plan for setting up a workable government for the new states.
A
Personal Voice john dickinson 66 Two rules I have laid down for myself throughout this contest... first, on all occasions where I am called upon, as a trustee for my countrymen, to deliberate on questions Important to their happiness, disdaining all personal advantages to be derived from a suppression of my real sentiments . . . openly to avow [declare] them; and, secondly, . . . whenever the public resolutions are taken, to regard them though opposite to my opinion, as sacred . . . and to join in supporting them as earnestly as if my voice had been given for them.”
—quoted in The Life and Times of John Dickinson, 1732-1808
Dickinson’s two rules became guiding principles for the	John Dickinson
leaders who faced the formidable task of forming a new nation.
Experimenting with Confederation
As citizens of a new and independent nation, Americans had to create their own political system. Fighting the Revolutionary War gave the states a common goal, but they remained reluctant to unite under a strong central government.
66 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
What was the difference between the Land Ordinance of 1785 and the Northwest Ordinance of 1787?
f MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
Why do you think news of Shays’s Rebellion made states eager to participate in the Philadelphia convention?
After the Revolution, many Americans favored a republic—a government in which citizens rule through their elected representatives. However, many also feared that a democracy—government directly by the people—placed power in the hands of the uneducated masses. These fears and concerns deeply affected the planning of the new government.
THE ARTICLES OF CONFEDERATION
The Second Continental Congress set up a new plan of government in a set of laws called the Articles of Confederation. The plan established a form of government called a confederation, or alliance, among the thirteen states. The Articles set up a Congress in which each state would have one vote regardless of population. Powers were divided between the states and the national government. The national government had the power to declare war, make peace, and sign treaties. It could borrow money, set standards for coins and for weights and measures, and establish a postal service. After approval by all thirteen states, the Articles of Confederation went into effect in March 1781.
One of the first issues the Confederation faced had to do with the the Northwest Territory, lands west of the Appalachians, where many people settled after the Revolutionary War. To help govern these lands, Congress passed the Land Ordinance of 1785, which established a plan for surveying the land. (See Geography Spotlight on page 72.) In the Northwest Ordinance of 1787, Congress provided a procedure for dividing the land into no fewer than three and no more than five states. The ordinance also set requirements for the admission of new states, which, however, overlooked Native American land claims, j
Weaknesses of the Articles of Confederation
•	Congress could not enact and collect taxes.
•	Each state had only one vote in Congress, regardless of population.
•	Nine out of thirteen states needed to agree to pass important laws.
•	Articles could be amended only if all states approved.
•	There was no executive branch to enforce laws of Congress.
•	There was no national court system to settle legal disputes.
•	There were thirteen separate states that lacked national unity.
The Land Ordinance of 1785 and the Northwest Ordinance of 1787 became the Confederation's most significant achievements. Overshadowing such successes, however, were the Confederation's many problems. The most serious problem was that each state functioned independently by pursuing its own interests rather than considering those of the nation as a whole. The government had no means of raising money or enforcing its laws. Moreover, there was no national court system to settle legal disputes. The Articles of Confederation created a weak central government and little unity among the states.
SHAYS’S REBELLION
The need for a stronger central government became obvious in 1786 when many farmers in western Massachusetts rose up in protest over increased state taxes. The farmers' discontent boiled over into mob action in January of 1787 when Daniel Shays, a fellow farmer, led an army of 1,200 farmers toward the arsenal at Springfield, Massachusetts. State officials hurriedly called out the militia to head off the army of farmers, killing four of the rebels and scattering the rest. Shays's Rebellion, as the farmers' protest came to be called, caused panic and dismay throughout the nation. It was clearly time to talk about a stronger national government. Because the states had placed such severe limits on the government to prevent abuse of power, the government was unable to solve many of the nation's problems. News of the rebellion spread throughout the states. The revolt persuaded twelve states to send delegates to a convention called by Congress in Philadelphia in May of 1787.
kl<
HISTORY
VIDEO
Shays's Rebellion
^DSBBBQ
Review Unit 67
i<tV PLAYER
JAMES MADISON 1751-1836
The oldest of 12 children, James Madison grew up in Virginia. He was a sickly child who suffered all his life from physical ailments. Because of a weak speaking voice, he decided not to become a minister and thus entered politics.
Madison’s Virginia Plan resulted from extensive research that he had done on political systems before the convention. He asked Edmund Randolph, a fellow delegate from Virginia, to present the plan because his own voice was too weak to be heard throughout the assembly.
Besides providing brilliant political leadership, Madison kept a record of the debates that took place at the convention. Because of his plan and his leadership, Madison is known as the Father of the Constitution.
Creating a New Government
Most of the delegates at the Constitutional Convention recognized the need to strengthen the central government. Within the first five days of the meeting, they gave up the idea of fixing the Articles of Confederation and decided to form an entirely new government that would replace the one created by the Articles.
CONFLICT AND COMPROMISE
One major issue that the delegates faced was giving fair representation to both large and small states. James Madison proposed the Virginia Plan, which called for a bicameral, or two-house, legislature, with membership based on each state's population. Delegates from the small states vigorously objected to the Virginia Plan because it gave more power to states with large populations. Small states supported William Paterson's New Jersey Plan, which proposed a single-house congress in which each state had an equal vote. The debate became deadlocked and dragged on through the hot and humid summer days. Eventually, Roger Sherman suggested the Great Compromise, which offered a two-house Congress to satisfy both small and big states. Each state would have equal representation in the Senate, or upper house. The size of the population of each state would determine its representation in the House of Representatives, or lower house. Voters of each state would choose members of the House. The state legislatures would choose members of the Senate.
The Great Compromise settled one major issue but led to conflict over another. Southern delegates, whose states had large numbers of slaves, wanted slaves included in the population count that determined the number of representatives in the House. Northern delegates, whose states had few slaves, disagreed. Not counting the slaves would give the Northern states more representatives than the Southern states in the House of Representatives. The delegates eventually agreed to the Three-Fifths Compromise, which called for three-fifths of a state's slaves to be counted as part of the population.
DIVISION OF POWERS
After the delegates reached agreement on the difficult questions of slavery and representation, they dealt with other issues somewhat more easily. They divided power between the states and the national government, and they separated the national government's power into three branches. Thus, they created an entirely new government. The new system of government that the delegates were building was a form of federalism, in which power is divided between a national government and several state governments. The powers granted to the national government by the Constitution are known as delegated powers, or enumerated powers. These include such powers as the control of foreign affairs and regulation of trade between the states. Powers not specifically granted to the national government but kept by the states are called reserved powers. These include powers such as providing for and supervising education. Some powers, such as the right to tax and establish courts, were shared by both the national and the state governments.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
jgj In what ways did the Great Compromise resolve certain problems even as it created new ones?
68 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
Key Conflicts in the Constitutional Convention
STRONG CENTRAL GOVERNMENT
vs. STRONG STATES •	Authority derives from the people.
•	The central government should be
stronger than the states.
•	Authority derives from the states.
•	The states should remain stronger
than the centra, government.
LARGE STATES
vs. SMALL STATES • Congress should be composed of two houses.
• Delegates should be assigned according to population.
A
Congress of one house should be preserved.
• Each state should have one vote.
NORTH vs. SOUTH
• Slaves should not be counted when deciding the number of delegates.
• Slaves should be counted when levying taxes.
• Slaves should be counted when determining congressional representation.
• Slaves should not be counted when levying taxes.
MAIN IDEA
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
Why did the delegates fear that one branch of the government would gain too much power?
Making
Inferences
Why did the delegates fear that one branch of the government would gain too much power?
SEPARATION OF POWERS
The delegates also limited the authority of the national government. First, they created three branches of government—a legislative branch to make laws, an executive branch to carry out laws, and a judicial branch to interpret laws. Then the delegates established a system of checks and balances to prevent any one branch from dominating the other two. The procedure the delegates established for electing the president reflected their fear of placing too much power in the hands of the people. Instead of choosing the president directly, each state would choose a number of electors equal to the number of senators and representatives that the state had in Congress. This group of electors chosen by the states, known as the electoral college, would then cast ballots for the presidential candidates. Jg|
CHANGING THE CONSTITUTION
The delegates also provided a means of changing the Constitution through the amendment process. After four months of debate and compromise, the delegates succeeded in creating a Constitution that was an enduring document. The Constitution has been amended for a variety of reasons throughout history. Amendments help government change along with the values of the nation's people. For example, several amendments have expanded voting rights for various groups as society's expectations of equality have evolved (see "Tracing Themes" on pages 104-105). The Twenty-first Amendment was passed to cancel, or repeal, the Eighteenth Amendment after social values shifted. Other amendments have altered the structure of government, by establishing electoral procedures or setting limits on certain branches.
Ratifying the Constitution
George Washington adjourned the Constitutional Convention on September 17, 1787. The Convention's work was over, but the new government could not become a reality until at least nine states ratified, or approved, the Constitution. Thus, the battle over ratification began.
FEDERALISTS AND ANTIFEDERALISTS
Supporters of the Constitution called themselves Federalists, because they favored the new Constitution's balance of power between the states and the national government. Their opponents became known as Antifederalists because they opposed having such a strong central government and thus were against the Constitution. Review Unit 69
Both sides waged a war of words in the public debate over ratification. The Federalist, a series of 85 essays defending the Constitution, appeared in New York newspapers. These were essays written by three influential supporters of ratification: Alexander Hamilton, James Madison, and John Jay.
All three writers felt that there were defects in the new Constitution, but they also felt that its stronger central government was superior to the weak Congress provided by the Articles of Confederation. Using the pen name "Publius," the authors addressed those who argued that ratification should be delayed until a more perfect document could be written. In the following excerpt from one of the essays (now known to be written by Madison), the author asks his readers to compare the admittedly flawed Constitution with its predecessor, the Articles.
A
Personal Voice james madison “ It Is a matter both of wonder and regret, that those who raise so many objections against the new Constitution should never call to mind the defects of that which is to be exchanged for it [The Articles]. It is not necessary that the former should be perfect; it is sufficient that the latter is more imperfect. ”
—The Federalist, Number 38, 1788
James Madison
The Antifederalists' main opposition to the new Constitution was that it contained no guarantee that the government would protect the rights of the people or of the states. Antifederalists included such notable figures as Patrick Henry, George Mason, and Richard Henry Lee. Letters from the Federal Farmer, most likely written by Lee, was the most widely read Antifederalist publication. Lee listed the rights that Antifederalists believed should be protected, such as freedom of the press and of religion, guarantees against unreasonable searches of people and their homes, and the right to a trial by jury.
The Antifederalists' demand for a bill of rights—a formal summary of citizens' rights and freedoms—stemmed from their fear of a strong central government. All state constitutions guaranteed individual rights, and seven of them included a bill of rights. The states believed they would serve as protectors of the people. Yet in the end, the Federalists yielded to people's overwhelming desire and promised to add a bill of rights if the states would ratify the Constitution. In June 1788, New Hampshire became the ninth state to approve the Constitution, making it the law of the land. JE/
ADOPTION OF A BILL OF RIGHTS
By December 1791, the states also had ratified ten amendments to the Constitution, which became known as the Bill of Rights. The first eight amendments spell out the personal liberties the states had requested. The First Amendment guarantees citizens' rights to freedom of religion, speech, the press, and political activity. According to the Second and Third Amendments, the government cannot deny citizens the right to bear arms as members of a militia of citizen-soldiers, nor can the government house troops in private homes in peacetime. The Fourth Amendment prevents the search of citizens' homes without proper warrants. The Fifth through Eighth Amendments guarantee fair treatment for individuals accused of crimes. The Ninth and Tenth Amendments impose general limits on the powers of the federal government. j MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Why did the Antifederalists insist that the Constitution must have a bill of rights?
70 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
The protection of rights and freedoms did not apply to all Americans at the time the Bill of Rights was adopted. Native Americans and slaves were excluded. Women were not mentioned in the Constitution. The growing number of free blacks did not receive adequate protection from the Constitution. Although many states permitted free blacks to vote, the Bill of Rights offered them no protection against whites' discrimination and hostility.
i
MAIN IDEA
Drawing
Conclusions
$ How did the adoption of the Bill of Rights show the flexibility of the Constitution?
Continuing Relevance of the Constitution
The United States Constitution is the oldest written national constitution still in use. It is a "living" document, capable of meeting the changing needs of Americans. One reason for this capability lies in Article I, Section 8, which gives Congress the power "To make all laws which shall be necessary and proper for carrying into execution" the powers that the Constitution enumerates. This clause is referred to as the "elastic clause" because it stretches the power of the government. The framers of the Constitution included these implied powers in order to allow the authority of the government to expand to meet unforeseen circumstances.
The Constitution also can be formally changed when necessary through amendments. The Constitution provides ways for amendments to be proposed and to be ratified. Only 27 amendments have been added to the Constitution. These amendments have helped the government meet the challenges of a changing world, while still preserving the rights of the American people.
Since its ratification, the U.S. Constitution has served as a model for other democracies. It has been one of our nation's most important exports, influencing the constitutions of dozens of other nations. It is a flexible document that continues to protect Americans and inspire people around the world.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance, •republic	• James Madison	•Federalists
•Articles of Confederation	•federalism	•Antifederalists
•Northwest Ordinance of	1787	• checks and balances	•Bill of Rights
•Shays’s Rebellion	•ratification
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Re-create the web below on your paper, and fill it in with specific issues that were debated at the Constitutional Convention.
Choose one issue and explain how the delegates resolved that issue.
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	EVALUATING
Do you think the Federalists or the Antifederalists had the more valid arguments? Support your opinion with examples from the text. Think About:
•	Americans’ experience with the Articles of Confederation
•	Americans’ experience with Great Britain
FORMING OPINIONS
Several states ratified the Constitution only after being assured that a bill of rights would be added to it. In your opinion, what is the most important value of the Bill of Rights? Why?
ANALYZING ISSUES
What was the intent of the Constitution? The Bill of Rights? How effective were these documents in fulfilling their intended purposes? Why are these documents so important?
Review Unit 71
CITIZENSHIP SPOTLIGHT
Symbols of Patriotism
Patriotism, or a love of and identification with one's country and its citizens, is an important characteristic. Feelings of patriotism make citizens willing to act in a way that benefits their nation. Since the formation of the United States following the Revolutionary War, Americans have found different symbols to represent their sense of patriotism. Some of these symbols have been long lasting and others have changed over time, but all have given Americans a sort of common ground. They have also served as a way to demonstrate that patriotism to others.
STARS AND STRIPES
Perhaps the most recognizable symbol of the United States is the American flag. In 1777, the Continental Congress passed an act that established an official flag for the new nation. The design of the flag has changed as new states have joined the nation, and today the flag consists of 13 red and white stripes representing the original colonies and 50 stars on a field of blue representing the states of the Union. Americans demonstrate their patriotism by honoring the flag as a symbol of freedom.
I
NEAREST RECRUITING STATION
FOR U.S.ARMY
UNCLE SAM
As the story goes, Uncle Sam made his first appearance during the War of 1812. Meatpacker Samuel Wilson supplied beef to the U.S. army during the war. He stamped his barrels of beef with “U.S.” for United States, but soldiers knew the food was supplied by “Uncle Sam.” A newspaper reported the story, and Uncle Sam became a widely accepted nickname for the United States. The most famous visual representation of Uncle Sam is probably from the World War I recruiting poster at left, which was created by artist James Montgomery Flagg. The image was repurposed for World War II, and has become well known as a symbol of the United States.
72 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
THE MEDAL OF HONOR
One way to demonstrate patriotism is to serve in the Armed Services. The Armed Services award medals to soldiers to acknowledge the sacrifices they have made in defense of their country. The most prestigious of these awards is the Medal of Honor, shown below, which is the highest award for valor in action against an enemy force that an individual serving in the U.S. Armed Forces can earn. It is sometimes called the Congressional Medal of Honor because it is presented by the president on behalf of Congress. Medal of Honor recipients represent Americans of all races and genders. African American Vernon J. Baker was awarded the medal for his brave service in World War II, and the heroic actions of Hispanic American Roy Benavidez in Vietnam led to his medal. There has been only one female recipient, Mary Edwards Walker, who served as a surgeon during the Civil War. These brave men and women inspire others with their acts of heroism, and the Medal of Honor is an important way to call attention to their patriotism and gallantry.
NATIONAL MOTTOES
Mottoes are used to briefly convey principles or ideals. U.S. currency includes two mottoes that have historical significance to the nation. The motto E Pluribus Unum, meaning “out of many, one,” has appeared on the Great Seal of the United States since the seal was originally adopted by the Continental Congress in 1782. It represents the idea that many individual Americans make up one nation, which continues to be an important ideal. In 1956, President Eisenhower signed legislation adopting “In God We Trust” as the nation’s official motto. The phrase has appeared on U.S. coins since 1795. The motto’s adoption in 1956 reflects the tension of the Cold War and the desire to distinguish the United States from the Soviet Union and its policy of atheism. Today, though some Americans are uncomfortable with the religious nature of the motto, most support it. A 2003 Gallup Poll found that 90 percent of Americans approve of including the words “In God We Trust” on U.S. coins.
Review Unit 73
TEKS1C
Launching the New Nation
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
With George Washington as its first president, the United States began creating a working government for its new nation.
The country’s early leaders established precedents for organizing government that the United States still follows.
•Judiciary Act	•Democratic-
of 1789	Republican
• Alexander	• protective tariff
Hamilton	*XYZ Affair
•cabinet	•Alien and
•two-party system Sedition Acts
•nullification
hmhsocialstudies.com!
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the country’s first political parties.
American's
George Washington
As the hero of the Revolution, George Washington was the unanimous choice in the nation's first presidential election.
When the news reached him on April 14, 1789, Washington accepted the call to duty—despite his uncertainty about how to lead the new country. Two days later he set out for New York City to take the oath of office.
A
Personal Voice george Washington 66 About ten o’clock I bade adieu [farewell] to Mount Vernon, to private life, and to domestic felicity [happiness]; and with a mind oppressed with more anxious and painful sensations than I have words to express, set out for New York . . . with the best dispositions [intentions] to render service to my country in obedience to its call, but with less hope of answering its expectations.99 —The Diaries of George Washington
When Washington took office as the first president of the United States under the Constitution, he and Congress faced a
daunting task to create an entirely new government. The momentous decisions that these early leaders made have resounded through American history.
Washington Heads the New Government
Although the Constitution provided a strong foundation, it was not a detailed blueprint for governing. To create a working government, Washington and Congress had to make many practical decisions. Perhaps James Madison put it best: "We are in a wilderness without a single footstep to guide us."
JUDICIARY ACT OF 1789
One of the first tasks Washington and Congress faced was the creation of a judicial system. The Judiciary Act of 1789 provided for a Supreme Court and federal circuit and district courts. The Judiciary Act allowed state court decisions to be appealed to a federal court when constitutional issues 74
Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
were raised. It also guaranteed that federal laws would remain "the supreme law of the land."
WASHINGTON SHAPES THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH
The nation's leaders also faced the task of building an executive branch. To help the president govern, Congress created three executive departments: the Department of State, to deal with foreign affairs; the Department of War, to handle military matters; and the Department of the Treasury, to manage finances. To head these departments, Washington chose capable leaders—Thomas Jefferson as secretary of state, Alexander Hamilton as secretary of the treasury, Henry Knox as secretary of war. These department heads soon became the president's chief advisers, or cabinet.
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
How did Jefferson’s and Hamilton’s views of government differ?
HAMILTON AND JEFFERSON: TWO CONFLICTING VISIONS
Hamilton and Jefferson held very different political ideas. Hamilton believed in a strong central government led by a prosperous, educated elite of upper-class citizens. Jefferson distrusted a strong central gov- ernment and the rich. He favored strong state and local governments rooted in popular participation. Hamilton believed that commerce and industry were the keys to a strong nation; Jefferson favored a society of farmer-citizens.
HAMILTON’S ECONOMIC PLAN
As secretary of the treasury, Hamilton's job was to put the nation's economy on a firm footing. To do this, he called on the nation to pay off its debts, a large amount of which was incurred during the Revolution. He also proposed the establishment of a national bank that would be funded by both the federal government and wealthy private investors. This bank would issue paper money and handle taxes and other government funds.
Opponents of a national bank, such as James Madison, argued that since the Constitution made no provision for such an institution, Congress had no right to authorize it. This argument began the debate between those, like Hamilton, who favored a loose interpretation of the Constitution and those, like Madison, who favored a strict interpretation—a vital debate that has continued throughout U.S. history.
KEY PLAYERS
THOMAS JEFFERSON 1743-1826
The writer of the Declaration of Independence, Thomas Jefferson began his political career at age 26, when he was elected to Virginia’s colonial legislature. In 1779 he was elected governor of Virginia, and in 1785 he was appointed minister to France. He served as secretary of state from 1790 to 1793.
A
Southern planter, Jefferson was also an accomplished scholar, the architect of Monticello (his Virginia house), an inventor (of, among other things, a machine that made copies of letters), and the founder of the University of Virginia in 1819. Despite his elite background and his ownership of slaves, he was a strong ally of the small farmer and average citizen. ALEXANDER HAMILTON 1755-1804
Born into poverty in the British West Indies, Alexander Hamilton was orphaned at age 13 and went to work as a shipping clerk. He later made his way to New York, where he attended King’s College (now Columbia University). He joined the army during the Revolution and became an aide to General Washington.
Intensely ambitious, Hamilton quickly moved up in society. Although in his humble origins Hamilton was the opposite of Jefferson, he had little faith in the common citizen and sided with the interests of upper-class Americans. Hamilton said of Jefferson's beloved common people: “Your people, sir, your people is a great beast!”
Review Unit 75
Contrasting Views of the Federal Government
HAMILTON
•	Concentrating power in federal government
•	Fear of mob rule
•	Republic led by a well-educated elite
•	Loose interpretation of the Constitution
•	National bank constitutional (loose interpretation)
•	Economy based on shipping and manufacturing
•	Payment of national and state debts (favoring creditors)
•	Supporters: merchants, manufacturers, landowners, investors, lawyers, clergy
JEFFERSON
•	Sharing power with state and local governments; limited national government
•	Fear of absolute power or ruler
•	Democracy of virtuous farmers and tradespeople
•	Strict interpretation of the Constitution
•	National bank unconstitutional (strict interpretation)
•	Economy based on farming
•	Payment of only the national debt (favoring debtors)
•	Supporters: the “plain people"
(farmers, tradespeople)
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Charts 1.	Whose view of the federal government was a wealthy person more likely to favor? Why?
2.	How do you think Jefferson differed from Hamilton in his view of people and human nature?
THE FIRST POLITICAL PARTIES
The differences within Washington's cabinet intensified and soon helped to give rise to a two-party system. Those who shared Hamilton's vision of a strong central government (mostly Northerners) called themselves Federalists. Those who supported Jefferson's vision of strong state governments (mostly Southerners) called themselves Democratic-Republicans. French
revolutionaries storm the Bastille, an infamous prison in Paris, France, on July 14,1789. ▼
THE WHISKEY REBELLION
During Washington's second term, an incident occurred that reflected the tension between federal and regional interests. Previously, Congress had passed a protective tariff, an import tax on goods produced abroad meant to encourage American production. To generate even more revenue, Secretary Hamilton pushed through an excise tax—a tax on a product's manufacture, sale, or distribution—to be levied on the manufacture of whiskey. In 1794, furious whiskey producers in western Pennsylvania refused to pay the tax and attacked the tax collectors. The federal government responded by sending some 13,000 militiamen to end the conflict. The Whiskey Rebellion, as it came to be known, marked the first use of armed force to assert federal authority.
Background
In addition to promoting American goods, the Tariff of 1789 as well as tariffs that followed, provided the majority of the federal government’s revenue until the 20th century.
Challenges at Home and Abroad
At the same time, the new government faced critical problems and challenges overseas as well as at home along the western frontier.
ADDRESSING FOREIGN AFFAIRS
In 1789 a stunning revolution in France ended the French monarchy and brought hope for a government based on the will of the people. By 1793, France was engaged in war with Great Britain as well as with other European countries.
In the United States, reaction to the conflict tended to split along party lines. Democratic-Republicans supported France.
MAIN IDEA
Developing
Historical
Perspective
Why did the United States want access to the Mississippi River?
Federalists wanted to back the British. President Washington took a middle position. He issued a declaration of neutrality, a statement that the United States would support neither side in the conflict. Washington remained wary of foreign involvement throughout his tenure in office. In his farewell address in 1796, he warned the nation to "steer clear of permanent Alliances with any portion of the foreign World."
In another significant foreign matter, Thomas Pinckney negotiated a treaty with Spain in 1795. According to Pinckney's Treaty, Spain agreed to give up all claims to land east of the Mississippi (except Florida) and recognized the 31st parallel as the northern boundary of Florida. Spain also agreed to open the Mississippi River to American traffic and allow traders to use the port of New Orleans. The treaty was important because it helped pave the way for U.S. expansion west of the Appalachians.
CHALLENGES IN THE NORTHWEST
Meanwhile, Americans faced trouble along their western border, where the British still maintained forts and Native Americans continued to resist white settlers. In 1794, after numerous skirmishes, the U.S. military led by General Anthony Wayne defeated a confederacy of Native Americans at the Battle of Fallen Timbers, near present-day Toledo, Ohio. The victory helped to establish the settlers' supremacy in the region. JAY’S TREATY
At the time of the Battle of Fallen Timbers, John Jay, the chief justice of the Supreme Court, was in London to negotiate a treaty with Great Britain. One of the disputed issues was which nation would control territories west of the Appalachian Mountains. When news of Wayne's victory at Fallen Timbers arrived, the British agreed to evacuate their posts in the Northwest Territory because they did not wish to fight both the United States and the French, with whom they were in conflict, at the same time. Although Jay's Treaty, signed on November 19, 1794, was a diplomatic victory, the treaty provoked outrage at home. For one thing, it allowed the British to continue their fur trade on the American side of the U.S.-Canadian border. This angered western settlers. Also, the treaty did not resolve a dispute over neutral American trade in the Caribbean. Americans believed that their ships had the right to free passage there. The British, however, had seized
a number of these ships, confiscating their crews and cargo.
Despite serious opposition, the treaty managed to pass the Senate.
The bitter political fight over Jay's Treaty, along with the growing division between the Federalists and Democratic-Republicans, convinced Washington not to seek a third term.
Adams Provokes Criticism
In the election of 1796, the United States faced a new situation: a contest between opposing parties. The Federalists nominated Vice President John Adams for president, while the Democratic-Republicans chose Thomas Jefferson.
In the election, Adams received 71 electoral votes, while Jefferson received 68. Because the Constitution stated that the runner-up should become vice-president, the country found itself with a Federalist president and a Democratic-Republican vice-president.
The election also underscored the growing danger of sectionalism—placing the interests of one region over those of the nation as a whole. Almost all the electors from the Southern states voted for Jefferson, while all the electors from the Northern states voted for Adams.
Portrait of a young John Adams by Joseph Badger
Review Unit 77
ADAMS TRIES TO AVOID WAR
Soon after taking office, President Adams faced his first crisis: a looming war with France. The French government regarded the U.S.-British agreement over the Northwest Territory a violation of the French-American alliance. In retaliation they began to seize American ships bound for Britain. Adams sent a three-man team to Paris to negotiate a solution. 4s# This team, which included future Chief Justice John Marshall, planned to meet with the French foreign minister, Talleyrand. Instead, the French sent three low-level officials, whom Adams in his report to Congress called X, Y, and Z. The French officials demanded a $250,000 bribe as payment for seeing Talleyrand. News of this insult, which became known as the XYZ Affair, provoked a wave of anti-French feeling at home. "Millions for defense, but not one cent for tribute" became the slogan of the day. In 1798, Congress created a navy department and authorized American ships to seize French vessels. For the next two years, an undeclared naval war raged between France and the United States.
The Federalists called for a full-scale war against France, but Adams refused to take that step. Through diplomacy, the two countries eventually smoothed over their differences. Adams damaged his standing among the Federalists, but he kept the United States out of war.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
© Why did the French begin to seize U.S. ships?
THE ALIEN AND SEDITION ACTS
Although Democratic-Republicans cheered Adams for avoiding war with France, they criticized him mercilessly on many other issues. Tensions between Federalists and Democratic-Republicans rose to a fever pitch. Adams regarded Democratic-Republican ideas as dangerous to the welfare of the nation. He and other Federalists accused the Democratic-Republicans of favoring foreign powers. Many immigrants were active in the Democratic-Republican party. Some of the most vocal critics of the Adams administration were foreign-born. They included French and British radicals as well as recent Irish immigrants who lashed out at anyone who was even faintly pro-British, including the Federalist Adams.
To counter what they saw as a growing threat against the government, the Federalists pushed through Congress in 1798 four measures that became known as the Alien and Sedition Acts. Three of these measures, the Alien Acts, raised the residence requirement for American citizenship from 5 years to 14 years and allowed the president to deport or jail any alien considered undesirable.
Vocabulary alien: belonging to or coming from another country; foreign
sedition: rebellion against one’s country; treason
Analyzing
Political Cartoonsj-
PARIS MONSTER”
“Cinque-tetes, or the Paris Monster” is the title of this political cartoon satirizing the XYZ Affair. On the right, the five members of the French Directory, or ruling executive body, are depicted as a five-headed monster demanding money. The three American representatives, Elbridge Gerry, Charles Pinckney, and John Marshall, are on the left, exclaiming “Cease bawling, monster! We will not give you six-pence!”
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons 1.	How would you contrast the cartoon’s depiction of the U.S. representatives with its depiction of the French Directory?
2.	What other details in the cartoon show the cartoonist’s attitude toward the French?
78 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic
The fourth measure, the Sedition Act, set fines and jail terms for anyone trying to hinder the operation of the government or expressing "false, scandalous, and malicious statements" against the government. Under the terms of this act, the federal government prosecuted and jailed a number of Democratic-Republican editors, publishers, and politicians. Outraged Democratic-Republicans called the laws a violation of freedom of speech guaranteed by the First Amendment.
VIRGINIA AND KENTUCKY RESOLUTIONS
The two main Democratic-Republican leaders, Thomas Jefferson and James Madison, saw the Alien and Sedition Acts as a serious misuse of power on the part of the federal government. They decided to organize opposition to the Alien and Sedition Acts by appealing to the states. Madison drew up a set of resolutions that were adopted by the Virginia Legislature, while Jefferson wrote resolutions that were approved in Kentucky. The resolutions warned of the dangers that the Alien and Sedition Acts posed to a government of checks and balances guaranteed by the Constitution. A
Personal Voice “ Let the honest advocate of confidence [in government] read the alien and sedition acts, and say if the Constitution has not been wise in fixing limits to the government it created, and whether we should be wise in destroying those limits/’
—8th Resolution, The Virginia and Kentucky Resolutions
J MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
How did the Kentucky Resolutions challenge the authority of the federal government?
The Kentucky Resolutions in particular asserted the principle of nullification: the states had the right to nullify, or consider void, any act of Congress that they deemed unconstitutional. Virginia and Kentucky viewed the Alien and Sedition Acts as unconstitutional violations of the First Amendment that deprived citizens of their rights.
The resolutions also called for other states to adopt similar declarations. No other state did so, however, and the issue died out by the next presidential election. Nevertheless, the resolutions showed that the balance of power between the states and the federal government remained a controversial issue. In fact, the election of 1800 between Federalist John Adams and Democratic-Republican Thomas Jefferson would center on this critical debate.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•	Judiciary Act of 1789	• two-party system	• protective tariff
•Alexander Hamilton	•Democratic-Republican	• XYZ Affair
•	cabinet
•Alien and Sedition Acts • nullification
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart, list the leaders, beliefs, and goals of the country’s first political parties.
Federalists	Democratic-Republicans
	
If you had lived in that time, which party would you have favored? Why?
CRITICAL THINKING
EVALUATING LEADERSHIP
How would you judge the leadership qualities of President Washington in his decision to put two such opposed thinkers as Hamilton and Jefferson in his cabinet? Who do you think was the more significant member of the cabinet?
ANALYZING EVENTS
Do you agree with the Democratic-Republicans that the Alien and Sedition Acts were a violation of the First Amendment? Were they necessary? Support your opinion with evidence from the text.
Think About:
•	the intent of the First Amendment
•	what was happening in Europe
•	what was happening in the United States
Review Unit
REVIEW
CHAPTER
ASSESSMENT
TERMS & NAMES
Ml
Hi
The newly formed United States of America creates a new system of government, with a constitution and a bill of rights.
below, write a sentence explaining its
For each term or name significance.
1.	Stamp Act
2.	Thomas Jefferson
3.	Declaration of Independence
4.	Valley Forge
5.	Treaty of Paris
6.	Articles of Confederation
7.	checks and balances
8.	Antifederalists
9.	cabinet
10. Democratic-Republican
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
Colonial Resistance and Rebellion (pages 46-53)
1.	How did the first Continental Congress prepare the way for an armed uprising against Britain?
2.	Why did Jefferson eliminate criticism of the slave trade from the Declaration of Independence?
The War for Independence (pages 58-63)
3.	Why did so many colonists remain loyal to Britain during the Revolutionary War?
4.	How did the American victory at Saratoga affect the war?
Confederation and the Constitution (pages 66-71)
5.	What were some of the problems with the kind of government set up by the Articles of Confederation?
6.	What are historical reasons the Constitution has been amended?
Launching the New Nation (pages 74-79)
7.	What events after 1789 helped to unify the nation?
8.	What issues led to the development of a two-party system?
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one below, show the ideological differences between the two political groups. Federalists	Antifederalists
	
DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
Review the feature on pages 72-73. What is the meaning of the symbols of patriotism represented there? Why are they historically significant? EVALUATING
In your view, which compromise during the Constitutional Convention was more important, the Great Compromise or the Three-Fifths Compromise? Explain. 80 Chapter 2 Revolution and the Early Republic

MM

TEXAS TEST PRACTICE

Use the cartoon and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
1.	This British cartoon was published during the winter of 1775-1776. In it, King George III and his ministers are shown killing the goose that laid the golden egg. The cartoon is criticizing —
A the killing of British soldiers at Concord and Bunker Hill.
B
British response to the Olive Branch Petition. C
John Locke’s theory of natural rights. D
Thomas Paine’s Common Sense. 2.	Both Shays’s Rebellion and the Boston Tea Party were the result of anger over —
F religious intolerance.
G the Boston Massacre.
H taxes.
J slavery.
Use the information in the box and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 3.
Declaration of Independence Battles of Lexington and Concord Second Continental Congress
3.	Which of the following lists the events in chronological order from first to last?
A
Declaration of Independence, Battles of Lexington and Concord, Second Continental Congress B
Battles of Lexington and Concord, Second Continental Congress, Declaration of Independence C
Second Continental Congress, Battles of Lexington and Concord, Declaration of Independence D
Second Continental Congress, Declaration of Independence, Battles of Lexington and Concord 71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests	• Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
"^WriteSmart H COLLABORATIVE LEARNI Think about the issues you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Imagine you are living in the 1780s. Write an article for either The Federalist or Letters from the Federal Farmer, arguing either for or against giving the national government more power. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your article.
£7%
VgjjTUi
"^WriteSmart
Review the chart on page 51. Choose one of the Founding Fathers in this chapter and write him a letter thanking him for his contribution. Make sure to explain why his actions were important to the nation. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your letter.
tCEHTURY
In a small group, reread the Declaration of Independence together to enhance and confirm your understanding. Discuss the intent of the document and why it is so important. Then imagine what it would have been like to see or hear these words for the first time during the Revolutionary era. Work with your group to create a skit in which patriots are sharing the text of the document with other colonists. Make sure that your skit includes the full text of the first three paragraphs as well as an analysis of the text and its meaning.
Review Unit 81
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Understanding Historians’
Interpretations of the Past
DEFINING THE SKILL
Historians ask questions to learn how or why something happened, why someone acted in a certain way, or how different conditions might have changed events. They use the answers to these questions in historiography, the interpretation and presentation of historical research. To write accurate information, historians review primary and secondary sources. They develop a historical perspective that reflects their understanding of events and people in the context of their time. An interpretation may reflect an extreme bias for one view or reflect two different schools of thought. Interpretations of history can change over time as new information is revealed and new sources become available. Historians are often faced with alternative interpretations of a period or event. When faced with opposing viewpoints, good historians do additional research to verify the information presented in each account.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: ANALYZE HISTORICAL INTERPRETATIONS
The two passages below show two alternate interpretations about the American Revolution. When comparing these interpretations, identify the source of the writing and note details and language that helps you identify each author's perspective. "Primarily the American Revolution was a political and constitutional movement and only secondarily one that was either financial, commercial or social. At bottom, the© fundamental issue was the political independence of the colonies, and in the last analysis the conflict lay between the British Parliament and the colonial assemblies...."
M.
Anderson (historian),"The American Revolution: An Interpretation," 1926 "The struggle was not over© high-sounding political and constitutional concepts; over the power of taxation or even, in the final analysis, over natural rights.© It was over colonial manufacturing, wild lands and furs, sugar, wine, tea, and currency, all of which meant, simply, the survival or collapse of English mercantile capitalism within the imperial-colonial framework of the mercantilist system."
M.
Hacker (economics professor), The Triumph of American Capitalism, 1940 © Define the main points in each argument. This will help you compare the interpretations.
© Discount rhetoric or emotional language that is not factual. Here Hacker uses rhetoric to demean the “political and constitutional concepts” that Andrews supports.
0 Consider reasons why the interpretations might differ. Look for information about the author or the source that may give clues. Do you see possible bias? Were the interpretations created in different time periods, so one might have relied on new, previously unavailable sources? In this case, Andrews is a historian while Hacker is an economics professor. How could their different careers affect the authors’ points of view?
O
Investigate how the interpretations differ. What is each author’s interpretation of the event? Summarize each interpretation to compare them. However, you should read additional information, opinions, or studies before you decide with which interpretation to agree. 81 SKI
STRATEGY: MAKE A CHART
In a chart, list the key information about each interpretation that your analysis revealed. Then write a short summary of each interpretation as well as a summary of how and why the interpretations differ. Interpretation #1 Charles M. Anderson (historian), “The American devolution: An Interpretation,” 1926	Interpretation #2 Louis M. Hacker (economics professor), The Triumph of American Capitalism, 1949
Key Information • Main point: The American devolution was caused by political issues.	Key Information •	Main point: The American devolution was caused by economic issues. •	dhetorical language: Author discounts political and constitutional causes by calling them “high-sounding”
Summary According to historian Charles M. Anderson, political issues were the primary cause of the American devolution. The colonies sought political independence. Economic causes were secondary.	Summary Economics professor Louis M. Hacker argues that political and constitutional causes were not at the root of the American devolution. He believes that economic issues led to the conflict.
Comparison Summary Anderson believes political issues were the cause of the American devolution, while Hacker points to economic issues. This difference in interpretation is likely because the two authors represent different schools of thought: Anderson is a historian and Hacker is an economics professor.	
APPLYING THE SKILL
Reread the two passages. Then, conduct research on the Internet or in print sources to find another, different interpretation of the reasons for the American Revolution. Compare this new interpretation to those of Charles M. Andrews and Louis M. Hacker. Recreate the chart above and use the steps on the previous page to add a column to summarize the new interpretation. Then revise the comparison summary to explain why this alternative interpretation might differ from the previous interpretations.
1.	Define main points In each argument.
What does the author think are the reasons for the American Revolution?
2.	Discount rhetoric or emotional language that Is not factual.
Does your source use any rhetoric or emotional language? If so, what?
3.	Consider reasons why the Interpretations might differ.
What makes the source you found qualified to interpret historical events? What reasons might explain any differences from the previous sources?
4.	Investigate how the Interpretations differ.
Does your new source agree with Anderson or Hackler or are new ideas presented? Explain the differences as well as the reasons for them.
81 SK2
iwmW
-
,.A^r
THE


REVOLUTION


V,

<sfc t ,


The American Revolution led to the formation of the United States of America in 1776. Beginning in the 1760s, tensions grew between American colonists and their British rulers when Britain started passing a series of new laws and taxes for the colonies. With no representation in the British government, however, colonists had no say in these laws, which led to growing discontent. After fighting broke out in 1775, colonial leaders met to decide what to
do. They approved the Declaration of Independence, announcing that the American colonies were free from British rule. In reality, however, freedom would not come until after years of fighting.
Explore some of the people and events of the American Revolution online. You can find a wealth of information, video clips, primary sources, activities, and more at i
hmhsocialstudies.com


“I know not what course others wtay take; but at -for nee, give wte Liberty
or give wee death!’
- Patrick Henry
Seeds of Revolution
Watch the video to learn about colonial discontent in the years before the Revolutionary War.
fp "Give Me Liberty or Give Me Death
Read an excerpt from Patrick Henry's famous speech, which urged the colonists to fight against the British.
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION 81 MC2
0
The Living Constitution
Table of Contents for the Living Constitution	
Preamble	84
Article 1	84
Article 2	90
Article 3	92
Article 4	94
Article 5	94
Article 6	95
Article 7	95
Bill of Rights	96
Amendments 11-27	98
Tracing Themes:	
Voting Rights	104
Assessment	106
Projects for Citizenship	108
"0he Constitution was not made to fit us like a straight) acket. In its elasticity lies its chief greatness."
President Woodrow Wilson
Purposes of the Constitution
The official charge to the delegates who met in Philadelphia in 1787 was to amend the Articles of Confederation. They soon made a fateful decision, however, to ignore the Articles and to write an entirely new constitution. These delegates—the "framers"—set themselves five purposes to fulfill in their effort to create an effective
constitution.
1.	Establish Legitimacy
First, the framers of the Constitution had to establish the new government's legitimacy—its right to rule. The patriots' theory of government was set out in the Declaration of Independence, which explained why British rule over the colonies was illegitimate. Now the framers had to demonstrate that their new government met the standards of legitimacy referred to in the Declaration.
For the framers of the Constitution, legitimacy had to be based on a compact or contract among those who are to be ruled. This is why the Constitution starts with the words "We the people of the United States ... do ordain and establish this Constitution."
2.	Create Appropriate Structures
The framers' second purpose was to create appropriate structures for the new government. The framers were committed to the principles of representative democracy. They also believed that any new government must include an important role for state governments and ensure that the states retained some legitimacy to rule within their borders.
To achieve their goals, the framers created the Congress, the presidency, and the judiciary to share the powers of the national government. They also created a system of division of powers between the national government and the state governments.
The original manuscript of the Constitution is now kept in the National Archives in Washington, D.C. ►

am/d


82 The Living Constitution




3. Describe and Distribute Power
RESEARCHING A CONSTITUTIONAL QUESTION
As you study the Constitution, think about a constitutional question that interests you. Here are some possible questions:
How much, if at all, can the federal government or a state government restrict the sale of firearms?
Under what conditions does the president have the power to order American troops into battle without congressional approval?
Under what conditions may a police officer conduct a search of the inside of an automobile?
The framers had as their third purpose to describe governmental powers and to distribute them among the structures they created. The powers of the legislative branch, which are those of Congress, are listed in Article 1, Section 8, of the Constitution. Many of the executive powers belonging to the president are listed in Article 2, Sections 2 and 3. The courts are given judicial powers in Article 3. The words of Article 4 imply that the states retain authority over many public matters.
Once you have chosen a constitutional question, research that question in articles and books on the Constitution. Also check the indexes of well-known newspapers, such as the New York Times, for articles that are relevant.
4.	Limit Government Powers
The fourth purpose of the framers was to limit the powers of the structures they created. Limits on the Congress's powers are found in Article 1, Section 9. Some of the limits on the powers of state governments are found in Article 1, Section 10. There the framers enumerate functions that are delegated to the national government and so cannot be directed by the states.
5.	Allow for Change
The framers' fifth purpose was to include some means for changing the Constitution. Here they faced a dilemma: they wanted to make certain that the government endured by changing with the times, but they did not want to expose the basic rules of government to so many changes that the system would be unstable. So in Article 5 they created a difficult but not impossible means for amending the Constitution.
How to Read
the Constitution
The Constitution, which appears on pages 84-103, is printed on a beige background, while the explanatory notes next to each article, section, or clause are printed on blue. Each article is divided into sections, and the sections are subdivided into clauses. Headings have been added and the spelling and punctuation modernized for easier reading. Portions of the Constitution no longer in use have been crossed out. The Constitutional Insight questions and answers will help you understand significant issues related to the Constitution.
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
RESEARCH WEB LINKS |
Review Unit 83
ji
i
PREAMBLE
Constitutional Insight Preamble
Why does the Preamble say "We the people of the United States . . . ordain and establish" the new government? The Articles of Confederation was an agreement among the states. But the framers of the Constitution wanted to be sure its legitimacy came from the American people, not from the states, which might decide to withdraw their support at any time. This is a basic principle of the Constitution.
ARTICLE 1
Constitutional Insight Section 1
Why does the first article of the Constitution focus on Congress rather than on the presidency or the courts? The framers were intent on stressing the central role of the legislative branch in the new government because it is the branch that most directly represents the people and is most responsive to them.
CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think Congress is still the branch of the federal government that is most directly responsible to the people? Why or why not?
Constitutional Insight Section 2.1
Why are members of the House of Representatives elected every two years? The House of Representatives was designed to be a truly representative body, with members who reflect the concerns and sentiments of their constituents as closely as possible. The framers achieved this timely representation by establishing two years as a reasonable term for members of the House to serve.
CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think electing members of the House of Representatives every two years is a good idea? Why or why not?
The Constitution
PREAMBLE.
Purpose of the Constitution We the people of the United States, in order to form a more perfect Union, establish justice, insure domestic tranquility, provide for the common defense, promote the general welfare, and secure the blessings of liberty to ourselves and our posterity, do ordain and establish this Constitution for the United States of America.
ARTICLE 1. The Legislature
Section 1. Congress All legislative powers herein granted shall be vested in a Congress of the United States, which shall consist of a Senate and House of Representatives.
Section 2. The House of Representatives
1. Elections The House of Representatives shall be composed of members chosen every second year by the people of the several states, and the electors in each state shall have the qualifications requisite for electors of the most numerous branch of the state legislature.
2. Qualifications No person shall be a Representative who shall not have attained to the age of twenty-five years, and been seven years a citizen of the United States, and who shall not, when elected, be an inhabitant of that state in which he shall be chosen.
3. Number of Representatives Representatives and direct taxes shall be apportioned among the several states which may be included within this Union, according to their respective numbers, which-shall be determined by add-ing-to the whole number of free persons,
Including those bound to service for a term of years,- and excluding-
Indians net taxed, three fifths.of all other persons: The actual enu-
meration shall be made within three years after the first meeting of the Congress of the United States, and within every subsequent term of ten years, in such manner as they shall by law direct. The number of Representatives shall not exceed one for every thirty thousand, but each state shall have at least one Representative; and until such -enumeration shall be made, the state of New Hampshire shall be-
•entitled to choose three, Massachusetts eight/ Rhode Island and-
■Providence Plantations ene> Connecticut five, New.York six, New-
Requirements for Holding Federal Office
POSITION J MINIMUM AGE | RESIDENCY CITIZENSHIP
Representative	25	state in which elected	7 years
Senator	30	state in which elected	9 years
President Supreme Court	35	14 years in the United States	natural-born
Justice	none	none	none
Jersey four7.Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one;
Maryland six, Virginia ten, North Carolina
hve-j-South Carolina five, and Georgia three.
4. Vacancies When vacancies happen in the representation from any state, the executive authority thereof shall issue writs of election to fill such vacancies.
5. Officers and Impeachment The House of Representatives shall choose their Speaker and other officers; and shall have the sole power of impeachment.
84 The Living Constitution
1
Section 3. The Senate
1.	Numbers The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each state, chosen by the legislature thereof, for six years; and each Senator shall have one vote.
2.	Classifying Terms Immediately after they shall be assembled in consequence of the first election, they shall be divided as equally as may be into three classes. The seats of the Senators of the first class shall be vacated at the expiration of the second year, of the second class at the expiration of the fourth year, and of the third class at the expiration of the sixth year, so that one third may be chosen every second year; and if vacancies happen by resignation; or otherwise, during-the recess of the legislature of any state, the executive thereof
may make temporary appointments until the next meeting-of-the leg
islaturc, which shall then-fill such vacancies.
3.	Qualifications No person shall be a Senator who shall not have attained to the age of thirty years, and been nine years a citizen of the United States, and who shall not, when elected, be an inhabitant of that state for which he shall be chosen.
4.	Role of Vice-President The Vice-President of the United States shall be President of the Senate, but shall have no vote, unless they be equally divided.
5.	Officers The Senate shall choose their other officers, and also a President pro tempore, in the absence of the Vice-President, or when he shall exercise the office of President of the United States.
6.	Impeachment Trials The Senate shall have the sole power to try all impeachments. When sitting for that purpose, they shall be on oath or affirmation. When the President of the United States is tried, the Chief Justice shall preside: and no person shall be convicted without the concurrence of two thirds of the members present.
7.	Punishment for Impeachment Judgment in cases of impeachment shall not extend further than to removal from office, and disqualification to hold and enjoy any office of honor, trust or profit under the United States; but the party convicted shall nevertheless be liable and subject to indictment, trial, judgment and punishment, according to law.
Section 4. Congressional Elections
1.	Regulations The times, places and manner of holding elections for Senators and Representatives shall be prescribed in each state by the legislature thereof; but the Congress may at any time by law make or alter such regulations, except as to the places of choosing Senators.
2.	Sessions The Congress shall assemble at least once in every year, stteh meeting shall be on the fir3t Monday in December, unless they
■shall by law appoint a different day?
Constitutional Insight Section 3.1
Why are members of the Senate elected every six years? The framers feared the possibility of instability in the government. So they decided that senators should have six-year terms and be elected by the state legislatures rather than directly by the people. The Seventeenth Amendment, as you will see later, changed this. The framers also staggered the terms of the senators so that only one-third of them are replaced at any one time. This stabilizes the Senate still further.
CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think it is important today for the Senate to have more stability than the House of Representatives? If so, why?
Constitutional Insight Sections 3.6
and 3.7 Must an impeached president step down from office? Not necessarily. An impeachment is a formal accusation of criminal behavior or serious misbehavior. By impeaching the president, the U.S. House of Representatives is officially accusing the nation’s chief executive of one or more wrongdoings that warrant possible removal from office. It is then the responsibility of the Senate to conduct a trial to determine whether the president is guilty or not guilty of the charges—and thus whether or not the president must step down. Conviction requires a two-thirds vote of the Senate.
CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think a president should be put on trial for a crime while he or she is still in office? Explain.
Review Unit
Constitutional Insight Section 5.2
What kinds of rules does Congress make for itself? The Constitution gives each house control over most of its rules of procedure and membership. Rules are important, for they help shape the kinds of laws and policies that pass each body. Senate rules allow a filibuster, whereby a senator holds the floor as long as he or she likes in order to block consideration of a bill he or she dislikes. In recent years, a “cloture" rule has been used to end debate if 60 or more members vote to do so.
In contrast, the House of Representatives has rules to limit debate. A rules committee has the primary task of determining how long a bill on the floor of the House may be discussed and whether any amendments can be offered to the bill. In recent years, the power of the Rules Committee has been limited, but being able to shape the rules remains a powerful tool of members of Congress.
CRITICAL THINKING
Why do you think the chair of the Rules Committee is in a powerful position?
Constitutional Insight Section 7.1
Why must all bills to raise revenue originate in the House? Because its members all stand for election every two years, the House was expected to be more directly responsive to the people. The tradition of restricting the powers of taxation to the people’s representatives dates prior to the English Bill of Rights (1689), which granted to Parliament and withheld from the king the right to raise taxes. When colonists protesting the Stamp Act and the Intolerable Acts protested “no taxation without representation,” they were appealing to a longstanding right codified in the English Bill of Rights.
Constitutional Insight Section 7.2
How often do presidents use the veto, and how often is that action overridden? The use of the veto, which is the refusal to approve a bill, depends on many factors, especially the political conditions of the time. Until 1865, only nine presidents exercised the veto for 36 pieces of legislation, including Andrew Jackson who used it 12 times. Since 1865, every president has used the veto power, some on relatively few occasions, others as frequently as over a hundred times. Usually, Congress is unable to produce the votes (those of two-thirds of the members present in each house) needed to override presidential vetoes.
CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think it should be easier for Congress to override a president’s veto? Why or why not?
Section 5. Rules and Procedures
1.	Quorum Each house shall be the judge of the elections, returns and qualifications of its own members, and a majority of each shall constitute a quorum to do business; but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day, and may be authorized to compel the attendance of absent members, in such manner, and under such penalties, as each house may provide.
2.	Rules and Conduct Each house may determine the rules of its proceedings, punish its members for disorderly behavior, and, with the concurrence of two thirds, expel a member.
3.	Congressional Records Each house shall keep a journal of its proceedings, and from time to time publish the same, excepting such parts as may in their judgment require secrecy; and the yeas and nays of the members of either house on any question shall, at the desire of one fifth of those present, be entered on the journal.
4.	Adjournment Neither house, during the session of Congress, shall, without the consent of the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to any other place than that in which the two houses shall be sitting.
Section 6. Payment and Privileges
1.	Salary The Senators and Representatives shall receive a compensation for their services, to be ascertained by law, and paid out of the treasury of the United States. They shall in all cases, except treason, felony and breach of the peace, be privileged from arrest during their attendance at the session of their respective houses, and in going to and returning from the same; and for any speech or debate in either house, they shall not be questioned in any other place.
2.	Restrictions No Senator or Representative shall, during the time for which he was elected, be appointed to any civil office under the authority of the United States, which shall have been created, or the emoluments whereof shall have been increased, during such time; and no person holding any office under the United States shall be a member of either house during his continuance in office.
Section 7. How a Bill Becomes a Law
1.	Tax Bills All bills for raising revenue shall originate in the House of Representatives; but the Senate may propose or concur with amendments as on other bills.
2.	Lawmaking Process Every bill which shall have passed the House of Representatives and the Senate shall, before it become a law, be presented to the President of the United States; if he approves he shall sign it, but if not he shall return it with his objections to that house in which it shall have originated, who shall enter the objections at large on their journal, and proceed to reconsider it. If after such reconsideration two thirds of that house shall agree to pass the bill, it shall be sent, together with the objections, to the other house, by which it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds of that house, it shall become a law. But in all such
86 The Living Constitution
cases the votes of both houses shall be determined by yeas and nays, and the names of the persons voting for and against the bill shall be entered on the journal of each house respectively. If any bill shall not be returned by the President within ten days (Sundays excepted) after it shall have been presented to him, the same shall be a law, in like manner as if he had signed it, unless the Congress by their adjournment prevent its return, in which case it shall not be a law.
3. Role of the President Every order, resolution, or vote to which the concurrence of the Senate and House of Representatives may be necessary (except on a question of adjournment) shall be presented to the President of the United States; and before the same shall take effect, shall be approved by him, or being disapproved by him, shall be repassed by two thirds of the Senate and House of Representatives, according to the rules and limitations prescribed in the case of a bill.
balances reflected in the process of a bill’s becoming a law?
Review Unit 87


Constitutional Insight Section 8 The
powers given to Congress are in Section 8 of Article 1. The first 17 clauses of Section 8 are often called the enumerated powers because they name individually Congress’s specific powers. These powers deal with issues ranging from taxation and the national debt to calling out the armed forces of the various states to governing the nation’s capital district (Washington, D.C.).
The 18th and final clause is different. It gives Congress the power to do what is “necessary and proper” to carry out the enumurated powers. Thus, the enumerated powers of Congress “to lay and collect taxes,” “to borrow money,”
“to regulate commerce,” and “to coin money” imply the power to create a bank in order to execute these powers. Early in the country’s history, this Elastic Clause, as it has been called, was used by Congress to establish the controversial Bank of the United States in 1791 and the Second Bank of the United States in 1816.
CRITICAL THINKING
Why do you think the Elastic Clause is still important today?
MODERN MONEY

Technological advances such as color copiers have led to increased counterfeiting. In response the Bureau of Engraving and Printing (BEP), the federal agency that prints U.S. currency, began adding advanced security features to paper money. The BEP also made a commitment to redesign the nation’s currency every seven to ten years to stay ahead of counterfeiters. The $5, $10, $20, $50, and $100 bills were all redesigned between 2003 and 2010.
iXIXD^
OOGOOOOOT
IQOj
Section 8. Powers Granted to Congress
1.	Taxation The Congress shall have power to lay and collect taxes,
* duties, imposts and excises, to pay the debts and provide for the com-
mon defense and general welfare of the United States, but all duties, imposts and excises shall be uniform throughout the United States,
2.	Credit To borrow money on the credit of the United States;
3.	Commerce To regulate commerce with foreign nations, and among the several states, and with the Indian tribes;
4.	Naturalization, Bankruptcy To establish a uniform rule of naturalization, and uniform laws on the subject of bankruptcies throughout the United States;
5.	Money To coin money, regulate the value thereof, and of foreign coin, and fix the standard of weights and measures;
6.	Counterfeiting To provide for the punishment of counterfeiting the securities and current coin of the United States;
7.	Post Office To establish post offices and post roads;
8.	Patents, Copyrights To promote the progress of science and useful arts, by securing for limited times to authors and inventors the exclusive right to their respective writings and discoveries;
9.	Federal Courts To constitute tribunals inferior to the Supreme Court;
10.	International Law To define and punish piracies and felonies committed on the high seas, and offenses against the law of nations;
11.	War To declare war, grant letters of marque and reprisal, and make rules concerning captures on land and water;
12.	Army To raise and support armies, but no appropriation of money to that use shall be for a longer term than two years;
13.	Navy To provide and maintain a navy;
14.	Regulation of Armed Forces To make rules for the government and regulation of the land and naval forces;
15.	Militia To provide for calling forth the militia to execute the laws of the Union, suppress insurrections and repel invasions;
16.	Regulations for Militia To provide for organizing, arming, and disciplining the militia, and for governing such part of them as may be employed in the service of the United States, reserving to the states respectively the appointment of the officers, and the authority of training the militia according to the discipline prescribed by Congress;
17.	District of Columbia To exercise exclusive legislation in all cases whatsoever, over such district (not exceeding ten miles square) as may, by cession of particular states, and the acceptance of Congress, become the seat of the government of the United States, and to exercise like authority over all places purchased by the consent of the legislature of the state in which the same shall be, for the erection of forts, magazines, arsenals, dockyards, and other needful buildings;—and
18.	Elastic Clause To make all laws which shall be necessary and proper for carrying into execution the foregoing powers, and all other powers vested by this Constitution in the government of the United States, or in any department or officer thereof.
88 The Living Constitution
J
Section 9. Powers Denied Congress
1.	Slave Trade The migration or importation of such persons as any of the states-now existing shall think proper to admit, shall not be prohibited-bythc Congress prior to the year- one thousand eight hundred and eight; but-a taxor duty may be imposed on such importation, not-exceeding ten dollars for each person.
2.	Habeas Corpus The privilege of the writ of habeas corpus shall not be suspended, unless when in cases of rebellion or invasion the public safety may require it.
3.	Illegal Punishment No bill of attainder or ex post facto law shall be passed.
4.	Direct Taxes No capitation, or other direct, tax shall be laid, tmless-in ■proportion to the census-or enumeration herein before directed to
be-takem
5.	Export Taxes No tax or duty shall be laid on articles exported from any state.
6.	No Favorites No preference shall be given by any regulation of commerce or revenue to the ports of one state over those of another: nor shall vessels bound to, or from, one state be obliged to enter, clear, or pay duties in another.
7.	Public Money No money shall be drawn from the treasury, but in consequence of appropriations made by law; and a regular statement and account of the receipts and expenditures of all public money shall be published from time to time.
8.	Titles of Nobility No title of nobility shall be granted by the United States: and no person holding any office of profit or trust under them shall, without the consent of the Congress, accept of any present, emolument, office, or title, of any kind whatever, from any king, prince, or foreign state.
Section 10. Powers Denied the States
1.	Restrictions No state shall enter into any treaty, alliance, or confederation; grant letters of marque and reprisal; coin money; emit bills of credit; make anything but gold and silver coin a tender in payment of debts; pass any bill of attainder, ex post facto law, or law impairing the obligation of contracts, or grant any title of nobility.
2.	Import and Export Taxes No state shall, without the consent of the Congress, lay any imposts or duties on imports or exports, except what may be absolutely necessary for executing its inspection laws; and the net produce of all duties and imposts, laid by any state on imports or exports, shall be for the use of the treasury of the United States; and all such laws shall be subject to the revision and control of the Congress.
Constitutional Insight Section 9
Why didn’t the framers include a bill of rights in the original Constitution? Actually, they did. Article 1, Section 9, defines limits on the powers of Congress, just as the first ten amendments (which we call the Bill of Rights) do.
While some of the provisions focus on such issues as slavery and taxation, there are three explicit prohibitions dealing with citizens’ rights:
•	Writ of habeas corpus. Section 9, Clause 2 says that, except in time of rebellion or invasion, Congress cannot suspend people’s right to a writ of habeas corpus. This means that people cannot be held in prison or jail without being formally charged with a crime.
•Bill of attainder. Clause 3 prohibits the passage of any law that convicts or punishes a person directly and without a trial. Any legislative action that would punish someone without recourse to a court of law is called a bill of attainder.
•	Ex post facto law. The same clause prohibits ex post facto laws. Such a law would punish a person for an act that was legal when it was performed.
The fact that these particular rights were protected by the original document issued by the framers reflects both the framers’ experiences during the Revolution and their fear of excessive government power.
Q CRITICAL THINKING
Why are American citizens today so intent on having protections against government violations of their rights?
Review Unit 89
ARTICLE 2
Constitutional Insight Section 1.1
What exactly is “executive power”? \Ne know the president has it, but nowhere is it explicitly defined. It is most often defined as the power to carry out the laws of the land, but of course no one person can handle such a chore alone. A more appropriate definition is found in Section 3 of this article, which empowers the president to “take care that the laws be faithfully executed." In this sense, the president is the chief administrator.
O CRITICAL THINKING
Why is it important to have an executive who is the chief administrator?
3. Peacetime and War Restraints No state shall, without the consent of Congress, lay any duty of tonnage, keep troops or ships of war in time of peace, enter into any agreement or compact with another state, or with a foreign power, or engage in war, unless actually invaded, or in such imminent danger as will not admit of delay.
ARTICLE 2, The Executive
Section 1. The Presidency
1.	Terms of Office The executive power shall be vested in a President of the United States of America. He shall hold his office during the term of four years and, together with the Vice-President, chosen for the same term, be elected as follows:
2.	Electoral College Each state shall appoint, in such manner as the legislature thereof may direct, a number of electors, equal to the whole number of Senators and Representatives to which the state may be entitled in the Congress; but no Senator or Representative, or person holding an office of trust or profit under the United States, shall be appointed an elector.
3.	Former Method of Electing President The electors shall
meet in their respective states, and vote by balfo-t-for two persons/ of
wham one at least shall not be an inhabitant of the-same.state with
themselves. And they shall make a list-.of all the-persons voted for?
-and-of the number of votes for each; which list-t-foey shall sign and-
■eerti-fy, and transmit scaled to the-seat-of the government of the-
United States, directed to the President of the Senate. The President
■ef-the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and "House of
Representatives, open all the certificates, and the votes shall then be
counted. The person having the greatest number- of votes shall be the
President, if such number be a majority of the whole-number of clce-
tors-appointed; and if there be more than one who have 3uch major-
ity-end have an equal number of-votes/ then the House of ■Representatives shall immediately choose by ballot one of them for-
President; and if no person have-a majority, then from the five high*
est on the list the said house shall in like manner choose the President.
But in choosing the President; the votes shall be taken by states, the-representation-from each state having one vote; a quorum for this
purpose shall consist of a member or members from two thirds of-
the states, and a majority of aR-the sta-tes shall be necessary to a-
eheice. In every case, after the choice of the President, the person-
having the greatest number-of-votes of the electors shall be the Viee-
President. But if there should remain two -or more who have equal
votes, the Senate shall choose-from them by ballot the Vice President.
4.	Election Day The Congress may determine the time of choosing the electors, and the day on which they shall give their votes; which day shall be the same throughout the United States.
90 The Living Constitution
5.	Qualifications No person except a natural-born citizen, er-a citizen of the United States aMhc time of the adoption of this Constitution,
shall be eligible to the office of President; neither shall any person be eligible to that office who shall not have attained to the age of thirty-five years, and been fourteen years a resident within the United States.
6.	Succession In case of the removal of the President from office, or of his death, resignation, or inability to discharge the powers and duties of the said office, the same shall devolve on the Vice-President, and the Congress may by law provide for the case of removal, death, resignation, or inability, both of the President and Vice-President, declaring what officer shall then act as President, and such officer shall act accordingly, until the disability be removed, or a President shall be elected.
7.	Salary The President shall, at stated times, receive for his services a compensation, which shall neither be increased nor diminished during the period for which he shall have been elected, and he shall not receive within that period any other emolument from the United States, or any of them.
8.	Oath of Office Before he enter on the execution of his office, he shall take the following oath or affirmation:—"I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the office of President of the United States, and will to the best of my ability, preserve, protect and defend the Constitution of the United States."
Section 2. Powers of the President
1.	Military Powers The President shall be commander in chief of the army and navy of the United States, and of the militia of the several states, when called into the actual service of the United States; he may require the opinion, in writing, of the principal officer in each of the executive departments, upon any subject relating to the duties of their respective offices, and he shall have power to grant reprieves and pardons for offenses against the United States, except in cases of impeachment.
2.	Treaties, Appointments He shall have power, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, to make treaties, provided two thirds of the Senators present concur; and he shall nominate, and by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint ambassadors, other public ministers and consuls, judges of the Supreme Court, and all other officers of the United States, whose appointments are not herein otherwise provided for, and which shall be established by law; but the Congress may by law vest the appointment of such inferior officers, as they think proper, in the President alone, in the courts of law, or in the heads of departments.
3.	Vacancies The President shall have power to fill up all vacancies that may happen during the recess of the Senate, by granting commissions which shall expire at the end of their next session.
Constitutional Insight Section 1.6
What happens when the vice-president succeeds a dead or incapacitated president? Section 1.6 provides that the vice-president shall assume the powers and duties of the presidential office. But until the Twenty-fifth Amendment was added to the Constitution in 1967, there was no explicit statement in the document that the vice-president is to become president. That procedure owes its origin to John Tyler, the tenth president of the United States, who in 1841 succeeded William Henry Harrison—the first president to die in office. Tyler decided to take the oath of office and assume the title of president of the United States. Congress voted to go along with his decision, and the practice was repeated after Lincoln was assassinated. It would take another century for the written provisions of the Constitution to catch up with the practice.
CRITICAL THINKING
Why is it important to know the order of succession if a president dies in office?
Constitutional Insight Section 2.1
Just how much authority does the president have as ''commander in chief' of the armed forces? The president has the power to give orders to American military forces. There have been several instances in U.S. history when presidents have used that authority in spite of congressional wishes.
President Harry Truman involved the armed forces of the United States in the Korean War from 1950 to 1953 without a congressional declaration of war.
Reacting to criticism of the Vietnam War, Congress in 1973 enacted the War Powers Resolution, making the president more accountable to Congress for any military actions he or she might take. Every president since Richard Nixon has called the resolution unconstitutional. Nevertheless, every president has reported to Congress within 48 hours of sending troops into an international crisis, as is required by the War Powers Resolution.
CRITICAL THINKING
Why is it important that the commander in chief of the armed forces of the United States be a civilian (the president) rather than a military general?
Review Unit
Constitutional Insight Section 3
Is it necessary for the president to deliver a State of the Union address before a joint session of Congress at the start of each legislative year? The Constitution requires only that the president report to Congress on the state of the Union from time to time, and nowhere does it call for an annual address. In 1913, President Woodrow Wilson wanted to influence Congress to take action without delay on some legislation that he thought was important. Wilson revived the tradition—which had been discontinued by Jefferson—of delivering the State of the Union address in person.
O CRITICAL THINKING
How does the president use the State of the Union address today?
Constitutional Insight Section 4
Have high-level public officials ever been impeached? In all of American history, the House has impeached two presidents, and neither had to leave office. In 1868, the Senate found President Andrew Johnson not guilty by one vote after the House impeached him, charging him with violating a Congressional Act. In 1999, senators acquitted President Bill Clinton after the House impeached him with charges of lying under oath and obstructing justice in the attempted cover-up of a White House scandal.
The only other president to come close to impeachment was Richard Nixon. In 1974, the House Judiciary Committee, in what is the first step of the impeachment process, recommended three articles of impeachment against Nixon for his role in the infamous Watergate scandal. Before the full House could vote for or against the articles of impeachment, however, Nixon resigned from office.
CRITICAL THINKING
Why do you think the framers of the Constitution created such an elaborate and seemingly difficult procedure for removing a sitting president?
Section 3. Presidential Duties He shall from time to time give to the Congress information of the state of the Union, and recommend to their consideration such measures as he shall judge necessary and expedient; he may, on extraordinary occasions, convene both houses, or either of them, and in case of disagreement between them, with respect to the time of adjournment, he may adjourn them to such time as he shall think proper; he shall receive ambassadors and other public ministers; he shall take care that the laws be faithfully executed, and shall commission all the officers of the United States.
Section 4. Impeachment The President, Vice-President and all civil officers of the United States shall be removed from office on impeachment for, and conviction of, treason, bribery, or other high crimes and misdemeanors.
(above) Rep. Henry Hyde, chairman of the House Judiciary Committee, swears in Independent Counsel Kenneth Starr during the Committee’s hearings on impeachment charges against President Bill Clinton in 1998; (right) President Andrew Johnson is handed the articles of impeachment before his trial in 1868.
nmiuLco. irie judiciary
J^EDERAL
Courts and Judges The judicial powei ,nflrin	1S ShaU be VCSted in °ne SuPreme Court, and in suck
establish°Th h Congress may from time to time ordain and their offices d ,U	°f the Supreme and inferior courts, shall he
their seTvTces a T8 § behavior' and shall, at stated times, receive fc their continuanceToffice00' 'h""	diminished durin§
The Living Constitution
Section 2. The Courts' Authority
ARTICLE 3
1.	General Authority The judicial power shall extend to all cases, in law and equity, arising under this Constitution, the laws of the United States, and treaties made, or which shall be made, under their authority;—to all cases affecting ambassadors, other public ministers and consuls;—to all cases of admiralty and maritime jurisdiction;—to controversies to which the United States shall
be a party;—to controversies between two or more states;.between
a state and citizens of another state;—between citizens of different states;—between citizens of the same state claiming lands under grants of different states, and between a state, or the citizens thereof, and foreign states; citizcns-or subjects.
2.	Supreme Court In all cases affecting ambassadors, other public ministers and consuls, and those in which a state shall be party, the Supreme Court shall have original jurisdiction. In all the other cases before mentioned, the Supreme Court shall have appellate jurisdiction, both as to law and fact, with such exceptions, and under such regulations, as the Congress shall make.
3.	Trial by Jury The trial of all crimes, except in cases of impeachment, shall be by jury; and such trial shall be held in the state where the said crimes shall have been committed; but when not committed within any state, the trial shall be at such place or places as the Congress may by law have directed.
Constitutional Insight Section 2.1
What is judicial review? Is it the same as judicial power? Actually, they are not the same. Judicial power is the authority to hear cases involving disputes over the law or the behavior of people. Judicial review, in contrast, is a court’s passing judgment on the constitutionality of a law or government action that is being disputed. Interestingly, nowhere does the Constitution mention judicial review. There are places where it is implied (for example, in Section 2 of Article 6), but the only explicit description of the responsibility of the courts is the reference to judicial power in Section 1 of Article 3. The Supreme Court’s power to review laws passed by Congress was explicitly affirmed by the Court itself in Marbury v. Madison. (See page 118.)
CRITICAL THINKING
Why is judicial review, although not mentioned in the Constitution, an important activity of the Supreme Court?
Section 3. Treason
1.	Definition Treason against the United States shall consist only in levying war against them, or in adhering to their enemies, giving them aid and comfort. No person shall be convicted of treason unless on the testimony of two witnesses to the same overt act, or on confession in open court.
2.	Punishment The Congress shall have power to declare the punishment of treason, but no attainder of treason shall work corruption of blood, or forfeiture except during the life of the person attainted.
The Supreme Court of the United States as of August 2010. In the front row (left to right) are Associate Justices Clarence Thomas and Antonin Scalia, Chief Justice John Roberts, and Associate Justices Anthony Kennedy and Ruth Bader Ginsburg. In the back row (left to right) are Associate Justices Sonia Sotomayor, Stephen Breyer, Samuel Alito, and Elena Kagan. ▼
ARTICLE 4
Constitutional Insight Section 2.1
Why do college students attending public universities outside their state of residence have to pay higher tuition fees?
The Supreme Court has interpreted the “privileges and immunities” clause to allow higher tuition fees (and fees for hunting permits, etc.) for nonresidents when a state can give a “substantial reason” for the difference. Since state colleges and universities receive some financial support from the states’ taxpayers, the difference is regarded as justified in most states. If a student establishes residency in the state, he or she can pay in-state tuition after one year.
CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think it is fair that a nonresident must pay higher tuition fees at a state college than a resident of the state must pay? Explain.
Constitutional Insight Section 3.1
Should there be a West Virginia? The Constitution states that “no new state shall be formed or erected within the jurisdiction of any other state” without the permission of the legislature of the state involved and of the Congress. Vermont, Kentucky, Tennessee, and Maine were created from territory taken from existing states, with the approval of the sitting legislatures.
West Virginia, however, is a different story. During the Civil War, the residents of the
westernmost counties of Virginia were angry with their state’s decision to secede from the Union. They petitioned Congress to have their counties declared a distinct state. Congress agreed, and so the state of West Virginia was created. After the Civil War, the legislature of Virginia gave its formal approval, perhaps because it was in no position to dispute the matter.
CRITICAL THINKING
Suppose a section of Texas should decide to become a new state today. Could it do this? Why or why not?
ARTICLE 4. Relations Among States
Section 1. State Acts and Records Full faith and credit shall be given in each state to the public acts, records, and judicial proceedings of every other state. And the Congress may by general laws prescribe the manner in which such acts, records, and proceedings shall be proved, and the effect thereof.
Section 2. Rights of Citizens
1.	Citizenship The citizens of each state shall be entitled to all privileges and immunities of citizens in the several states.
2.	Extradition A person charged in any state with treason, felony, or other crime, who shall flee from justice, and be found in another state, shall on demand of the executive authority of the state from which he fled, be delivered up, to be removed to the state having jurisdiction of the crime.
3.	Fugitive Slaves No person held to service or labor in one stater-
under the laws thereof, escaping into another, shall, in consequence
of any law or-regulation therein, be discharged from such service or
labor, but shall be delivered up on claim of the party to whom such
sendee or labor may be due.
Section 3. New States
1.	Admission New states may be admitted by the Congress into this Union; but no new state shall be formed or erected within the jurisdiction of any other state; nor any state be formed by the junction of two or more states, or parts of states, without the consent of the legislatures of the states concerned as well as of the Congress.
2.	Congressional Authority The Congress shall have power to dispose of and make all needful rules and regulations respecting the territory or other property belonging to the United States; and nothing in this Constitution shall be so construed as to prejudice any claims of the United States, or of any particular state.
Section 4. Guarantees to the States The United States shall guarantee to every state in this Union a republican form of government, and shall protect each of them against invasion; and on application of the legislature, or of the executive (when the legislature cannot be convened), against domestic violence.
ARTICLE 5. Amending the Constitution
The Congress, whenever two thirds of both houses shall deem it necessary, shall propose amendments to this Constitution, or, on the application of the legislatures of two thirds of the several states, shall call a convention for proposing amendments, which, in either case, shall be valid to all intents and purposes, as part of this Constitution, when ratified by the legislatures of three fourths of the several states, or by conventions ir three fourths thereof, as the one or the other mode of ratification may b< proposed by the Congress; provided that no amendment which may bo made prior to the year one thousand eight hundred and eight shall in
any manner affect the first and fourth cJnmnr in the ninth section of the
first article; and that no state, without its consent, shall be deprived of it: equal suffrage in the Senate.
The Living Constitution
r
ARTICLE 6. Supremacy of the
National Government
Section 1. Valid Debts All debts contracted and engagements entered into, before the adoption of this Constitution, shall be as valid against the United States under this Constitution, as under the Confederation.
Section 2. Supreme Law This Constitution, and the laws of the United States which shall be made in pursuance thereof; and all treaties made, or which shall be made, under the authority of the United States, shall be the supreme law of the land; and the judges in every state shall be bound thereby, anything in the constitution or laws of any state to the contrary notwithstanding.
Section 3. Loyalty to Constitution The Senators and Representatives before mentioned, and the members of the several state legislatures, and all executive and judicial officers, both of the United States and of the several states, shall be bound by oath or affirmation to support this Constitution; but no religious test shall ever be required as a qualification to any office or public trust under the United States. ARTICLE 7. Ratification
The ratification of the conventions of nine states shall be sufficient for the establishment of this Constitution between the states so ratifying the same. Done in convention by the unanimous consent of the states present, the seventeenth day of September in the year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred and eighty-seven and of the independence of the United States of America the twelfth. In witness whereof we have hereunto subscribed our names.
George Washington—President and deputy from Virginia
Delaware: George Read, Gunning Bedford, Jr., John Dickinson, Richard Bassett, Jacob Broom
Maryland: James McHenry, Dan of St. Thomas Jenifer, Daniel Carroll Virginia: John Blair, James Madison, Jr.
North Carolina: William Blount, Richard Dobbs Spaight, Hugh Williamson
South Carolina: John Rutledge, Charles Cotesworth Pinckney, Charles Pinckney, Pierce Butler
Georgia: William Few, Abraham Baldwin
New Hampshire: John Langdon, Nicholas Gilman
Massachusetts: Nathaniel Gorham, Rufus King
Connecticut: William Samuel Johnson, Roger Sherman
New York: Alexander Hamilton
New Jersey: William Livingston, David Brearley, William Paterson, Jonathan Dayton
Pennsylvania: Benjamin Franklin, Thomas Mifflin, Robert Morris, George Clymer, Thomas FitzSimons, fared Ingersoll, James Wilson, Gouverneur Morris
ARTICLE 6
Constitutional Insight Section 2 Just how “supreme” is the “law of the land”?
The Constitution and all federal laws and treaties are the highest law of the land. (To be supreme, federal laws must be constitutional.) All state constitutions and laws and all local laws rank below national law and cannot be enforced if they contradict national law. For example, if the United States enters into a treaty protecting migratory Canadian birds, the states must change their laws to fit the provisions of that agreement. That was the decision of the Supreme Court in the case of Missouri v. Holland (1920). The state of Missouri argued that the national government could not interfere with its power to regulate hunting within its borders, but the Supreme Court concluded that the treaty was a valid exercise of national power and therefore took priority over state and local laws. The states had to adjust their rules and regulations accordingly.
CRITICAL THINKING
What would happen if the national law were not supreme?
ARTICLE 7
Constitutional insight Why was ratification by only 9 states sufficient to put the Constitution into effect? In taking such a momentous step as replacing one constitution (the Articles of Confederation) with another, the framers might have been expected to require the agreement of all 13 states. But the framers were political realists. They knew that they would have a difficult time winning approval from all 13 states. But they also knew that they had a good chance of getting 9 or 10 of the states “on board” and that once that happened, the rest would follow. Their strategy worked, but just barely. Although they had the approval of 9 states by the end of June 1788, 2 of the most important states— Virginia and New York—had not yet decided to ratify. Without the approval of these influential states, the new government would have had a difficult time surviving. Finally, by the end of July, both had given their blessing to the new constitution, but not without intense debate.
And then there was the last holdout—Rhode Island. Not only had Rhode Island refused to send delegates to the Constitutional Convention in 1787, but it turned down ratification several times before finally giving its approval in 1790 under a cloud of economic and even military threats from neighboring states.
CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think all 50 states would ratify the Constitution today? Why or why not?
Review Unit 95
BILL OF RIGHTS
Constitutional Insight Amendment 1
Do Americans have an absolute right to free speech? The right to free speech is not without limits. In the case of Schenck v. United States (1919), Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes wrote that this right does “not protect a man in falsely shouting fire in a theatre and causing a panic.” Thus, there are some forms of speech that are not protected by the First Amendment, and Congress is allowed to make laws regarding certain types of expression. (See Schenck v. United States on page 396.)
CRITICAL THINKING
Why is there controversy over freedom of speech today?
Constitutional Insight Amendment 4
Can the police search your car without a court-issued search warrant when they stop you for speeding? The answer, according to Supreme Court decisions, depends on whether they have good reasons—called “probable cause”—for doing so. If a state trooper notices bloody clothing on the back seat of a vehicle she stops for a traffic violation, there might be probable cause for her to insist on searching the vehicle. There is probably not sufficient reason for a search if the trooper is merely suspicious of the driver because of the way he is acting. In such cases, the trooper may make a casual request, such as “Do you mind if I look inside your vehicle?” If the answer is no, then according to the Court, the driver has waived his or her constitutional right against unreasonable searches.
CRITICAL THINKING
Why do you think the right against unreasonable searches and seizures is highly important to most people?
Constitutional Insight Amendment 5
Can you be tried twice for the same offense? The prohibition against “double jeopardy” protects you from having the same charge twice brought against you for the same offense, but you can be tried on different charges related to that offense.
CRITICAL THINKING
What do you think could happen if a person could be tried twice for the same offense?
The Bill of Rights
and Amendments 11-27
Amendments 1-10
Proposed by Congress September 25, 1789. Ratified December 15, 1791.
Amendment 1. Religious and Political Freedom (1791)
Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the government for a redress of grievances.
Amendment 2. Right to Bear Arms (1791) A well-regulated militia being necessary to the security of a free state, the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed.
Amendment 3. Quartering Troops (1791) No soldier shall, in time of peace, be quartered in any house without the consent of the owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by law.
Amendment 4. Search and Seizure (1791) The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and no warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by oath or affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be searched, and the persons or things to be seized.
Amendment 5. Rights of Accused Persons (1791) No person shall be held to answer for a capital or otherwise infamous crime, unless on a presentment or indictment of a grand jury, except in cases arising in the land or naval forces, or in the militia, when in actual service in time of war or public danger; nor shall any person be subject for the same offense to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any criminal case to be a witness against himself, nor be deprived of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor shall private property be taken for public use, without just compensation.
Analyzing
Political
Cartoons
FEDERAL EDIFICE"
This 1788 cartoon celebrated the ratification of the Constitution by New York, the 11th state to ratify it. This left only North Carolina and Rhode Island to complete all 13 pillars of the federal structure.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons 1.	What details in the cartoon convey the unity of the states who have voted for ratification?
2.	How does the cartoonist contrast the states who have voted for ratification with those who have not? What message does this convey?
The Living Constitution
Amendment 6. Right to a Speedy, Public Trial (1791) in
all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy and public trial, by an impartial jury of the state and district wherein the crime shall have been committed, which district shall have been previously ascertained by law, and to be informed of the nature and cause of the accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have the assistance of counsel for his defense.
Amendment 7. Trial by Jury in Civil Cases (1791) In suits at common law, where the value in controversy shall exceed twenty dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a jury shall be otherwise reexamined in any court of the United States, than according to the rules of the common law.
Amendment 8. Limits of Fines and Punishments (1791)
Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel and unusual punishments inflicted.
Amendment 9. Rights of People (1791) The enumeration in the Constitution, of certain rights, shall not be construed to deny or disparage others retained by the people.
Amendment 10. Powers of States and People (1791) The
powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor prohibited by it to the states, are reserved to the states respectively, or to the people.
the
C £ N T 1 N E L.
Voi IX
s On the er eel ion of the Eleventh PILLAR, of the great F,'- j
'	litnaDOMEi-uit 6tg have	re feluitau •‘oag.DH’i cou»i,r
Rife >'
7&e foundation .
bi SAVED.
The FEDERAL EDIFICE, ELEVEN STARS, in quick lucceflion rife—
ELEVEN COLUMNS
Orike our wond’nng eyes, Soono’er the fhall fwcll the beauteous DOME, COLUMBIA’S boaft—and FREEDOM’S hallow d home.
Here fiiall the ARTS in glorious fplendour Ihme. And AGRICULTURE give her llores divine . COMMERCE refin’d, difpenfe us more than gold,
And this new world, teach WISDOM to the old— RELIGION here lhall fix her blefl. abode.
Array’d ih mikhteft, like its parent GOD .
JUSTICE
And LAW, lhall cndlefs PEACE maintain, And/Jr “ SATURNIAN AGE,” return again. Constitutional Insight Amendment 6
What are the Miranda rights? The term comes from the Supreme Court’s decision in Miranda v. Arizona (1966), in which the justices established basic rules that the police must follow when questioning a suspect. If suspected of a crime, you must be told that you have a right to remain silent and that anything you say “can and will” be used against you. You also need to be informed that you have a right to an attorney and that the attorney may be present during questioning. (See Miranda v. Arizona on page 694.)
CRITICAL THINKING
How do the Miranda rights protect you?
Constitutional Insight Amendment 7
What are the “rules of the common law"? The common law is the body of legal practices and decrees developed in England and English-speaking America from a.d. 1066 through the present. It includes Magna Carta (1215), which acknowledges versions of rights affirmed in the Fifth, Sixth, and Seventh Amendments, as well as the English Bill of Rights (1689), which codified rights asserted in the First, Second, Seventh, and Eighth Amendments. The common law also includes the decisions and published opinions of state and federal appeals courts, including the U.S. Supreme Court.
Constitutional Insight Amendment 9
Do you have a right to privacy? Until 1965, no such right had ever been explicitly stated by the courts. That year, in the case of Griswold v. Connecticut, the Court said there is an implied right of American citizens to make certain personal choices without interference from the government; this case concerned the right to use birth control. Years later, in Roe v. Wade (1973), the same logic was used to declare unconstitutional a Texas law restricting a woman’s right to an abortion in the first stages of pregnancy. Since that decision, both the right to privacy and abortion rights have become the focus of major political controversies.
CRITICAL THINKING
How do you define the right to privacy?
Review Unit 97
Amendments 11-27
Amendment 11. Lawsuits Against States (1795) Passed by Congress March 4, 1794. Ratified February 7, 1795.
Note: Article 3, Section 2, of the Constitution was modified by the
Eleventh Amendment.
The Judicial power of the United States shall not be construed to extend to any suit in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of the United States by citizens of another state, or by citizens or subjects of any foreign state.
Constitutional Insight Amendment 12
How did the election of 1800 lead to the Twelfth Amendment? The election ended in a tie vote between the Republican running mates. The election was decided in Jefferson’s favor on the House’s 36th ballot. Almost immediately Alexander Hamilton and others designed an amendment that established that the presidential electors would vote for both a presidential and a vice-presidential candidate. This amendment prevents a repeat of the problem experienced in the 1800 election.
CRITICAL THINKING
Why is the Twelfth Amendment important?
ELECTION REFORM
A new wave of electoral reform efforts was triggered by the controversial presidential election of 2000, in which George W. Bush’s narrow victory over Al Gore left many Americans questioning the system in which a candidate can lose the popular vote but win the election.
Eliminating or reworking the electoral college has been historically the most frequently proposed constitutional amendment. Other reform proposals have included improving access to polling places by allowing voting on weekend hours or making Election Day a national holiday. Still other proposals would modernize inaccurate polling and counting machines or replace them with computer stations or online voting.
Amendment 12. Election of Executives (1804) Passed by Congress December 9, 1803. Ratified June 15, 1804.
Note: A portion of Article 2, Section 1, of the Constitution was superseded by the Twelfth Amendment.
The electors shall meet in their respective states and vote by ballot for President and Vice-President, one of whom, at least, shall not be an inhabitant of the same state with themselves; they shall name in their ballots the person voted for as President, and in distinct ballots the person voted for as Vice-President, and they shall make distinct lists of all persons voted for as President, and of all persons voted for as Vice-President, and of the number of votes for each, which lists they shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to the seat of the government of the United States, directed to the President of the Senate;—the President of the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and House of Representatives, open all the certificates and the votes shall then be counted;—the person having the greatest number of votes for President shall be the President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of electors appointed; and if no person have such majority, then from the persons having the highest numbers not exceeding three on the list of those voted for as President, the House of Representatives shall choose immediately, by ballot, the President. But in choosing the President, the votes shall be taken by states, the representation from each state having one vote; a quorum for this purpose shall consist of a member or members from two thirds of the states, and a majority of all the states shall be necessary to a choice. And if the House of Representatives shall not choose a President whenever the right of choice shall devolve upon them, before the fourth day of March next following-, then the Vice-President shall act as President, as in the case of the death or other constitutional disability of the President. The person having the greatest number of votes as Vice-President shall be the Vice-President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of electors appointed, and if no person have a majority, then from the two highest numbers on the list, the Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the purpose shall consist of two thirds of the whole number of Senators, and a majority of the whole number shall be necessary to a choice. But no person constitutionally ineligible to the office of President shall be eligible to that of Vice-President of the United States.
Amendment 13. Slavery Abolished (1865) Passed by Congress January 31, 1865. Ratified December 6, 1865.
Note: A portion of Article 4, Section 2, of the Constitution was superseded by the Thirteenth Amendment.
The Living Constitution
SECTION 1 Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude, except as a punishment for crime whereof the party shall have been duly convicted, shall exist within the United States, or any place subject to their jurisdiction.
Section 2 Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropri-ate legislation.
Amendment 14. Civil Rights (1868) Passed by Congress June 13, 1866. Ratified July 9, 1868.
Note: Article 1, Section 2, of the Constitution was modified by Section 2 of the Fourteenth Amendment.
Section 1 All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States and of the state wherein they reside. No state shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any state deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws.
Section 2 Representatives shall be apportioned among the several states according to their respective numbers, counting the whole number of persons in each state, excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right to vote at any election for the choice of electors for President and Vice-President of the United States, Representatives in Congress, the executive and judicial officers of a state, or the members of the legislature thereof, is denied to any of the male inhabitants of such state, being twenty-one years of age, and citizens of the United States, or in any way abridged, except for participation in rebellion, or other crime, the basis of representation therein shall be reduced in the proportion which the number of such male citizens shall bear to the whole number of male citizens twenty-one years of age in such state.
Section 3 No person shall be a Senator or Representative in Congress, or elector of President and Vice-President, or hold any office, civil or military, under the United States, or under any state, who, having previously taken an oath, as a member of Congress, or as an officer of the United States, or as a member of any state legislature, or as an executive or judicial officer of any state, to support the Constitution of the United States, shall have engaged in insurrection or rebellion against the same, or given aid or comfort to the enemies thereof. But Congress may, by a vote of two thirds of each house, remove such disability.
Section 4 The validity of the public debt of the United States, authorized by law, including debts incurred for payment of pensions and bounties for services in suppressing insurrection or rebellion, shall not be questioned. But neither the United States nor any state shall assume or pay any debt or obligation incurred in aid of insurrection or rebellion against the United States, or any claim for the loss or emancipation of any slave; but all such debts, obligations and claims shall be held illegal and void.
Section 5 The Congress shall have power to enforce, by appropriate legislation, the provisions of this article.
Constitutional Insight Amendment 14, Section 1 Which personal status takes priority-—that of U.S. citizen or that of state citizen? The Fourteenth Amendment firmly notes that Americans are citizens of both the nation and the states but that no state can "abridge the privileges or immunities” of U.S. citizens, deprive them "of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law,” or deny them “equal protection of the laws.”
What does it mean to have ‘'equal protection of the laws"? Equal protection means that the laws are to be applied to all persons in the same way. The legal system may discriminate between persons—treat them differently, or unequally—if there are relevant reasons to do so. For example, a person’s income and number of dependents are relevant for how much income tax the person should pay; a person’s gender is not. The Supreme Court’s 1954 decision in Brown v. Board of Education of Topeka (see page 708), which declared segregated public schools unconstitutional, was based on an Equal Protection claim; a child’s race is not a relevant reason for the state to assign that child to a particular school.
CRITICAL THINKING
Do you agree or disagree with the Supreme Court’s decision that separate educational facilities are unequal? Explain your position.
The lawyers who successfully challenged segregation in the Brown v. Board of Education case In 1954 included (/eft to right) George E. C. Hayes, Thurgood Marshall, and James M. Nabrit, Jr.
Review Unit
Constitutional Insight Amendment 15
Can you be denied the right to vote? The Fifteenth Amendment prohibits the United States or any state from keeping citizens from voting because of race or color or because they were once slaves. However, a person convicted of a crime can be denied the right to vote, as can someone found to be mentally incompetent.
o CRITICAL THINKING
Why do you think so many people do not exercise the right to vote?
Constitutional Insight Amendment 16
How has the ability of Congress to impose taxes been amended? The Sixteenth Amendment permits a federal income tax and in so doing changes Article 1, Section 9, Clause 4, by stating that Congress has the power to levy an income tax—which is a direct tax—without apportioning such a tax among the states according to their populations.
O CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think Congress should have the power to impose an income tax on the people of the nation? Explain your answer.
Constitutional Insight Amendment 17
How has the way senators are elected been changed? The Seventeenth Amendment changes Article 1, Section 3, Clause 1, by stating that senators shall be elected by the people of each state rather than by the state legislatures.
o CRITICAL THINKING
Why is the direct election of senators by the people of each state important?
Federal agents enforcing the Eighteenth Amendment prepare to smash containers of illegal whiskey.
Amendment 15. Right to Vote (1870) Passed by Congress February 26, 1869. Ratified February 3, 1870.
Section 1 The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any state on account of race, color, or previous condition of servitude.
Section 2 The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
Amendment 16. Income Tax (1913) Passed by Congress July 12, 1909. Ratified February 3, 1913.
Note: Article 2, Section 9, of the Constitution was modified by the
Sixteenth Amendment.
The Congress shall have power to lay and collect taxes on incomes, from whatever source derived, without apportionment among the several states, and without regard to any census or enumeration.
Amendment 17. Direct Election of Senators (1913) Passed by Congress May 13, 1912. Ratified April 8, 1913.
Note: Article 2, Section 3, of the Constitution was modified by the
Seventeenth Amendment.
Clause 1 The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each state, elected by the people thereof, for six years; and each Senator shall have one vote. The electors in each state shall have the qualifications requisite for electors of the most numerous branch of the state legislatures.
Clause 2 When vacancies happen in the representation of any state in the Senate, the executive authority of such state shall issue writs of election to fill such vacancies: Provided, that the legislature of any state may empower the executive thereof to make temporary appointments until the people fill the vacancies by election as the legislature may direct.
Clause 3 This amendment shall not be so construed as to affect the election or term of any Senator chosen before it becomes valid as part of the Constitution.
Amendment 18. Prohibition (1919) Passed by Congress December 18, 1917. Ratified January 16, 1919. Repealed by Amendment 21.
Section 1 After one year from the ratification of this article the manu-
facture, -sale, or transportation of-mtoxicating liquors within, the impor tation thereof into/or the exportation thereof from the United States and all territory subject to the jurisdiction thereof for beverage purposesTs— hereby prohibited.
Section 2 The Congress and the several states 3hall have concurrent
power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
Section 3 This article 3hall be inoperative unless it 3hall have been-
ratified as an amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of the—
several states, as provided in the Constitution, within seven years from—
the date of the submission hcrcof-to the states by the Congress.
10 The Living Constitution
Amendment 19. Woman Suffrage (1920) Passed by Congress June 4, 1919. Ratified August 18, 1920.
Clause 1 The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any state on account of sex.
Clause 2 Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
Amendment 20. "Lame Duck" Sessions (1933) Passed by Congress March 2, 1932. Ratified January 23, 1933.
Note: Article 1, Section 4, of the Constitution was modified by Section 2 of this amendment. In addition, a portion of the Twelfth Amendment was superseded by Section 3.
Section 1 The terms of the President and Vice-President shall end at noon on the 20th day of January, and the terms of Senators and Representatives at noon on the 3rd day of January, of the years in which such terms would have ended if this article had not been ratified; and the terms of their successors shall then begin.
Section 2 The Congress shall assemble at least once in every year, and such meeting shall begin at noon on the 3rd day of January, unless they shall by law appoint a different day.
Section 3 If, at the time fixed for the beginning of the term of the President, the President elect shall have died, the Vice-President elect shall become President. If a President shall not have been chosen before the time fixed for the beginning of his term, or if the President elect shall have failed to qualify, then the Vice-President elect shall act as President until a President shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for the case wherein neither a President elect nor a Vice-President elect shall have qualified, declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in which one who is to act shall be selected, and such person shall act accordingly until a President or Vice-President shall have qualified.
Section 4 The Congress may by law provide for the case of the death of any of the persons from whom the House of Representatives may choose a President whenever the right of choice shall have devolved upon them, and for the case of the death of any of the persons from whom the Senate may choose a Vice-President whenever the right of choice shall have devolved upon them.
Section 5 Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on the 15th day of October following the ratification of this article.
Section 6 This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of three fourths of the several states within seven years from the date of its submission.
Amendment 21. Repeal of Prohibition (1933) Passed by Congress February 20, 1933. Ratified December 5, 1933.
Section 1 The eighteenth article of amendment to the Constitution of the United States is hereby repealed.
Section 2 The transportation or importation into any state, territory, or possession of the United States for delivery or use therein of intoxicating liquors, in violation of the laws thereof, is hereby prohibited.
Constitutional Insight Amendment 19
When did women first get the right to vote in the United States? Women had the right to vote in the state of New Jersey between 1776 and 1807. In the late 19th century, some states and territories began to extend full or limited suffrage to women. Then, in 1920, the Nineteenth Amendment prohibited the United States or any state from denying women the right to vote.
O CRITICAL THINKING
How does the right of women to vote affect politics today?
Constitutional Insight Amendment 20
Why is the Twentieth Amendment usually called the Tame Duck” amendment? A lame duck is a person who continues to hold office after his or her replacement has been elected. Such a person is called a lame duck because he or she no longer has any strong political influence. The Twentieth Amendment reduces the time between the election of a new president and vice-president in November and their assumption of the offices, which it sets at January 20 instead of March 4. It also reduces the time new members of Congress must wait to take their seats from 4 months to about 2 months. They are now seated on January 3 following the November election. As a result, the lame duck period is now quite short.
Q CRITICAL THINKING
Why may the framers have specified a longer lame duck period?
Constitutional Insight Amendment 21
What is unique about the Twenty-first Amendment? Besides being the only amendment that explicitly repeals another, it was the first, and is so far the only one, to have been ratified by the state convention method outlined in Article 5. Congress, probably fearing that state legislatures would not deal swiftly with the issue of repeal, chose to have each state call a special convention to consider the amendment. The strategy worked well, for the elected delegates to the conventions represented public opinion on the issue and ratified the amendment without delay.
CRITICAL THINKING
Why is it necessary to pass another amendment to revoke or remove an existing amendment?
Review Unit 101
CONGRESSIONAL TERM LIMITS
In 1995, the Supreme Court struck down all state laws limiting congressional terms, stating that they were unconstitutional. The Court ruled that only a constitutional amendment—such as the Twenty-second, which limits the president to two terms—could impose term limits on members of Congress.
Proposed constitutional amendments for Congressional term limits were defeated in Congress in 1995 and in 1997.
Constitutional Insight Amendment 23
Why were residents of the District of Columbia without a vote in presidential elections? First, the district was merely an idea at the time the Constitution was written. Second, no one expected the district to include many residents. Third, the framers designed the electoral college on a state framework. By 1960, however, the fact that nearly 800,000 Americans living in the nation’s capital could not vote in presidential elections was an embarrassment. The Twenty-third Amendment gives Washington, D.C., residents the right to vote in presidential elections by assigning them electoral votes.
CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think the District of Columbia should be made a separate state?
Constitutional Insight Amendment 24
Why was the poll tax an issue important enough to require an amendment? The poll tax was used in some places to prevent African-American voters—at least the many who were too poor to pay the tax—from participating in elections. As the civil rights movement gained momentum, the abuse of the poll tax became a major issue, but the national government found it difficult to change the situation because the constitutional provisions in Article 1, Section 4, leave the qualifications of voters in the hands of the states. The Twenty-fourth Amendment changed this by prohibiting the United States or any state from including payment of any tax as a requirement for voting. 0 CRITICAL THINKING
What impact do you think the Twenty-fourth ment has had on elections?
Section 3 This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been rati-fled as an amendment to the Constitution by conventions in the several states, as provided in the Constitution, within seven years from the date of the submission hereof to the states by the Congress.
Amendment 22. Limit on Presidential Terms (1951) Passed by Congress March 21, 1947. Ratified February 27, 1951.
Section 1 No person shall be elected to the office of the President more than twice, and no person who has held the office of President, or acted as President, for more than two years of a term to which some other person was elected President shall be elected to the office of the President more than once. But this article shall not apply to any person holding the office of President when this article was proposed by the Congress,
and shall not prevent any person who may be holding the office of ■■
President, or acting as President, during the term1 within which thi3 arti-
cle becomes operative from holding the office of-President or acting a3— President during the remainder of such tcrtTh-
Section 2 This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of three fourths of the several states within seven years from the date of its submission to the states by the Congress.
Amendment 23. Voting in District of Columbia (1961) Passed by Congress June 17, 1960. Ratified March 29, 1961.
Section 1 The district constituting the seat of government of the United States shall appoint in such manner as Congress may direct: a number of electors of President and Vice-President equal to the whole number of Senators and Representatives in Congress to which the district would be entitled if it were a state, but in no event more than the least populous state; they shall be in addition to those appointed by the states, but they shall be considered, for the purposes of the election of President and Vice-President, to be electors appointed by a state; and they shall meet in the district and perform such duties as provided by the twelfth article of amendment.
Section 2 The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
Amendment 24. abolition of poll taxes (1964) Passed by Congress August 27, 1962. Ratified January 23, 1964.
Section 1 The right of citizens of the United States to vote in any primary or other election for President or Vice-President, for electors for President or Vice-President, or for Senator or Representative in Congress, shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or any state by reason of failure to pay any poll tax or other tax.
Section 2 The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
Amendment 25. Presidential Disability, Succession (1967)
Passed by Congress July 6, 1965. Ratified February 10, 1967.
Note: Article 2, Section 1, of the Constitution was affected by the Twenty-fifth Amendment.
he Living Constitution
Section 1. In case of the removal of the President from office or of his death or resignation, the Vice-President shall become President.
Section 2 Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of the Vice-President, the President shall nominate a Vice-President who shall take office upon confirmation by a majority vote of both houses of Congress.
Section 3 Whenever the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration that he is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, and until he transmits to them a written declaration to the contrary, such powers and duties shall be discharged by the Vice-President as Acting President.
Section 4 Whenever the Vice-President and a majority of either the principal officers of the executive departments or of such other body as Congress may by law provide, transmit to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives their written declaration that the President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Vice-President shall immediately assume the powers and duties of the office as Acting President.
Thereafter, when the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration that no inability exists, he shall resume the powers and duties of his office unless the Vice-President and a majority of either the principal officers of the executive department [s] or of such other body as Congress may by law provide, transmit within four days to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives their written declaration that the President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office. Thereupon Congress shall decide the issue, assembling within forty-eight hours for that purpose if not in session. If the Congress, within twenty-one days after receipt of the latter written declaration, or, if Congress is not in session, within twenty-one days after Congress is required to assemble, determines by two thirds vote of both houses that the President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Vice-President shall continue to discharge the same as Acting President; otherwise, the President shall resume the powers and duties of his office.
Amendment 26. 18-year-old Vote (1971) Passed by Congress March 23, 1971. Ratified July 1, 1971.
Note: Amendment 14, Section 2, of the Constitution was modified by
Section 1 of the Twenty-sixth Amendment.
Section 1 The right of citizens of the United States, who are eighteen years of age or older, to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any state on account of age.
Section 2 The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
Amendment 27. Congressional Pay (1992) Proposed by Congress September 25, 1789. Ratified May 7, 1992.
No law, varying the compensation for the services of the Senators and Representatives, shall take effect, until an election of Representatives shall have intervened.
Constitutional Insight Amendment 26
Why was the Twenty-sixth Amendment passed? Granting 18-year-olds the right to vote became an issue in the 1960s, during the Vietnam War, when people questioned the justice of requiring 18-year-old men to submit to the military draft but refusing them the right to vote. In 1970, Congress passed a voting rights act giving 18-year-olds the right to vote in elections. When the constitutionality of this act was challenged, the Supreme Court decided that states had to honor the 18-year-old vote for congressional and presidential elections but could retain higher age requirements for state and local elections. To avoid confusion at the polls, the Twenty-sixth Amendment was passed. It guarantees 18-year-olds the right to vote in national and state elections.
O CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think 18-year-olds should have the right to vote? Why or why not?
(above) President Richard M. Nixon signs the Twenty-sixth Amendment to the Constitution, adopted in 1971.
Constitutional Insight Amendment 27
How long did it take to ratify this amendment? Although the Twenty-seventh Amendment was one of the 12 amendments proposed in 1789 as part of the Bill of Rights, it was not ratified until 1992. This amendment, which deals with congressional compensation, allows the members of Congress to increase Congressional pay, but delays the increase until after a new Congress is seated.
CRITICAL THINKING
Do you think members of Congress should be able to vote themselves a pay increase? Explain your answer.
Review Unit 103
TRACING THEMES
Voting Rights
When the American colonists declared their independence from Great Britain in 1776, their struggle to create a representative government was just beginning. One of the key elements of that government is the right to vote. Voting is a civic responsibility; our democratic system relies on its citizens to participate in politics. Voting is an act of patriotism that reinforces the strength of the republic and its democratic ideals. It is a part of our national ethos, or character. While the right to vote is not unique to the United States, Americans take great pride in their democratic history and the efforts that they have made to preserve and protect their voting rights.
However, the right to vote has not always been extended to all groups. As a result, excluded groups used various methods to expand suffrage so that they too could exercise this important right. Such methods have included amendments to the U.S. Constitution, lobbying, nonviolent protests, and litigation. As more Americans have been granted this right, we have moved closer to the constitutional goal of forming a "more perfect union."
AMENDMENTS
In 1870, the Fifteenth Amendment was ratified as part of Reconstruction following the Civil War. It attempted to guarantee African American males the right to vote by stating that the right of U.S. citizens “to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any state on account of race, color, or previous condition of servitude.” This extension of suffrage added millions of potential new voters. Unfortunately, the amendment did not protect against denial of suffrage for reasons other than race, so poll taxes, grandfather clauses, and literacy tests were used to prevent African American males from exercising their voting rights. The Twenty-fourth Amendment, ratified in 1964, abolished poll taxes, which extended suffrage yet again. More recently, the Twenty-sixth Amendment, ratified in 1971, granted the right to vote to citizens “eighteen years of age or older.” On the whole, amendments have been an effective means of expanding voting rights.
5W
IB™

LOBBYING
When the delegates to the Seneca Falls Convention gathered in 1848 to begin their campaign for women’s rights, they had no idea that it would take them 72 years of organizing, lobbying, and persuading before they finally won the right to vote. Several organizations took up the banner of women’s suffrage, such as the National American Woman Suffrage Association (NAWSA) and the National Women’s Party (NWP), shown lobbying at left. They used a variety of tactics to achieve their goals. One tactic was lobbying, or exerting pressure on public officials to achieve political goals. For example, the purpose of NAWSA’s Congressional Committee, led by Alice Paul and Lucy Burns, was to convince Congress to pass an amendment granting women the vote. Eventually the lobbying efforts of this and other suffrage groups paid off when the Nineteenth Amendment, ratified in 1920 expanded voting rights to include women.
Chapter 2 Living Constitution
NONVIOLENT PROTESTS
In the 1960s, the African American civil rights movement adopted a strategy of nonviolent protest to seek expansion of voting rights. Although the Fifteenth Amendment guaranteed that voting rights could not be denied due to race, states had implemented other methods to discriminate against African Americans and keep them from the polls. Members of the civil rights movement staged sit-ins, boycotts, marches, and other forms of nonviolent civil action in order to protest discrimination and segregation. In 1965, Martin Luther King Jr. began a campaign of nonviolent protests and marches in Selma, Alabama, to gain voting rights for African Americans. In response to these events, President Johnson asked for the speedy passage of the Voting Rights Act of 1965. The new law gave the federal government the power to break down longstanding barriers to African American voting rights.
LITIGATION
In many instances, litigation has been used to protect and reclaim voting rights. For example, in the 1915 decision Guinn v. United States the U.S. Supreme Court struck down Oklahoma’s grandfather clause because it violated the rights guaranteed to African Americans in the Fifteenth Amendment. Litigation has also been used to ensure that minority votes carry equal weight. In 1973, for instance, the Mexican American Legal Defense and Educational Fund (MALDEF) won a victory in White v. Regester by arguing that reapportionment plans for the Texas legislature disenfranchised African American and Mexican American voters. The Supreme Court upheld a lower court decision requiring certain counties to be redistricted. Through these and other cases, litigation has proven to be an important tool for protecting the expansion of Hi voting rights in the United States.
Review Unit 105
THE LIVING CONSTITUTION ASSESSMENT
MAIN IDEAS
Article 1. The Legislature
1.	Why does the legislative branch of the government represent the people most directly? What is the principal job of this branch?
2.	Why are there more members of the House of Representatives than of the Senate?
3.	Name four powers Congress has.
4.	What powers are denied to Congress? to the states?
Article 2. The Executive
5.	What is the main function of the executive branch?
6.	Who officially elects the president of the United States? Explain.
7.	How can the president lose his or her job before election time?
Article 3. The Judiciary
8.	How are Supreme Court justices appointed?
9.	What kinds of cases go before the Supreme Court? Why is the Court’s decision whether to hear a case important?
Article 4. Relations Among States
10.	To extradite is to send a fugitive back to the state in which he or she is accused of committing a crime. How is this an example of relations among states?
Article 5. Amending the Constitution
11.	How many states must ratify an amendment for it to become part of the Constitution? Why do you think it takes that many?
Article 6. Supremacy of the National Government
12.	How does Article 6 establish the supremacy of the Constitution?
The Amendments
13.	Does the First Amendment allow complete freedom of speech—the right to say anything you want at any time, anywhere? Explain your answer.
14.	What is the newest amendment? What protection does that amendment give to the American people?
THINKING CRITICALLY
TAKING NOTES
The powers of the federal government are separated among the three branches. Create a chart like the one below that shows how the Constitution’s framers used checks and balances to ensure that no one branch of the government could become too much stronger than the others. Executive	Legislative	Judicial
		
MAKING INFERENCES
How does the Constitution reflect the fear of too strong a central government? EVALUATING
The Bill of Rights guarantees a defendant a speedy, public trial. Do you think it is being observed today? Explain. ANALYZING MOTIVES
Why did the framers make it so difficult to amend the Constitution? Do you agree or disagree with their philosophy? Explain. DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
Review the feature on pages 104-105. What methods have people used to expand voting rights? Do you think some methods might be more effective than others? Explain your answer. 
TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the cartoon and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
Use the quotation and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 2.
“ [The president] shall have power, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, to make treaties, provided two thirds of the Senators present concur; and he shall nominate, and by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint ambassadors, other public ministers and consuls, judges of the Supreme Court, and all other officers of the United States . . . ”
—U.S. Constitution, Art. 2, Sec. 2, part 2
2.	The passage describes checks on the power of—
F the president.
G the Senate.
H the judiciary.
J the states.
3.	Which of the following must ratify Constitutional amendments?
“It’s Awful The Way They’re Trying To Influence Congress. Why Don’t They Serve Cocktails And Make Campaign
Contributions Like We Do?”
In the Constitutional Convention, the framers adopted certain principles to be embodied in the Constitution. Which of the following Constitutional principles does the cartoon support?
A
The federal government’s power should be divided into separate branches. B
The federal government should be stronger than the state governments. C
The federal legislature should be responsive to the will of the people. D
The legislature and the president should check each other’s power. Congress the people the states the president
7\ hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
"’J'WriteSmart
Imagine that it is 1787, and you are a citizen of one of the original thirteen states. Your vote is necessary to ratify the new Constitution that has been approved by the convention in Philadelphia. You have studied the seven articles and listened to spirited discussions about how you and your state will be affected. Write a journal entry in which you express your views about this document that is so important for the new United States. Make sure you include references to what you have read and heard about the Constitution. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your journal entry.
MULTIMEDIA ACTIVITY
XCWWItY
Review the introduction to the Tracing Themes feature on page 104. Then use the Internet to research why voting is important to the democratic process and to our nation’s continued success. Identify how participation in the democratic process reflects our national ethos, our patriotism, our civic responsibility, and our progress to build a “more perfect union.” Create a multimedia presentation to explain your findings to the class.
7\ hmhsocialstudies.com
Review Unit 107
PROJECTS FOR CITIZENSHIP
Applying the Constitution
The United States Constitution is admired the worid over. But a healthy democracy depends on the continuing participation of its citizens—including you. Here are four projects that will help you learn the rewards and challenges of responsible citizenship.

hmhsocialstudies.com
RESEARCH WEB LINKS
Visit the links for the Constitution
for more information that will help you with these Projects for Citizenship
PROJECT 1
PROJECT 2
Becoming an Educated Voter
ENDORSING A CANDIDATE
Choose a campaign for elective office and learn about the issues and the candidates in the campaign. After doing your research, write an endorsement, or a statement in favor, of one of the candidates.
LEARNING ABOUT THE CANDIDATES
✓	Examine news media and news services. During campaigns, some services and publications offer endorsements that explain why particular candidates are worthy of support.
✓Get information from political parties. They provide information on the candidates, but their perspective is biased toward their own candidates. The major parties have Internet sites, as do many local groups and individual candidates.
✓	Contact interest groups, such as the Sierra Club and the National Association of Manufacturers. They often list candidates' positions on issues and support candidates who share their beliefs.
✓Look at databases and voters' guides published by nonpartisan organizations such as the League of Women Voters and Project Vote Smart.
As you use each source, try to identify any bias. Think about the following questions.
•	What does the author of this source stand to gain from supporting a particular candidate?
•	Is the information in the source complete and accurate?
•	Does the author use loaded or inflammatory language?
PRESENTING YOUR PROJECT
Expressing Political Opinions
WRITING A LETTER TO THE EDITOR
Identify an issue that concerns you. Then write a letter or send an e-mail message about that issue to the editor of a newspaper or magazine.
WRITING A PERSUASIVE LETTER
✓	Find an issue that has been in the news lately and about which you feel strongly.
✓	Read recent articles, editorials, and cartoons in newspapers or magazines. Notice how they have addressed this issue.
✓	Compose a letter that clearly and concisely explains your views about the issue you have chosen. Your letter should also include reasons and facts that support your opinion on the issue. It might also advocate some specific action to be taken to address the issue.
✓identify the person to whom you should send your letter, and note any requirements the newspaper or magazine has for writing letters to the editor.
✓Edit your letter carefully. Be sure to use standard grammar, spelling, sentence structure, and punctuation.
PRESENTING YOUR PROJECT
Present the letter you wrote to the rest of the class. When you do, explain why you chose to write about this issue.
A student expresses her political opinions as she addresses an audience.
After you have written your endorsement, you might send it to a media outlet, such as a newspaper or a television station, or post it on the Internet. Or you might send it to your local or school newspaper.
he Living Constitution
PROJECT 3
PROJECT 4
Understanding How to Lobby
PLANNING A LOBBYING CAMPAIGN
Form a committee with other students to organize a lobbying campaign—a campaign to influence legislation or public policy. Create a plan for the campaign that includes materials to be presented to government officials. In creating your plan, keep the following points in mind.
CREATING A LOBBYING PLAN
^Establish a clear goal of what you want to achieve.
Make sure all members of the group understand and agree with the established goal.
^Identify the appropriate people to lobby—the people who can best help you to achieve your goal. For example, if your group is planning to lobby to have a bill passed, you would lobby the legislators who will vote on the bill. However, if your group wants to lobby for a local improvement—such as cleaning up an abandoned factory site—you should lobby the local officials who make those decisions.
•^Gather statistics and other information that support your case. Explore a variety of resources, including the library, the Internet, and news services. Conduct interviews with appropriate state or local officials. Use the information you gather to develop a brief written report that can be given to the officials you intend to lobby.
^Organize public opinion in favor of your case. Gather signatures on petitions or conduct a letter-writing campaign to encourage people who support your goal to contact government officials. You can also create fliers calling attention to your cause.
^Present your case to government officials firmly but politely. Practice your presentation several times before you actually appear before them.
PRESENTING YOUR PROJECT
Share your lobbying plan with the rest of the class in the form of a written proposal that includes materials, such as petition forms, that you will use in your lobbying effort. If you implement your lobbying plan, describe to the class what response you received from the officials you lobbied.
Volunteering in your Community
MAKING AN ORAL REPORT
Identify a local community organization that you might want to help. Find out what kinds of volunteer activities the organization has, such as answering phones in the office, serving food to the homeless, or cleaning vacant lots. Then volunteer to participate in one of those activities. Prepare an oral report to present to the rest of the class about your experiences as a volunteer. Keep the following points in mind as you choose which organization to help.
A group of young volunteers in the Summer of Service project discusses plans with carpenters.
SUGGESTIONS FOR VOLUNTEERING
•^Decide what kinds of public service projects might interest you. You might talk to your parents, a teacher, friends, a local church, or a local political organization to learn what kinds of volunteer services are needed in your community.
✓	Call local community organizations to find out what kinds of volunteer opportunities they offer and decide whether you would like to volunteer for those projects.
✓	Decide what cause you want to support and identify an organization that addresses that cause.
✓	Decide what type of work you want to do and work with that organization.
PRESENTING YOUR PROJECT
Deliver an oral report to your class about your experiences as a volunteer. Explain why you chose the specific volunteer activity that you did. Describe the activity you performed. Then explain what effect your volunteering had as well as whether you felt the experience was a good one.
Review Unit 109
On September 17, Constitution Day, Americans celebrate the signing of the United States Constitution in 1787. In Texas, social studies classrooms also observe Celebrate Freedom Week. This important celebration focuses on the meaning and significance of the two foundational documents in United States history—the Declaration of Independence and the U.S. Constitution.
The Declaration of Independence
One of the most eloquent and influential documents ever written, the Declaration of Independence gave the reasons the American colonies were willing to fight for independence. Thomas Jefferson, the main author of the document, began by explaining the purpose of government. Part of this first section, known as the Preamble, must be recited by Texas students during Celebrate Freedom Week. It is perhaps the most famous statement from the document:
l/l/e hold these Truths to be self-evident, that all Men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty, and the Pursuit of Happiness. That to secure these Rights, Governments are instituted among Men, deriving their just Powers from the Consent of the Governed.
—Declaration of Independence
* In CONGRESS, July 4, t77t>.
imowtouT^ecfardten ,»*, States
t*/t M ■avtMsst/ Qttftuwn/, &
"	//,rzrT
These powerful words established the idea that governments exist to serve their citizens, and that people have basic natural rights that government cannot take away. Throughout our history, these words have inspired Americans to fight for and expand the definitions of freedom, equality, and basic rights. For example, women's rights advocates echoed the language of the Declaration of Independence in 1848 when they demanded the right to vote by declaring that "all men and women are created equal." Abolitionists and civil rights leaders also looked to the Declaration of Independence in their struggles to end slavery and ensure that African Americans were guaranteed equal rights. Even beyond America, the Declaration of Independence has inspired independence and prodemocracy movements around the world. It continues to inspire us today.
Independence Day
Each 4th of July, Americans celebrate the adoption of the Declaration of Independence with parades, fireworks, picnics, fairs, and ceremonies honoring our freedoms and government.
KEY FACTS
DECLARATION OF INDEPENDENCE
Date
•	Adopted July 4,1776 by the Continental Congress
Key Author
•	Thomas Jefferson
Intent
•	To announce formally that the 13 American colonies considered themselves independent states no longer part of the British Empire
•	To explain and justify the reasons for independence
Meaning and importance
•	Established in writing the principle that all people have certain fundamental rights that no government can take away
•	Explained that the purpose of government is to serve citizens
•	Influenced the U.S. Constitution and Bill of Rights
•	Has inspired people throughout history in the struggle for equality, justice, and basic human rights
©Philip Gould/ CORBIS; ©Renzo luo/Shutterstock
4 I

The U.S. Constitution
Building on the Declaration of Independence, the U.S. Constitution established the system of government that is still in effect today. Another truly groundbreaking document, the Constitution established the rule of law and made clear that no one, including the highest government official, is above it. The document's opening words, the Preamble, elegantly state its purpose:
We the People of the United States, in Order to form a more perfect Union, establish Justice, insure domestic Tranquility, provide for the common defense, promote the general Welfare, and secure the Blessings of Liberty to ourselves and our Posterity, do ordain and establish this Constitution for the United States of America.
—United States Constitution
The three opening words, We the People, which were written so much larger than
the others, announced dramatically that in the United States the people are the	|
source of all government power and authority.	I
To protect people's rights and to balance power, the Constitution set up a system	f
that divides power among federal and state governments. Federal power is	I
supreme, and certain powers are shared or reserved for the states. A system	«
of checks and balances further divides power among three equal branches of	|
government—legislative, executive, and judicial.	1
i
The Constitution also includes a process by which it can be amended, or	|
changed. It is sometimes referred to as "a living document" for this reason;	®
it can be added to and improved by the people to reflect changes in society.
Since it was adopted in 1787, the Constitution has been amended 27 times. These
amendments have abolished slavery, guaranteed women and minorities the right
to vote and to receive equal treatment under the law, changed voting and	,
election procedures, and made other improvements to our government.
CF3
One of the most important parts of the Constitution is the Bill of Rights—the first 10 amendments. The Bill of Rights helps protect the rights described in the Declaration of Independence. For example, the Bill of Rights protects such basic rights as freedom of speech, press, and religion as well as due process rights such as the right to a fair trial. The Bill of Rights was an important early addition to the Constitution because it stated in writing some of the specific individual rights and protections guaranteed for all Americans.
KEY FACTS
BILL OF RIGHTS
THE CONSTITUTION
Date
•	Adopted September 17,1787 by the Constitutional Convention
Key Author
•	James Madison
Intent
•	To establish a new national government of the United States
•	To replace the Articles of Confederation
•	To safeguard the freedoms of all Americans, present and future
Meaning and Importance
•	Established the supreme law of the land for the United States that is still in effect today
•	Identifies the people as the ultimate source of government power
•	Sets up a system of power sharing among the federal and state government
•	Divides power into three equal branches of government
•	Includes an amendment process
•	Includes the Bill of Rights and other amendments that have protected and expanded individual rights and freedoms
1st Amendment	Protects freedom of religion, speech, press, assembly, petition
2nd Amendment	Protects the right to keep and bear arms
3rd Amendment	Provides restrictions on quartering soldiers in citizens7 homes
4th Amendment	Bans unreasonable searches or seizures
5th Amendment	Protects citizens against self-incrimination and being tried twice for the same crime; prohibits government from depriving citizens of life, liberty, or property without due process of law
6th Amendment	Protects citizens' right to a swift and fair trial
7th Amendment	Guarantees right to trial by jury
8th Amendment	Protects citizens against cruel and unusual punishment
9th Amendment	States that citizens have rights beyond those specifically written in the Constitution
10th Amendment	States that powers not given to the government are reserved to the states, or to the people
©Renzo fuo/Shutterstock
Research Activity
As part of Celebrate Freedom Week, conduct research on the two most
influential documents in U.S. history. First, read the Declaration of Independence
and explore how it influenced subsequent American history and has inspired
people for generations. In your own words, explain how the Declaration o
Independence is still relevant in our lives today. Then, review a copy o t e ,
U.S.
Constitution to explore how it has been amended throughout our nation s history. Give an example of how the Constitution or Bill of Rights protects your
rights, and the rights of others.
Celebrate Freedom Week 109 CF4
Essential Question
myNotebook
How did the Jeffersonian Era, the Age of Jackson, and manifest destiny contribute to the growth of the nation during the first half of the 19th century?
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
12B, 21C, 22A,22B, 29B
SECTION 1: The Jeffersonian Era
Main Idea During the presidencies of Thomas Jefferson, James Madison, and James Monroe, the country grew in both size and prestige.
SECTION 2: The Age of Jackson
Main idea During a time of growing sectionalism, Andrew Jackson's election in 1828 ushered in a new era of popular democracy.
SECTION 3: Early British Colonies Main Idea Through settlement and war, the United States greatly expanded its boundaries during the mid-1800s.
SECTION 4: The Colonies Come of Age Main Idea Inventions and economic developments in the early 19th century helped transform American society.
SECTION 5: Reforming American Society Main Idea Throughout the mid-19th century, men and women embarked on a widespread effort to solve problems in American society.
:	Treaty of
: Ghent is signed, end-: ing the War of 1812.
:	j Congress
: passes the : Missouri : Compromise.
(The port of New Orleans, Louisiana, was a major center for the cotton trade.
USA
WORLD
[1803! The United States purchases the Louisiana Territory from France.
1800
!18021 Toussaint L’Ouverture defeats French forces sent to recapture Saint Domingue (Haiti).
1810
: H?ip] Mexican War : [18151 Napoleon : of Independence	: is defeated at
• begins.	: Waterloo.
: [l821] Mexico • wins its independ-: ence from Spain.
James	John
Monroe Quincy Adams
Presidents
Thomas
Jefferson
Thomas
Jefferson
James
Madison
James
Madison
Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
1833J Great Britain abolishes slavery in the empire.
1845 The Great Potato Famine begins in Ireland.
: 118481 Karl Marx's The ;• Communist Manifesto : is published.

Andrew
Jackson
Martin Van Buren
William Henry Harrison
John Tyler (William Henry Harrison dies)
Zachary Taylor
Millard Fiimore (Zachary Taylor dies)
h*
jr.
Review Unit 111
TEKS 12B, 21C
The Jeffersonian Era
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms ft Names
During the presidencies of Thomas Jefferson, James Madison, and James Monroe, the country grew in both size and prestige.
Today’s Democratic Party traces its roots to Jefferson and the Democratic-Republicans.
Democratic-
Republicans
Jeffersonian
republicanism
Marbury v.
Madison
John Marshall
judicial review Louisiana Purchase impressment James Monroe Monroe Doctrine
^^^^^^^bneAmerican'sStor^^^^^^^R
i
|s’5r hmhsocialstudies.com 1
< P jr j i /. r i J Ji ll J
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the major events of the Jefferson, Madison, and Monroe administrations.
Patrick Gass was among those who took part in the famous Lewis and Clark expedition. Setting out in 1804, this expedition traveled overland from St. Louis, Missouri, to the Pacific. Along the way, Gass kept a journal in which he took notes on people, places, and the dramatic events he witnessed. Gass described one of those events in his journal entry for May 14, 1805.
A
Personal Voice Patrick gass “ This forenoon we passed a large creek on the North side and a small river on the South. About 4 in the afternoon we passed another small river on the South side near the mouth of which some of the men discovered a large brown bear, and six of them went out to kill it. They fired at it; but having only wounded it, it made battle and was near seizing some of them, but they all fortunately escaped, and at length succeeded in dispatching it. These bears are very bold and ferocious; and very large and powerful.
The natives say they have killed a number of their brave men.99
Patrick Gass
—/A Journal of the Voyages and Travels of a Corps of Discovery
The journey Gass undertook with Lewis and Clark helped lay the foundations for expansion. The explorers brought back to the new government reports about the vast regions that lay to the west. Meanwhile, other Americans continued to shape the government in their growing nation.
Jefferson’s Presidency
The election of 1800 pitted Thomas Jefferson, a leader of the Democratic-Republicans (sometimes shortened to "Republicans"), against President John Adams and his Federalist Party. It was a hard-fought struggle. Each party hurled wild charges at the other. Democratic-Republicans called Adams a tool of the
(Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
rich who wanted to turn the executive branch into a British-style monarchy. Federalists protested that Jefferson was a dangerous supporter of revolutionary France and an atheist.
THE ELECTION OF 1800
In the balloting in the electoral college, Jefferson defeated Adams by eight electoral votes. However, since Jefferson's running mate, Aaron Burr, received the same number of votes as Jefferson, the House of Representatives was called upon to break the tie and choose between the two running mates. For six feverish days, the House took one ballot after another— 35 ballots in all. Finally, Alexander Hamilton intervened. Although Hamilton opposed Jefferson's philosophy of government, he regarded Burr as unqualified for the presidency. Hamilton persuaded enough Federalists to cast blank votes that Jefferson received a majority of two votes. Burr then became vice-president. The deadlock revealed a flaw in the electoral process established by the Constitution. As a result, Congress passed the Twelfth Amendment, which called for electors to cast separate ballots for president and vice-president. This system is still in effect today.
In his inaugural address, Jefferson extended the hand of peace to his opponents. "Every difference of opinion is not a difference of principle," he said. "We are all Republicans; we are all Federalists."
MAIN IDEA |
Making
Inferences
$ How did Jefferson’s actions reflect his theory of government?
MAIN IDEA
Evaluating
Decisions
Why was the principle of judicial review important for the future of the Supreme Court?
SIMPLIFYING THE GOVERNMENT
Jefferson's theory of government, often called Jeffersonian republicanism, held that the people should control the government and that a simple government best suited the needs of the people. In accord with his belief in decentralized power, Jefferson tried to shrink the government and cut costs wherever possible. He reduced the size of the army, halted a planned expansion of the navy, and lowered expenses for government social functions. He also rolled back Hamilton's economic program by eliminating all internal taxes and reducing the influence of the Bank of the United States. Jefferson was the first president to take office in the new federal capital, Washington, D.C. Though in appearance the city was a primitive place of dirt roads and few buildings, its location between Virginia and Maryland reflected the growing importance of the South in national politics. In fact,
Jefferson and the two presidents who followed him—
James Madison and James Monroe—all were from Virginia. This pattern of Southern dominance underscored the declining influence of both New England and the Federalists in national political life at that time.
JOHN MARSHALL AND THE SUPREME COURT
Just before leaving office, President Adams had tried to influence future judicial decisions by filling federal judge-ships with Federalists. But the signed documents authorizing some of the appointments had not been delivered by the time Adams left office. Jefferson argued that these appointments were invalid and ordered Madison, his secretary of state, not to deliver them. This argument led to one of the most important Supreme Court decisions of all time in Marbury v.
Madison (1803). (See page 118.) The Federalist chief justice John Marshall declared that part of Congress's Judiciary Act of 1789, which would have forced Madison to hand over the papers, was unconstitutional. The decision strengthened the Supreme Court by establishing the principle of judicial review—the ability of the Supreme Court to declare a law, in this case an act of Congress, unconstitutional.
I
John Marshall, Chief Justice of the United States (about 1832), by William James Hubard.
Review Unit 113
THE LOUISIANA PURCHASE
In 1800, Napoleon Bonaparte of France had persuaded Spain to return to France the Louisiana Territory, the land spanning from the Mississippi River west to the Rocky Mountains. France had handed this territory over to Spain in 1762, during the French and Indian War, but Napoleon planned to use it as a "breadbasket" for the colonial empire that he hoped to build in the West Indies. Many Americans were alarmed when they heard of this transfer, as they feared that a strong French presence in North America would force the United States into an alliance with Britain. However, by 1803, Napoleon had abandoned his ideas of an American empire and offered to sell the Louisiana Territory to the United States. Jefferson doubted whether the Constitution gave him the power to make such a purchase, but he decided to proceed. At a price of $15 million, the Louisiana Purchase more than doubled the size of the United States. Under the direction of President Jefferson, Meriwether Lewis and William Clark organized and led a group, including Patrick Gass, and set off in 1804 to explore the new territory. The explorers brought back valuable information about the West and showed that transcontinental travel was possible.
Madison and the War of 1812
Jefferson easily won reelection in 1804 but a crisis clouded his second administration. Renewed fighting between Britain and France threatened American shipping. The crisis continued into the administration of James Madison, who was elected president in 1808. Some four years later, Madison led the nation into the War of 1812 against Great Britain.
THE CAUSES OF THE WAR
Although France and Britain both threatened U.S. ships between 1805 and 1814, Americans focused their anger on the British. One reason was the British policy of impressment, the practice of seizing Americans at sea and "impressing," or drafting, them into the British navy. Americans grew even angrier after learning that officials in British Canada were supplying arms to Native Americans in support of their ongoing battle against American settlers. A group of young congressmen from the South and the West, known as the war hawks, demanded war. THE COURSE OF THE WAR
By the spring of 1812, President Madison had decided to commit America to war against Britain, and Congress approved the war declaration in mid-June. Republican funding cuts and a lack of popular support had left the American military with few volunteers and ill-prepared for war. Britain, however, was too preoccupied with Napoleon in Europe to pay much attention to the Americans. Nonetheless, the British scored a stunning victory in August of 1814, when they brushed aside American troops and sacked Washington, D.C. Madison and other federal officials fled the city as the British burned the Capitol, the Presidential Mansion, and other public buildings. The most impressive American victory occurred at the Battle of New Orleans. There, on January 8, 1815, U.S. troops led by General Andrew Jackson of Tennessee routed a British force. Ironically, British and American diplomats had already signed a peace agreement before the Battle of New Orleans, but news of the pact had not reached Jackson in time. The Treaty of Ghent, signed on Christmas Eve, 1814, declared an armistice, or end to the fighting.
THE CONSEQUENCES OF THE WAR
The war had three important consequences. First, it led to the end of the Federalist Party, whose members generally opposed the war. Second, it encouraged the growth of American industries to manufacture products no longer available from Britain because of the war. Third, it confirmed the status of the United States as a free and independent nation Background
Napoleon Bonaparte seized control of the French
government in 1799 and expanded French territory until his defeat at Waterloo in Belgium in 1815.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What were the principal consequences of the War of 1812?
Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation


Lewis and Clark Expedition, 1804-1806
^Thisdollar coW honors Sacajawea, young Shoshone woman, who
served as ^Interpreter and guide fortheexpedition. *

C?

>
April 25-26, 1805 In high winds and cold, Lewis searches by land for the | Yellowstone River. He rejoins Clark at the junction of the
April 7, 1805 A party of 32, including Clark’s black servant York, French-Canadian trader Charbonneau, his wife Sacajawea, and their son, depart at 5 p.m. to continue the journey. High northwest wind but otherwise fair weather.
Mandan Village, by Karl Bodmer
Fort Clatsop i
November 3,1804 A hard wind from the northwest sets in as the party makes camp.
XV
, '/frf Iz./ /f
fr;; i ■fau&jL. (X. o
'wz'.
V- >>// w
BRITISH
TERRITORY

u*. &j) mua... y? *<«*«*, o^. "fUL ‘fa—*'- i*
ft-	M z,
rt«..
Zui,£«
y ^S>	„ &,wjp £*vt~
ig$
of
4/XewiSa<ClarfcZ
A ' y.w
i-X
/ X „if	Journey west, 1804-1805 Journey home, 1806
	Lewis's route home
--«►	Clark's route home
W
Fort 0	250	500 miles
0	250	500 kilometers 	i	r-'f-i < v	1 Z ZF
f M
X. 'J* 4
x k ■ X GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1- Movement About how many miles did the
expedition travel on its route to the Pacific Ocean?
2. Movement On average, how many miles per day did they travel from Fort Clatsop to the place where the party split up on July 3, 1806?

1
Review Unit 115
Nationalism Shapes Foreign Policy
As with James Madison, foreign affairs dominated the first term of President James Monroe, who was elected in 1816. His secretary of state, John Quincy Adams, established a foreign policy based on nationalism—a belief that national interests should be placed ahead of regional concerns, such as slavery in the South or tariffs in the Northeast.
TERRITORY AND BOUNDARIES
High on Adams's list of national interests were the security of the nation and the expansion of its territory. To further these interests, Adams arranged the Convention of 1818, which fixed the U.S. border at the 49th parallel from Michigan west to the Rocky Mountains. Adams also reached a compromise with Britain to jointly occupy the Oregon Territory, the territory west of the Rockies, for ten years. He also convinced Don Luis de Onis, the Spanish minister to the United States, to transfer Florida to the United States. The Adams-Oms Treaty (1819) also established a western boundary for the United States that extended along the Sabine River from the Gulf of Mexico north to the Arkansas River to its source, and then north to the 42nd parallel, and west to the Pacific Ocean. THE MONROE DOCTRINE
When Napoleon invaded Portugal and Spain in 1807, the two countries did not have the money or military force to both defend themselves and keep control of their overseas territories at the same time. But when Napoleon was defeated in 1815, Portugal and Spain wanted to reclaim their former colonies in Latin America. Meanwhile, the Russians, who had been in Alaska since 1784, were establishing trading posts in what is now California. In 1821, Czar Alexander I of Russia
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What were the major boundary disputes resolved by John Quincy Adams?
U.S.
Boundary Settlements, 1803-1819 
claimed that Alaska's southern boundary was the 51st parallel, just north of Vancouver Island. He forbade foreign vessels from using the coast north of this line.
With Spain and Portugal trying to move back into their old colonial areas, and with Russia pushing in from the northwest, the United States knew that it had to do something. Many Americans were interested in acquiring northern Mexico and the Spanish colony of Cuba. Moreover, the Russian action posed a threat to American trade with China, which brought huge profits.
I MAIN IDEA
Predicting
Effects
Do you think that the Monroe Doctrine would be a source of peace or conflict for the United States? Why?
Accordingly, in his 1823 message to Congress, President Monroe warned all European powers not to interfere with affairs in the Western Hemisphere. They should not attempt to create new colonies, he said, or try to overthrow the newly independent republics in the hemisphere. The United States would consider such action "dangerous to our peace and safety." At the same time, the United States would not involve itself in European affairs or interfere with existing colonies in the Western Hemisphere.
A
Personal Voice president james monroe “Our policy in regard to Europe ... is not to interfere in the internal concerns of any of its powers. . . . But in regard to those continents [of the Western Hemisphere], circumstances are eminently and conspicuously different. It is impossible that the allied [European] powers should extend their political system to any portion of either continent without endangering our peace and happiness/9 —Annual Message to Congress, December 2, 1823
James Monroe
These principles became known as the Monroe Doctrine. The doctrine became a foundation for future American policy and represented an important step onto the world stage by the assertive young nation. At home however, sectional differences soon challenged national unity, requiring strong patriotic sentiments and strong leaders like Andrew Jackson to hold the nation together, JE>
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance. •Democratic-Republicans	•John Marshall	•Louisiana Purchase
•Jeffersonian republicanism	•judicial review	•impressment
• Marbury v. Madison
•James Monroe
•Monroe Doctrine
!
■ 1
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one below, list an event from the administration of each president and note its significance.
Thomas Jefferson	
Event	
Significance	
James Madison	
Event	
Significance	
James Monroe	
Event	
Significance
CRITICAL THINKING
EVALUATING LEADERSHIP
How successful was Thomas Jefferson as president in achieving his goal of simplifying the government? Think About:
•	the Louisiana Purchase
•	military spending
•	Jefferson’s attitude toward the national bank
Tii
4.	EVALUATING
Why was the War of 1812 a turning point for the early United States?
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
How did the Monroe Doctrine assert American nationalism?

Review Unit 117
$
ig
MARBURY v. MADISON (1803)
ORIGINS OF THE CASE A
few days before Thomas Jefferson's inauguration, outgoing president John Adams appointed William Marbury to be a justice of the peace. But the commission was not delivered to Marbury. Later, Jefferson's new secretary of state, James Madison, refused to give Marbury the commission. Marbury asked the Supreme Court to force Madison to give him his commission. THE RULING
The Court declared that the law on which Marbury based his claim was unconstitutional, and therefore it refused to order Madison to give Marbury his commission. LEGAL REASONING
Writing for the Court, Chief Justice John Marshall decided that Marbury had a right to his commission, and he scolded Madison at length for refusing to deliver it.
However, he then considered Marbury's claim that, under the Judiciary Act of 1789, the Supreme Court should order Madison to deliver the commission. As Marshall pointed out, the powers of the Supreme Court are set by the Constitution, and Congress does not have the authority to alter them. The Judiciary Act attempted to do just that.
Marshall reasoned that, since the Constitution is the "supreme law of the land, no law that goes against the Constitution can be valid."
“If.. . the courts are to regard the constitution, and the constitution is superior to any ordinary act of the legislature, the constitution, and not such ordinary act, must govern the case to which they both apply. ”
If an act of Congress violates the Constitution, then a judge must uphold the Constitution and declare the act void. In choosing to obey the Constitution, the Supreme Court did declare the Judiciary Act unconstitutional and void, and so refused to I grant Marbury's request.
LEGAL SOURCES
U.S. CONSTITUTION
U.S. CONSTITUTION, ARTICLE III, SECTION 2
(1789) “The judicial power shall extend to all cases . . . arising under this Constitution, the laws of the United States, and treaties made . . . under their authority."
U.S. CONSTITUTION, ARTICLE VI,
CLAUSE 2 (1789)
“This Constitution, and the laws of the United States which shall be made in pursuance thereof. . . shall be the supreme law of the land; and the judges in every State shall be bound thereby."
RELATED CASES
FLETCHER v. PECK (1810)
The Court ruled a state law unconstitutional for the first time.
COHENS v. VIRGINIA (1821)
The Court overturned a state court decision for the first time.
GIBBONS v. OGDEN (1824)
The Court ruled that the federal Congress—not the states—had the power under the Constitution to regulate interstate commerce.
◄ Chief Justice John Marshall
•< William Marbury
WHY IT MATTERED
In 1803, interest in Marbury's commission was primarily about partisan politics. The fight was just one skirmish in the ongoing battle between Federalists, such as Adams, and Democratic-Republicans, led by Jefferson and Madison, which had intensified in the election of 1800.
When Jefferson won the election, Adams made a final effort to hinder Jefferson's promised reforms. Before leaving office, he tried to fill the government with Federalists, including the "midnight" justices such as Marbury. Madison's refusal to deliver Marbury's appointment was part of Jefferson's subsequent effort to rid his administration of Federalists.
Marshall's opinion in Marbury might seem like a victory for Jefferson because it denied Marbury his commission. However, by scolding Madison and extending the principle of judicial review—the power of courts to decide whether or not specific laws are valid—the Court sent a message to Jefferson and to the Congress that the judiciary had the power to affect legislation. The Marshall Court, however, never declared another act of Congress unconstitutional.
HISTORICAL IMPACT
In striking down part of the Judiciary Act, an act of Congress, Marshall gave new force to the principle of judicial review. The legacy of John Marshall and of Marbury is that judicial review has become an essential component of democratic government; by ensuring that Congress exercises only those powers granted by the Constitution, the courts protect the sovereignty of the people.
Of equal importance, the principle of judicial review plays a vital role in our federal system of checks and balances. With Marbury, the judicial branch secured its place as one of three coequal branches of the federal government. The judiciary has no power to make laws or to carry them out. However, judges have an important role in deciding what the law is and how it is carried out.
Interpretations of the Constitution can differ. In another decision, McCulloch v. Maryland (1819), Chief Justice Marshall expressed the opinion that Article I, Section 8, of the Constitution guaranteed to Congress implied powers that are not explicitly stated. Such an interpretation is called a loose construction of the Constitution, which means it allows for reasonable inferences based on the text. A strict construction, on the other hand, allows only for a literal reading of the text. Each Supreme Court justice has his or her own ideas about how to interpret the Constitution. As these justices decide cases, their rulings may change the meaning of the Constitution, by determining the rights of citizens and the government.
Through the 2007-2008 term, the Court had rendered 162 decisions striking down—in whole or part— acts of Congress. It had also voided or restricted the enforcement of state laws 1,179 times. That the entire country has with few exceptions obeyed these decisions, no matter how strongly they disagreed, proves Americans' faith in the Supreme Court as the protector of the rule of law.
THINKING CRITICALLY
CONNECT TO HISTORY
1. Comparing Read encyclopedia articles about another Marshall Court decision, such as Fletcher v. Peck, Cohens v. Virginia, or Gibbons v. Ogden. Compare that decision with Marbury and consider what the two cases and opinions have in common. Write a paragraph explaining the major similarities between the cases.
CONNECT TO TODAY
2. Visit the links for Historic Decisions of the Supreme Court to research a recent Supreme Court decision involving judicial review of an act of Congress. Write a case summary in which you describe the law’s purpose, the Court’s ruling, and the potential impact of the decision.
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
INTERNET ACTIVITY
Review Unit 119
The Age of Jackson
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
During a time of growing sectionalism, Andrew Jackson’s election in 1828 ushered in a new era of popular democracy.
Jackson’s use of presidential powers laid the foundation for the modern presidency.
•	Henry Clay	-John Quincy
•American System Adams •John C. Calhoun 'Jacksonian
•	Missouri	democracy
Compromise	‘Trail of Tears
•Andrew Jackson ‘John Tyler
One American’s Story
' hmhsocialstudies.com
»TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on key events during the Age of Jackson.
Robert Fulton designed and built the first commercially successful steamboat. In 1807 his Clermont made the 150-mile trip up the Hudson River from New York City to Albany in 32 hours.
Another one of Fulton's boats, the Paragon, was so luxurious that it had a paneled dining room and bedrooms. Fulton even posted regulations on his luxurious steamboats.
A
Personal Voice Robert fulton “As the steamboat has been fitted up in an elegant style, order is necessary to keep it so; gentlemen will therefore please to observe cleanliness, and a reasonable attention not to injure the furniture; for this purpose no one must sit on a table under the penalty of half a dollar each time, and every breakage of tables, chairs, sofas, or windows, tearing of curtains, or injury of any kind must be paid for before leaving the boat. ’ Steamboats, like the one pictured here, could move against a river’s current or a strong wind.
—quoted in Steamboats Come True: American Inventors in Action
Steamboats like the one Fulton described did more than comfortably transport passengers. They also carried freight and played an important role in uniting the nation economically. Although tensions continued to arise between the different sections of the nation, a growing national spirit kept the country together. This spirit was ultimately personified by Andrew Jackson—a self-made man from the growing West who was both confident and dynamic.
Regional Economies Create Differences
In the early decades of the 19th century, the economies of the various regions of the United States developed differently. The Northeast began to industrialize while the South and West continued to be more agricultural.
10 Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
How did agriculture and industry support a market economy in the North?
EARLY INDUSTRY IN THE UNITED STATES
The Industrial Revolution—large-scale production resulting in massive change in social and economic organization began in Great Britain in the 18th century and gradually reached the United States. Industry took off first in New England, whose economy depended on shipping and foreign trade. Agriculture there was not highly profitable, so New Englanders were more ready than other Americans to embrace new forms of manufacturing—and prime among these were mechanized textile, or fabric, mills.
Soon, farmers in the North began to specialize in one or two crops or types of livestock (such as corn and cattle), sell what they produced to urban markets, and then purchase with cash whatever else they needed from stores. Increasingly, these were items made in Northern factories. As a result, a market economy began to develop in which agriculture and manufacturing each supported the growth of the other.
THE SOUTH REMAINS AGRICULTURAL
Meanwhile, the South continued to grow as an agricultural power. Eli Whitney's invention of a cotton gin (short for "engine," or machine) in 1793 made it possible for Southern farmers to produce cotton more profitably. The emergence of a Cotton Kingdom in the South—and THE COTTON GIN
In 1794, Eli Whitney was granted a patent for a “new and useful improvement in the mode of Ginning Cotton.” Workers who previously could clean only one pound of cotton by hand per day could now clean as much as fifty pounds per day. Because of Whitney’s cotton gin, cotton production in the United States increased from three thousand bales in 1790 to more than two million bales in 1850.
A hand crank turns a series of rollers.
i A roller with tight rows of wire teeth removes seeds from the cotton fiber.
The cotton seeds fall into a hopper.
Raw cotton is placed in the gin.
A “clearer compartment” catches the cleaned cotton.
A second roller, with brushes, removes the cleaned cotton from the roller.
The teeth pass through a slotted metal grate, pushing the cotton fiber through but not the seeds, which are too large to pass.
7
Review Unit 121
thus the need for more field labor—contributed to the expansion of slavery. Between 1790 and 1820, the enslaved population increased from less than 700,000 to over 1.5 million. In the North, things were different. By 1804, states north of Delaware had either abolished slavery or had enacted laws for gradual emancipation. Slavery declined in the North, but some slaves remained there for decades.
Vocabulary emancipation: the
act of freeing from bondage or slavery
Balancing Nationalism and Sectionalism
These economic differences often created political tensions between the different sections of the nation. Throughout the first half of the 19th century, however, American leaders managed to keep the nation together.
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
THE SUPREME COURT
BOOSTS NATIONAL POWER
As Henry Clay promoted the American System in an effort to strengthen nationalism, the Supreme Court also boosted national power with two significant decisions.
In McCulloch v. Maryland (1819), the high court denied Maryland the right to tax the Bank of the United States, thus strengthening the authority of the national government over state governments.
In Gibbons v. Ogden (1824), the Court further bolstered federal power by affirming the national government’s right to regulate interstate commerce.
CLAY’S AMERICAN SYSTEM
As the North, South, and West developed different economies, President Madison developed a plan to move the United States toward economic independence from Britain and other European powers. In 1815 he presented his plan to Congress. It included three major points: •	establishing a protective tariff
•	rechartering the national bank
•	sponsoring the development of transportation systems and other internal improvements in order to make travel throughout the nation easier
House Speaker Henry Clay promoted the plan as the "American System."
Madison and Clay supported tariffs on imports to protect U.S. industry from British competition. Most Northeasterners also welcomed protective tariffs. However, people in the South and West, whose livelihoods did not depend on manufacturing, were not as eager to tax European imports. Nevertheless, Clay, who was from the West (Kentucky), and John C. Calhoun, a Southerner (South Carolina), convinced congressmen from their regions to approve the Tariff of 1816. Also in 1816, Congress voted to charter the Second Bank of the United States for a 20-year period and to create a unified currency.
HISTORY
VIDEO
Jackson's Personality and Legacy
71 hmhsocialstudies.com!
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
What was the intention behind the “American System”?
THE MISSOURI COMPROMISE
In spite of these efforts to unify the national economy, sectional conflicts remained part of American politics. In 1818 settlers in Missouri requested admission to the Union. Northerners and Southerners disagreed, however, on whether Missouri should be admitted as a free state or a slave state. Behind the leadership of Henry Clay, Congress passed a series of agreements in 1820-1821 known as the Missouri Compromise. Under these agreements, Maine was admitted as a free state and Missouri as a slave state. The rest of the Louisiana Territory was split into two parts. The dividing line was set at 36°30'
north latitude. South of the line, slavery was legal. North of the line_except in
Missouri—slavery was banned.
The Election of Andrew Jackson
Despite these sectional tensions, the story of America in the early 19th century was one of expansion—expanding economies, expanding territory, and expanding democracy. The man who embraced the spirit of that expansion and to many personified it was Andrew Jackson, who captured the presidency in 1828.
j MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
$ What agreements made up the Missouri Compromise?
!2 Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
Vocabulary corrupt: marked by bribery
THE ELECTION OF 1824
In 1824, Andrew Jackson lost his bid for the presidency to John Quincy Adams. Jacksonians, or followers of Jackson, accused Adams and Jackson's political enemy, Henry Clay, of stealing the presidency. Then, because Adams appointed Clay secretary of state, the Jacksonians claimed Adams had struck a corrupt bargain. The split between Clay and Jackson tore apart the Democratic-Republican party. While Clay and his faction were called the National Republican Party, the Jacksonians became known as the Democratic Party.
EXPANDING DEMOCRACY CHANGES POLITICS
During John Quincy Adams's presidency, most states had eased property requirements for voting, thereby enlarging the voting population. In the election of 1824, approximately 350,000 white males voted for the presidency. In 1828, over three times that number voted. Many of these new voters were common people who viewed the rugged westerner Jackson as their champion. The support of this new voting bloc gave Jackson victory in the election of 1828. KEY PI
AVf;p -•/ V ■
k-
r,.
Jacksonian Democracy

THE SPOILS SYSTEM
Jackson's ideal of political power for all classes is often called Jacksonian democracy. As part of this philosophy, Jackson sought to give common people a chance to participate in government. He did this through the spoils system, in which new administrations hire their own supporters to replace supporters of the previous administration. Using the spoils system, Jackson gave away huge numbers of jobs to friends and also to political allies. President-elect Andrew Jackson greets well-wishers on his way to Washington, D.C., to be inaugurated president in 1S29.


ANDREW JACKSON 1767-1845
Andrew Jackson thought of himself as a man of the people. He had been born in poverty in the Carolina backcountry, the son of Scots-Irish immigrants. He was the first president since George Washington without a college education.
At the time of his election at the age of 61, however, Jackson was hardly one of the common people. He had built a highly successful career in Tennessee in law, politics, land speculation, cotton planting, and soldiering. His home, the Hermitage, was a mansion, not a log cabin. Anyone who owned more than a hundred slaves, as Jackson did, was very wealthy.
jNITI
Review Unit 123

THE INDIAN REMOVAL ACT
In 1830 Congress, with the support of Jackson, passed the Indian Removal Act. Under this law, the federal government provi funds to negotiate treaties that would force the Native Americans to move west. Many of the tribes signed removal treaties. However, the Cherokee Nation refused and fought the government in the courts. In 1832, the Supreme Court ruled in Worcester v. Georgia that the state of Georgia could not regulate the Cherokee Nation by law or invade Cherokee lands. However, Jackson refused to abide by the Supreme Court decision, saying, "John Marshall has made his decision; now let him enforce it." jjy
THE TRAIL OF TEARS
In the years following the Court's ruling, U.S. troops rounded up the Cherokee and drove them into camps to await the journey west. ▲
This painting depicts the Trail of Tears.
HISTORY
VIDEO
Jackson v. the Cherokee and South Carolina
MiIhIiH-WI-MhI
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Events
How did the federal government initially try to enforce the Indian Removal Act?
A
Baptist missionary described the scene. A
Personal Voice evan jones “The Cherokees are nearly all prisoners. They had been dragged from their houses and encamped at the forts and military places, all over the nation. In Georgia especially, multitudes were allowed no time to take anything with them except the clothes they had on. Well-furnished houses were left as prey to plunderers. ”
—Baptist Missionary Magazine, June 16, 1838
Beginning in the fall of 1838, the Cherokee were sent off in groups of about 1,000 each on the 800-mile journey, mostly on foot. As winter came, more and more Cherokee died. The Cherokee buried more than a quarter of their people along the Trail of Tears, the forced marches the Cherokee followed from Georgia to the Indian Territory. (See map on page 125.)
Nullification and the Bank War
In 1824 and again in 1828, Congress increased the Tariff of 1816. Jackson’s vice-president, John C. Calhoun of South Carolina, called the 1828 tariff a Tariff of Abominations because he blamed it for economic problems in the South.
The South's economy depended on cotton exports. Yet the high tariff on manufactured goods reduced British exports to the United States, and because of this, Britain bought less cotton. With the decline of British goods, the South was now forced to buy the more expensive Northern manufactured goods. From the South's point of view, the North was getting rich at the expense of the South.
THE NULLIFICATION CRISIS
To try to free South Carolinians from the tariff, Calhoun developed a theory of nullification. Calhoun's theory held that the U.s' Constitution was based on a compact among the sovereign states. If the Constitution had been established by 13 sovereign states, he reasoned, then the states must still be sovereign, and each would have the right to determine whether acts of Congress were constitutional. If a state found an act to be unconstitutional, the state could declare the offending law nullified, or inoperative within its borders. ' The Senate debated the tariff question (and the underlying states' rights issue) Senator Daniel Webster of Massachusetts opposed nullification and South Carolina Senator Robert Hayne aired Calhoun’s views.
MAIN IDEA
Making
Predictions
What do you think might be the consequences of Calhoun’s nullification theory for federal-state relations?
>124 Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
o
Effects of the Indian Removal Act, 1830s-1840s
\>«
ye
Sequoyah, or George Guess, devised the Cherokee alphabet in 1821 to help preserve the culture of the Cherokee Nation against the growing hreat of American expansion. ►
-	* „ a ? 4 /
Many Cherokee in the western territory, like the woman pictured here, taught their children at home in order to keep the Cherokee language and customs alive.
WISCONSIN TERRITORY
! Ottawa
MICHIGAN
o * *a / « </\ "A
By 1840, about 16,000 Cherokee had been forcibly moved 800 miles west on routes afterward called the Trail of Tears. Because of the suffering they endured from cold, hunger, and diseases such as tuberculosis, smallpox, and cholera, one-fourth died.
Sauk\		
and S		
Fox 7/	* PotawatomL/^	Delaware
	Miami	OHIO / Shawnee and
INDIANA/
Seneca r ILLINOIS
PENNSYLVANIA
NEW JERSEY
ELAWARE HYLAND
ATLANTIC OCEAN

%
Nearly 15,000 Creek, many in manacles and chains, were moved from Alabama and Georgia to the Canadian River ^in Indian Territory in 1835.
REPUBLIC OFTEXAS
MEXICO
KENTUCKY
MISSOURI
ARKANSAS’
X
Chickasaw

ALABAMA
GEORGIA
Creek
NORTH CAROLINA
SOUTH
CAROLINA
. 30'N '
(By 1834, about 14,000 Choctaw had relocated along the Red River under the terms of the Indian Removal Act of 1830. About 7,000
\jemained in Mississippi. y
LOUUSIANA
90°W
FLORIDA
TERRITORY
Seminob
Cm//
of Mexico
<3

Detail from “Trail of Tears,” a parting by Robert Lindeux
SHi Cherokee
|	~|	Chickasaw
BlBl Choctaw
I I
Creek 1	)	Seminole
■4^ 1 ’ ' 1 Other tribes
0	100________200 miles
0	100	200 kilometers

c * * 8Q°W	"V
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Place Where were most of the tribes moved?
2.	Movement What do you think were the long-term effects of this removal on Native Americans?
Review Unit 125
In 1832 the issue of states' rights was put to a test when Congress raised tariffs again. South Carolinians declared the tariffs of 1828 and 1832 "null, void, and no law." Then they threatened to secede, or withdraw from the Union, if customs officials tried to collect duties.
In response, an outraged Jackson urged Congress to pass the Force Bill to allow the federal government to use the military if state authorities resisted paying proper duties. A bloody confrontation seemed likely until Henry Clay forged a compromise in 1833. Clay proposed a tariff bill that would gradually lower duties over a ten-year period. The compromise also included passage of the Force Bill. The tension between states' rights and federal authority subsided—temporarily.
JACKSON’S BANK WAR
Although Jackson defended federal power in the nullification crisis, he tried to decrease federal power when it came to the Second Bank of the United States. Jackson believed that the national bank was an agent of the wealthy, and that its members cared nothing for the common people. In 1832 Jackson won reelection despite the efforts of his critics to make a campaign issue out of Jackson's opposition to the bank. After his reelection, he tried to kill the bank by withdrawing all government deposits from the bank's branches and placing them in certain state banks called "pet banks" because of their loyalty to the Democratic Party. As a result, the Bank of the United States became just another bank.
Jackson won the bank war, but his tactics and policies angered many people. Many accused him of acting more like a king than a president. In 1832, his opponents formed a new political party, which they later called the Whig Party.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
& What were some of Jackson’s reasons for opposing the Second Bank of the United States?
Analyzing
Political Cartoons
ANDREW THE FIRST”
Andrew Jackson once justified his tendency to place personal prerogative above constitutional law or national policy by stating that “One man with courage makes a majority.” His critics replied with accusations of tyranny. The New York American condemned Jackson as a “maniac,” who would “trample the rights of our people under his feet.” The Whig convention of 1834 declared, “Your president has become your MONARCH.”
Both of those sentiments are reflected in this political cartoon that portrays Jackson as a king.
•	Ancient portraits of kings often depicted them grinding their conquered enemies beneath their heel. Beneath Jackson’s feet are the torn pages of the Constitution.
•	In one hand, Jackson is holding a scepter, a symbol of kingly power, while in the other, he is holding the veto, a symbol of presidential power.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons 1.	What does this cartoon suggest about Jackson’s attitude toward the Constitution?
2.	How does this cartoon particularly comment on Jackson’s use of presidential power?
I
o
Pm
O
BOKJsr TO COMMAND.
I BEEN CONSULTED.
Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
$ How did “wildcat banks” contribute to the panic of 1837?
Successors Deal with Jackson’s Legacy
When Jackson announced that he would not run for a third term in 1836, the Democrats chose Vice-President Martin Van Buren as their candidate. The newly formed Whig Party ran three regional candidates against him. With Jackson's support, however, Van Buren easily won the election.
THE PANIC OF 1837
Along with the presidency, however, Van Buren inherited the consequences of Jackson's bank war. Many of the pet banks that accepted federal deposits were wildcat banks that printed bank notes wildly in excess of the gold and silver they had on deposit. Such wildcat banks were doomed to fail when people tried to redeem their currency for gold or silver. By May 1837, many banks stopped accepting paper currency. In the panic of 1837, bank closings and the collapse of the credit system cost many people their savings, bankrupted hundreds of businesses, and put more than a third of the population out of work.
HARRISON AND TYLER
In 1840 Van Buren ran for reelection against Whig Party candidate William Henry Harrison, who was known as "Tippecanoe" for a battle he won against Native Americans in 1811. The Whigs blamed Van Buren for the weak economy and portrayed Harrison, the old war hero, as a man of the people and Van Buren as an aristocrat. Harrison won the election, but died just a month after his inauguration. John Tyler, Harrison's vice-president, became president. A strong-minded Virginian and former Democrat, Tyler opposed many parts of the Whig program. He halted hopes for significant Whig reforms.
The Democrat and Whig parties went on to dominate national politics until the 1850s. The new politicians appealed more to passion than to reason. They courted popularity in a way that John Quincy Adams and his predecessors never would have. Thus, the style of politics in America had changed drastically since the 1790s. Political speeches became a form of mass entertainment, involving far more Americans in the political process. Also, the West was playing an increasing role in national politics. That trend would continue as more Americans moved to places like Texas and California.

1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance. •Henry Clay	•Missouri Compromise	’John Quincy Adams
•American System	’Andrew Jackson	’Jacksonian democracy
C.
Calhoun •Trail of Tears •John Tyler
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one shown, write newspaper headlines that tell the significance of each date.
Dates	Headlines
1815	
1820	
1828	
1832	
1837	
1838	
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	EVALUATING
In what ways do you think the Missouri Compromise and the nullification crisis of 1832 might be considered important milestones in American history? Think About:
•	the expansion of slavery into the West
•	Calhoun’s nullification theory
•	Jackson’s reaction to South Carolina’s actions
ANALYZING CAUSES
What factors set the stage for the Indian Removal Act of 1830 and the Trail of Tears? Think About:
•	U.S. expansion to the west
•	removal treaties
•	Jackson’s response to Worcester v. Georgia
Review Unit
TRACING THEMES
States' Rights
The power struggle between states and the federal government has caused controversy since the country's beginning. At its worst, the conflict resulted in the Civil War. Today, state and federal governments continue to square off on jurisdictional issues.
•	In 1996, the Supreme Court ruled that congressional districts in Texas and North Carolina that had been redrawn to increase minority representation were unconstitutional.
•	In 2000, the Supreme Court agreed to hear another case in the ongoing—since 1979—dispute between the federal government and the state of Alaska over who has authority to lease offshore land for oil and gas drilling.
Constitutional conflicts between states' rights and federal jurisdiction are pictured here. As you read, see how each issue was resolved.
CONSTITUTIONAL CONVENTION
ISSUE:
The Constitution tried to resolve the original debate over states’ rights versus federal authority. At the Constitutional Convention in Philadelphia, delegates wanted to create a federal government that was stronger than the one created by the Articles of Confederation. But delegates disagreed about whether the federal government should have more power than the states. They also disagreed about whether large states should have more power than small states in the national legislature. The convention compromised—the Constitution reserves certain powers for the states, delegates other powers to the federal government, divides some powers between state and federal governments, and tries to balance the differing needs of the states through two houses of Congress.
NULLIFICATION
ISSUE:
The state of South Carolina moved to nullify, or declare void, a tariff set by Congress. In the cartoon above, President Andrew Jackson, right, is playing a game called bragg. One of his opponents, Vice-President John C. Calhoun, is hiding two cards, “Nullification” and “Anti-Tariff,” behind him. Jackson is doing poorly in this game, but he eventually won the real nullification dispute. When Congress passed high tariffs on imports in 1832, politicians from South Carolina, led by Calhoun, tried to nullify the tariff law, or declare it void. Jackson threatened to enforce the law with federal troops. Congress reduced the tariff to avoid a confrontation, and Calhoun resigned the vice-presidency.
Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
	
,,, „ 118(1)IW
SOUTH CAROLINA’S SECESSION
ISSUE:
The conflict over a state’s right to secede, or withdraw, from the Union led to the Civil War. In December 1860, Southern secessionists cheered “secession” enthusiastically in front of the Mills House (left), a hotel in Charleston,
South Carolina. South Carolina seceded after the election of Abraham Lincoln, whom the South perceived as anti-states’ rights and antislavery. Lincoln took the position that states did not have the right to secede from the Union. In 1861, he ordered that provisions be sent to the federal troops stationed at Fort Sumter in Charleston harbor. South Carolinians fired on the fort—and the Civil War was under way. The Union’s victory in the war ended the most serious challenge to federal authority: states did not have the right to secede from the Union.
LITTLE ROCK CENTRAL HIGH SCHOOL
ISSUE:
Some Southern governors refused to obey federal desegregation mandates for schools. In 1957, President Eisenhower mobilized federal troops in Little Rock, Arkansas, to enforce the Supreme Court’s 1954 ruling in the case of Brown v. Board of Education of Topeka. This ruling made segregation in public schools illegal. The Arkansas National Guard escorted nine African-American students into Little Rock Central High School against the wishes of Governor Orval Faubus, who had tried to prevent the students from entering the school. After this incident, Faubus closed the high schools in Little Rock in 1958 and 1959, thereby avoiding desegregation.
Review Unit 129
Manifest Destiny
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Through settlement and war, the United States greatly expanded its boundaries during the mid-1800s.
The actions Americans took during this period established the current borders of the 48 contiguous states.
•manifest destiny •Santa Fe Trail •Oregon Trail •Stephen F. Austin •Texas Revolution •the Alamo •Sam Houston
K.
Polk •Republic of California •Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo One American's
hmhsocialstudies.com
I TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on how the boundaries of the U.S. mainland developed.
In 1821, Stephen F. Austin led the first of several groups of American settlers to a fertile area along the Brazos River. Drawn by the promise of inexpensive land and economic opportunity, Austin established a colony of American settlers in Tejas, or Texas, then the northernmost province of the Mexican state of Coahuila. However, Austin's plans didn't work out as well as he had hoped; 12 years later, he found himself in a Mexican prison and his new homeland in an uproar. After his release, Austin spoke about the impending crisis between Texas and Mexico.
A
Personal Voice Stephen f. Austin “Texas needs peace, and a local government; its inhabitants are farmers, and they need a calm and quiet life. .. . [But] my efforts to serve Texas involved me in the labyrinth of Mexican politics. I was arrested, and have suffered a long persecution and imprisonment. . . .
I fully hoped to have found Texas at peace and in tranquillity, but regret to find it in commotion; all disorganized, all in anarchy, and threatened with immediate hostilities. . . . Can this state of things exist without precipitating the country into a war? I think it cannot. ”
—quoted in Lone Star: A History of Texas and Texans
Stephen F. Austin
Austin's prediction was correct. War did break out in Texas—twice. First, Texans rebelled against the Mexican government. Then, the United States went to war against Mexico over the boundaries of Texas. These conflicts were the climax of decades of competition over the western half of North America—a competition that involved the United States, Mexico, Native Americans, and various European nations. The end result of the competition would be U.S. control over a huge swath of the continent, from the Atlantic to the Pacific.
Settling the Frontier
As various presidents established policies in the early 19th century that expanded U.S. territory, American settlers pushed first into the Northwest Territorv and then headed farther west.	y
130Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
MAIN IDEA
Predicting
Effects
$ How might manifest destiny later affect U.S. relations with Native Americans?
AMERICANS PURSUE MANIFEST DESTINY
For a quarter century after the War of 1812, only a few Americans explored the West. Then, in the 1840s, expansion fever gripped the country. Many Americans began to believe that their movement westward was predestined by God. The phrase "manifest destiny" expressed the belief that the United States was ordained to expand to the Pacific Ocean and into Mexican and Native American territory. Many Americans also believed that this destiny was manifest, or obvious and inevitable. Most Americans had practical reasons for moving west. For settlers, the abundance of land was the greatest attraction. As the number of western settlers climbed, merchants and manufacturers followed, seeking new markets for their goods. Many Americans also trekked west because of personal economic problems in the East. The panic of 1837, for example, had disastrous
Background
The Mormon religion was controversial for its belief in polygamy, a practice that allowed a man to have more than one wife.
consequences and convinced many Americans that they would be better off attempting a fresh start in the West.
TRAILS WEST
The settlers and traders who made the trek west used a series of old Native American trails as well as new routes. One of the busiest routes was the Santa Fe Trail, which stretched 780 miles from Independence, Missouri, to Santa Fe in the Mexican province of New Mexico. (See map on page 132.) Each spring from 1821 through the 1860s, American traders loaded their covered wagons with goods and set off toward Santa Fe. For about the first 150 miles, traders traveled individually. After that, fearing attacks by Native Americans, traders banded into organized groups of up to 100 wagons. Cooperation, though, came to an abrupt end when Santa Fe came into view. Traders raced off on their own as each tried to be the first to arrive. After a few days of trading, they loaded their wagons with goods, restocked their animals, and headed back to Missouri.
The Oregon Trail stretched from Independence, Missouri, to Oregon City, Oregon. It was blazed in 1836 by two Methodist missionaries named Marcus and Narcissa Whitman. By driving their wagon as far as Fort Boise (near present-day Boise, Idaho), they proved that wagons could travel on the Oregon Trail.
Following the Whitmans' lead, many pioneers migrated west on the Oregon Trail. Some bought "prairie schooners," wooden-wheeled wagons covered with sailcloth and pulled by oxen. Most walked, however, pushing handcarts loaded with a few precious possessions, food, and other supplies. The trip took months, even if all went well.
THE MORMON MIGRATION
One group migrated westward along the Oregon Trail to escape persecution. These people were the Mormons, a religious community that would play a major role in the development of the West. Founded by Joseph Smith in upstate New York in 1827, the Mormon community moved to Ohio and then Illinois to escape persecution. After an anti-Mormon mob murdered Smith a leader named Brigham Young urged the Mormons to move farther west. Thousands of believers walked to Nebraska, across Wyoming to the Rockies, and then southwest In 1847, the Mormons stopped at the edge of the desert near the Great Salt Lake, in what is now Utah. Young boldly JIM BECKWOURTH 1798-1867?
James Pierson Beckwourth (or Beckwirth) was the toughest kind of pioneer, a mountain man. The son of an African-American woman, he ventured westward with a fur-trading expedition in 1823 and found the place that would become his home for nearly the next quarter century—the Rocky Mountains. He greatly impressed the Crow, who gave him the name “Bloody Arm” because of his skill as a fighter.
Beckwourth served from 1837 until 1848 as an Army scout and trading-post operator. In 1848, he discovered a passage in the Sierra Nevada range that led to California’s Sacramento Valley and decided to settle down near the pass and become a rancher. “In the spring of 1852 I established myself in Beckwourth Valley, and finally found myself transformed into a hotel-keeper and chief of a trading-post.”
Review Unit 131
American Trails West, I860
The interior of a covered wagon may ► have looked like this on its way west.
. 42
w-


PoH
Sil
* 4’ :




**


? ;.a


Los An
PACIFIC
OCEAN
120°W
/


'$■$
•>4* <

,-«5' , 'J
\.’r * «. ’ '
ajo
> ■
'M
;«- t
r/ »..
SI



'.A,


'•>1
y«M*i

90cW
A
Navajo man and woman in photographs taken by Edward S. Curtis 132 Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
Butterfield Overland Trail California Trail Mormon Trail Old Spanish Trail Oregon Trail Sante Fe Trail
100	200 miles
w-
0	100 200 kilometers
.. -aU i - i.	, > /’Wjj I
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
| 1. Location Approximately how long was the trail from St. Louis to El Paso?
2. Movement At a wagon train speed of about 15 miles a day, about how long would that trip take?
1/? Wi ’T
MW?

MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
Why did the Mormons move farther west in their search for a new home?
MAIN IDEA
Developing
Historical
Perspective
Why did many Americans initially settle in Texas?
declared, This is the place." Soon they had coaxed settlements and farms from the bleak landscape by irrigating their fields. Salt Lake City blossomed out of the land the Mormons called Deseret.
SETTING BOUNDARIES
In the early 1840s, Great Britain still claimed areas near the Canadian border in parts of what are now Maine and Minnesota. The Webster-Ashburton Treaty of 1842 settled these territorial disputes in the East and the Midwest, but the two nations merely continued the "joint occupation" of the Oregon Territory that they had first established in 1818. In 1846 the two countries agreed to extend the mainland boundary along the 49th parallel westward from the Rocky Mountains to Puget Sound, establishing the current boundary between the United States and Canada. Unfortunately, establishing the boundary in the Southwest with Mexico would not be so peaceful. Texan Independence
After 300 years of Spanish rule, only a few thousand Mexican settlers had migrated to what is now Texas. After 1820, that changed as Texas became an important region in Mexico and then an independent republic.
MEXICAN INDEPENDENCE AND TEXAN LAND GRANTS
The mission system used by Spain declined after Mexico had won independence from Spain in 1821. After freeing the missions from Spanish control, the Mexican government offered the surrounding lands to government officials and ranchers. To make the land more secure and stable, the Mexican government also encouraged Americans to settle in Texas. Many Americans rushed at the chance to buy inexpensive land in Texas. The population of Anglo, or English-speaking, settlers from the United States soon surpassed the population of Tejanos, or Mexican settlers, who lived in Texas. Among the more prominent leaders of these American settlers was
Stephen E Austin. ||
Austin's father, Moses Austin, had received a land grant from Spain to establish a colony between the Brazos and Colorado rivers but died before he was able to carry out his plans. Stephen obtained permission, first from Spain and then from Mexico after it had won its independence, to carry out his father's project. In 1821 he established a colony where "no drunkard, no gambler, no profane swearer, and no idler” would be allowed.
The main settlement of the colony was named San Felipe de Austin, in Stephen's honor. By 1825, Austin had issued 297 land grants to the group that later became known as Texas's Old Three Hundred. Each family received either 177 very inexpensive acres of farmland, or 4,428 acres for stock grazing, as well as a 10-year exemption from paying taxes. "I am convinced," Austin said, "that I could take on fifteen hundred families as easily as three hundred if permitted to do so." By 1830, there were more than 20,000 Americans in Texas.
THE TEXAS REVOLUTION
Despite peaceful cooperation between Anglos and Tejanos, differences over cultural issues intensified between Anglos and the Mexican government. The overwhelmingly Protestant Anglo settlers spoke English instead of Spanish. Furthermore, many of the settlers were Southerners, who had brought slaves with them to Texas. Mexico, which had abolished slavery in 1829, insisted in vain that the Texans free their slaves. Meanwhile, Mexican politics had become increasingly unstable. Austin had traveled to Mexico City late in 1833 to present petitions to Mexican president Antonio Lopez de Santa Anna for greater self-government for Texas. While Austin was on his way home, Santa Anna had Austin imprisoned for inciting revolution After Santa Anna suspended local powers in Texas and other
Review Unit 133
Mexican states, several rebellions broke out, including one that would be known as the Texas Revolution.
When Austin returned to Texas in 1835, he was convinced that war was its "only resource." Determined to force Texas to obey Mexican law, Santa Anna marched his army toward San Antonio. At the same time, Austin and his followers issued a call for Texans to arm themselves. Jgj
THE ALAMO!”
The commander of the Anglo troops, Lieutenant Colonel William Travis, moved his men into the Alamo, a mission and fort in the center of San Antonio. Travis believed that maintaining control of the Alamo would prevent Santa Anna's movement farther north. From February 23, 1836, Santa Anna and his troops attacked the rebels holed up in the Alamo. On March 2, 1836, as the battle for the Alamo raged, Texans declared their independence from Mexico and quickly ratified a constitution based on that of the United States. The 13-day siege finally ended on March 6, 1836, when Mexican troops scaled the Alamo's walls. All 187 U.S. defenders and hundreds of Mexicans died.
Later in March, Santa Anna's troops executed 300 rebels at Goliad. The Alamo and the Goliad executions whipped the Texan rebels into a fury. Six weeks after the defeat at the Alamo, the rebels' commander in chief, Sam Houston, and 900
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
What
disagreement led to the Texas Revolution?
War for Texas Independence, 1835-1836
KEY PLAYERS
SAM HOUSTON 1793-1863
Sam Houston ran away from home in Tennessee at about age 15 and lived for three years with the Cherokee. He later fought in the U.S. Army, studied law, was elected to Congress, and became governor of Tennessee.
In his memoirs Houston told of listening in vain for the signal guns indicating that the Alamo still stood. “I listened with an acuteness of sense which no man can understand whose hearing has not been sharpened by the teachings of the dwellers of the forest."
The Republic of Texas chose Houston to be its first president. When Texas became a state, he was elected to the U.S. Senate.
SANTA ANNA 1795-1876
Antonio Ldpez de Santa Anna reportedly once said, “If I were God, I would wish to be more.” Santa Anna began his career fighting for Spain in the war over Mexican independence. Later, he switched sides to fight for Mexico.
Declaring himself the “Napoleon of the West,” Santa Anna took control of the government after Mexico won independence in 1821. He spent the next 35 years alternately serving as president, leading troops into battle, and living in exile. Santa Anna served as president of Mexico 11 times.
Santa Anna was a complex man with much charm. He sacrificed his considerable wealth to return again and again to the battlefield and died in poverty, almost forgotten.
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
How would you contrast the Northern and Southern positions on the annexation of Texas?
soldiers surprised a group of Mexicans near the San Jacinto River. With shouts of "Remember the Alamo!" the Texans killed 630 of Santa Anna's soldiers in 18 minutes and captured Santa Anna himself. The Texans set Santa Anna free only after he signed the Treaty of Velasco, which granted independence to Texas. In September 1836, Sam Houston was elected president of the new Republic of Texas.
TEXAS MOVES TOWARD THE UNION
Most Texans hoped that the United States would annex their republic, but U.S. opinion divided along sectional lines. Southerners wanted Texas in order to extend slavery, which already had been established there. Northerners feared that the annexation of more slave territory would tip the uneasy balance in the Senate in favor of slave states—and prompt war with Mexico. The 1844 U.S. presidential campaign focused on westward expansion. The winner, James K. Polk, a slaveholder, firmly favored the annexation of Texas.
The War with Mexico
In March 1845, angered by U.S.-Texas negotiation on annexation, the Mexican government recalled its ambassador from Washington. On December 29, 1845, Texas entered the Union. Events moved quickly toward war.
HISTORY
VIDEO
Independence for Texas
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
POLK URGES WAR
President Polk believed that war with Mexico would bring not only Texas into the Union, but also New Mexico and California. Hence, the president supported Texan claims in disputes with Mexico over the Texas-Mexico border. While Texas insisted that its southern border extended to the Rio Grande, Mexico maintained that Texas's border stopped at the Nueces River, 100-150 miles northeast of the Rio Grande. Despite the fact that Mexico had ceased formal diplomatic relations with the U S Polk hoped to negotiate secretly the boundary dispute, as well as the sale of California and New Mexico. He dispatched John Slidell, a congressman from Louisiana to negotiate both matters. The Mexican government refused to receive Slidell When Polk heard this news, he ordered U.S. troops into the territory between the Rio Grande and the Nueces River that the United States claimed as its own.
Review Unit 135

GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Location From which locations in Texas did U.S. forces come to Buena Vista?
2.	Region In which country were most of the battles fought?
HISTORY
VIDEO
The Mexican-American War
5T hmhsocialstudies.com
THE WAR BEGINS
In 1845, John C. Fremont led an American military exploration party into California, violating Mexico's territorial rights. In response, Mexican troops crossed the Rio Grande. In a skirmish near Matamoros, Mexican soldiers killed 11 U.S. soldiers. Polk immediately called for war and Congress approved. JF^ In 1846, Polk ordered Colonel Stephen Kearny and his troops to march from Fort Leavenworth, Kansas, to Santa Fe, New Mexico. They were met there by a New Mexican contingent that included upper-class Mexicans who wanted to join the United States. New Mexico fell to the United States without a shot.
I MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
What border dispute affected the war with Mexico?
THE REPUBLIC OF CALIFORNIA
In California, a group of American settlers seized the town of Sonoma in June 1846. Hoisting a flag that featured a grizzly bear, the rebels proudly declared their independence from Mexico and proclaimed the nation of the Republic of California. Kearny arrived from New Mexico and joined forces with Fremont and an American naval expedition. The Mexican troops quickly gave way, leaving U.S. forces in control of California. AMERICA WINS THE WAR
Meanwhile, American troops in Mexico, led by U.S. generals Zachary Taylor and Winfield Scott, scored one military victory after another. After about a year of fighting, Mexico conceded defeat. On February 2, 1848, the United States and Mexico signed the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo. Mexico agreed to the Rio Grande as the border between Texas and Mexico and ceded the New Mexico and California territories to the United States. The United Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
States agreed to pay $15 million for the Mexican cession, which included present-day California, Nevada, New Mexico, Utah, most of Arizona, and parts of Colorado and Wyoming.
Five years later, in 1853, President Franklin Pierce authorized James Gadsden to pay Mexico an additional $10 million for another piece of territory south of the Gila River in order to secure a southern railroad route to the Pacific Ocean. Along with the settlement of the Oregon boundary and the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo, the Gadsden Purchase established the current borders of the contiguous 48 states.
The California Gold Rush
The United States quickly benefited from its new territories when gold was discovered at Sutter's Mill in the California Sierra Nevada mountains.
THE FORTY-NINERS
On the cold clear morning of January 24, 1848, a carpenter named James Marshall discovered a few shiny particles lying near John Sutter's sawmill. Marshall took what he had found to Sutter, who confirmed the carpenter's suspicions: the particles were gold. Soon, more gold was found by other workers at Sutter's mill, and news of the chance discovery began to spread with lightning speed. When the news reached San Francisco, virtually the whole town hustled to the Sacramento Valley to pan for gold. On June 6, 1848, Monterey's mayor, Walter Colton, sent a scout to report on what was happening. The scout returned on June 14 with news of gold, and the mayor described the scene that followed as news traveled along the town's main street.
A
Goldminers at Spanish Flat, California, 1852


i
A
Personal Voice Walter colton “The blacksmith dropped his hammer, the carpenter his plane, the mason his trowel, the farmer his sickle, the baker his loaf, and the tapster [bartender] his bottle. All were off for the mines. ... I have only a community of women left, and a gang of prisoners, with here and there a soldier who will give his captain the slin at first chance. I don’t blame the fellow a whit; seven dollars a month, while others [pmspectors] are making two or three hundred a day! ”
—quoted in California: A Bicentennial History
As gold fever traveled eastward, overland migration to California rose from 400 in 1848 to 44,000 in 1850. By the end of 1849, California's population exceeded 100 000, including Mexicans, free African-American miners, and slaves.
The rest of the world caught the fever as well. Among the so-called forty-niners—the prospectors who flocked to California in 1849 in the California gold rush-were people from Asia, South America, and Europe. In time, the names of
Review Unit 137
the mining camps that sprung up in California reflected the diversity of its growing population: French Corral, Irish Creek, Chinese Camp.
Crowded buildings and a forest of masts stand out in this 1850 photograph of San Francisco.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
In what ways did the gold rush change the population of California?
THE GOLDEN ECONOMY
The discovery of gold revolutionized California's economy. Gold financed the development of farming, manufacturing, shipping, and banking. By 1855, more newspapers were published in San Francisco than in London, more books were published than in all the rest of the United States west of the Mississippi. Because of its location as a supply center, San Francisco became "a pandemonium of a city." Ships linked
California markets to the expanding markets of the rest of the United States. Mining continued in California throughout the 1850s, but the peak of the gold
rush was over by 1853. While most individual efforts yielded little or no profit, those who were able to use more sophisticated methods made fortunes. By 1857, ten years after James Marshall's discovery of a few shiny flakes, the total value of gold production in California approached two billion dollars.
WEST, YOUNG MAN!”
Horace Greeley, editor of the New York Tribune, had declared in his paper prior to the gold rush that anyone who made the dangerous journey west was a fool. But when he heard of the discovery in the Sierra Nevadas his curiosity was aroused. Before long, he made the journey west himself and declared California to be "the new El Dorado." "Go west, young man!" Greeley advised. In the spirit of manifest destiny, countless settlers heeded his words in the decades that followed. MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
How did the discovery of gold affect California’s economy?
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance, •manifest destiny	-Stephen F. Austin	-Sam Houston
•Santa Fe Trail	-Texas Revolution	•James K. Polk
•Oregon Trail	•the Alamo
Republic of California Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Draw a chart like the one below to show how the boundaries of the U.S. mainland were formed from the 1840s to 1853.
Year	Boundary Change
1845	Texas annexed
	
	
	
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING ISSUES
What were the benefits and drawbacks of believing in manifest destiny? Use specific references to the section to support your response.
Think About:
•	the growth of new cities and towns
•	the impact on Native Americans
•	the impact on the nation as a whole
4.	EVALUATING
Would you have supported the war with Mexico? Why or why not? Explain your answer, including details from the chapter.
DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
How did the California gold rush transform the West in the American imagination?
Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
MAIN IDEA WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names Inventions and economic		The market revolution and free	• market revolution	•strike
developments in the early		enterprise system that took hold	•free enterprise	• immigration
19th century helped		during this period still drive the	•entrepreneurs	• National Trades’
transform American society.		nation’s economy today.	•Samuel F. B.	Union
			Morse	• Commonwealth
			•Lowell textile	v. Hunt
			mills	
		One American's Story i		

TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on important developments in manufacturing during the early 19th century.
At sunrise on July 4, 1817, a cannon blast from the United States arsenal in Rome, New York, announced the groundbreaking for the Erie Canal. With visiting dignitaries and local residents in attendance, Samuel Young opened the ceremony.
A
Personal Voice samuel young “We have assembled to commence the excavation of the Erie Canal. This work when accomplished will connect our western inland seas with the Atlantic Ocean. ... By this great highway, unborn millions will easily transport their surplus productions to the shores of the Atlantic, procure their supplies, and hold a useful and profitable Intercourse with all the maritime nations of the earth. . . . Let us proceed then to the work, animated by the prospect of its speedy accomplishment, and cheered with the anticipated benedictions of a grateful posterity. ”
—quoted in Erie Water West
When the canal was completed, it stretched 363 miles from Albany, New York, to Lake Erie. The human-made waterway ushered in a new era, in which technology and improved transportation sent new products to markets across the United States.
i
A lock on the Erie Canal in Lockport, New York, shown here in an 1838 engraving, was one of 83 that helped link the Great Lakes with the Northeast.
The Market Revolution
Changes like those brought by the Erie Canal contributed to vast economic changes in the first half of the 19th century in the United States. In this period, known as the market revolution, people increasingly bought and sold goods rather than make them for themselves.
Review Unit 139
U.S. MARKETS EXPAND
Over a few decades, buying and selling multiplied while incomes rose. In the 1840s alone, the national economy grew more than it had in the first 40 years of the century. The quickening pace of U.S. economic growth coincided with the growth of free enterprise—the freedom of private businesses to operate competitively for profit with little government regulation. In their pursuit of profit, businessmen called entrepreneurs, from a French word that means "to undertake," invested their own money in new industries. In doing this, entrepreneurs risked losing their investment if a venture failed, but they also stood to earn huge profits if it succeeded.
cronivi tci chdadu
INVENTIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS
Inventor-entrepreneurs began to develop goods to make life more comfortable for more people. While some inventions simply made life more enjoyable, others fueled the economic revolution and transformed manufacturing, transportation, and communication. New communication links began to put people into instant contact with one another. In 1837, Samuel F. B. Morse, a New England artist, patented the telegraph, which sent messages in code over a wire in a matter of seconds. Businesses used the new communication device to transmit orders and relay up-to-date information on prices and sales. The new railroads employed the telegraph to keep trains moving regularly and to warn engineers of safety hazards. By 1854, 23,000 miles of telegraph wire crossed the country.
Meanwhile, better transportation systems improved the movement of people and goods. In 1807, Pennsylvanian Robert Fulton had ushered in the steamboat era when his boat, the Clermont, made the 150-mile trip up the Hudson River from New York City to Albany in 32 hours, a remarkable speed for that era. By 1830, 200 steamboats traveled the nation's western rivers that flowed into the Mississippi River. Steamboats slashed freight rates as well as voyage times.
Water transport was particularly important in moving raw materials such as lead, copper, and heavy
MAIN IDEA
Synthesizing
How did entrepreneurs contribute to the market revolution?
FROM TELEGRAPH TO INTERNET
What do the telegraph and the Internet have in common? They are both tools for instant communication. While the telegraph relied on a network of wires that spanned the country, the Internet—an international network of smaller computer networks— allows any computer user to communicate instantly with any other computer user in the world.
MORSE CODE
In 1837 Samuel Morse patents the telegraph, the first instant electronic communicator. Morse taps on a key to send bursts of electricity down a wire to the receiver, where an operator “translates" the coded bursts into understandable language within seconds. Chapter 3
icLtrnui\t m xoro Alexander Graham Bell invents the telephone, which relies on a steady stream of electricity, rather than electrical bursts, to transmit sounds. By 1900, there are over one million telephones in the United States.
MARCONI RADIO
In 1895, Guglielmo Marconi, an Italian inventor, sends telegraph code through the air as electromagnetic waves. By the early 1900s, “the wireless” makes voice transmissions possible. Commercial radio stations are broadcasting music and entertainment programs by the 1920s. MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
How did technology influence both the North and the Midwest in the 1840s?
machinery. Where waterways didn't exist, Americans made them by building canals. By the 1840s, America boasted more than 3,300 miles of canals.
Canals, however, soon gave way to railroads, which offered the important advantage of speed as well as winter travel. Developed in England in the early 1800s, steam-powered locomotives began operating in the United States in the 1830s. By 1850, over 9,000 miles of track had been laid across the United States.
THE MARKET REVOLUTION TRANSFORMS THE NATION
Although most Americans during the early 1800s still lived in rural areas and only 14 percent of workers had manufacturing jobs, these workers produced more and better goods at lower prices than ever before. Many of these goods became affordable for ordinary Americans, and improvements in transportation allowed people to purchase items manufactured in distant places. By the 1840s, improved transportation and communication also made America's regions more interdependent. Steamboats went up as well as down the Mississippi, linking North to South. The Erie Canal, and eventually railroads and telegraph wires, soon linked the East and the West.
Heavy investment in canals and railroads transformed the Northeast into the center of American commerce. As the Northeast began to industrialize, many people then moved away to farm the fertile soil of the Midwest. They employed new machines, such as the John Deere steel plow, for cultivating the tough prairie sod, and Cyrus McCormick's reaper, for harvesting grain. Meanwhile, most of the South remained agricultural and relied on such crops as cotton, tobacco, and rice.
Changing Workplaces
The new market economy in the United States did not only affect what people bought and sold, it also changed the ways Americans worked. Moving production from the home to the factory split families, created new communities, and transformed relationships between employers and employees.
By the mid-19th century, new machines allowed unskilled workers to perform tasks that once had taken the effort of trained artisans. To do this work, though, workers needed factories.
TELEVISION
In the late 1800s, scientists begin to experiment with transmitting pictures as well as words through the air. In 1923 Vladimir Zworykin, a Russian-born American scientist, files a patent for the
suitable for broadcast-
kinescope, the picture
In 1929, Zworykin
all-electronic television.
COMPUTERS
Scientists develop electronically powered computers during the 1940s. In 1951, UNIVAC I (UNIVersal Advanced Computer) becomes the first commercially available computer. In 1964, IBM initiates System/360, a family of mutually compatible computers that allow several terminals to be attached to one computer system.
INTERNET
Today, on the Internet, through e-mail (electronic mail) or online conversation, any two people can have instant dialogue. The Internet becomes the modern tool for instant global communication not only of words but images too. And it is just as amazing now as the telegraph was in its time. Review Unit 141
THE LOWELL TEXTILE MILLS
In the 1820s, a group of entrepreneurs built several large textile mills in Lowell, Massachusetts. The Lowell textile mills soon became booming enterprises. Thousands of people, mostly women, left family farms to find work in Lowell. Mill owners sought female employees because women provided an abundant source of labor and owners could pay lower wages to women than men. To the girls in the mills, though, textile work offered better pay than their main alternatives: teaching, sewing, and domestic work. In letters written in 1846 to her father in New Hampshire, 16-year-old Mary Paul expressed her satisfaction with her situation at Lowell.
A
Personal Voice mary paul “I have a very good boarding place, have enough to eat.. . . The girls are all kind and obliging. ... I think that the factory is the best place for me and if any girl wants employment, I advise them to come to Lowell. ” —quoted in Women and the American Experience
A young mill girl from around 1840. Her swollen hands suggest that she worked as a warper, someone who straightened the strands of cotton or wool as they entered the loom.
Before long, however, work conditions deteriorated. The workday at Lowell was more than 12 hours long. In addition, mills often were dark, hot, and cramped. Factory owners often showed little sympathy for the plight of workers. In the mid-1840s one mill manager said, "I regard my workpeople just as I regard my machinery. So long as they can do my work for what I choose to pay them, I keep them, getting out of them all I can."
MAIN IDEA
Workers Seek Better Conditions
As industry grew, strikes began to break out when workers protested poor working conditions and low wages.
WORKERS STRIKE
In 1834, when the Lowell mills announced a 15 percent wage cut, 800 mill girls organized a strike, a work stoppage to force an employer to respond to demands. Criticized by the Lowell press and clergy, most of the strikers agreed to return to work at reduced wages. The mill owners fired the strike leader. In 1836, Lowell mill workers struck again, but as in 1834, the company won, and most of the strikers returned to their jobs. Although only 1 or 2 percent of workers in the United States were organized, the 1830s and 1840s saw dozens of strikes—many for higher wages, but some for shorter hours. Employers defeated most of these strikes because they could easily replace unskilled workers with people recently arrived from Europe who desperately needed jobs.
IMMIGRATION INCREASES
European immigration, leaving one country and settling in another, rose dramatically in the United States between 1830 and 1860. Between 1845 and 1854 alone, nearly 3 million immigrants were added to the population. More than 1 million were Irish immigrants, who fled their homeland after a disease on potatoes caused the Great Potato Famine and led to mass starvation. Irish immigrants faced prejudice, both because they were Roman Catholic and because they were poor. Frightened by allegations of a Catholic conspiracy to take over the country, Protestant mobs in big cities constantly harassed them. Other workers resented the Irish for their willingness to work as cheap labor, a willingness that made them more desirable to employers.
Making
Inferences
What was the attitude of many factory owners toward their workers?
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
& Why were most labor strikes of the 1880s and 1840s ineffective?
Background
During the Great Potato Famine of 1845-1849, about 1,000,000 Irish died of starvation and disease.
Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
European immigrants arriving in New York City (from a colored engraving made in 1858)
NATIONAL TRADES’ UNION
Amid the growing labor unrest in the 1830s, the trade unions in different towns began to join together to expand their power. Journeymen's organizations from several industries united in 1834 to form the National Trades' Union. The national trade union movement faced fierce opposition from bankers and owners. In addition, workers' efforts to organize were at first hampered by court decisions declaring strikes illegal. In 1842, however, the Massachusetts Supreme Court supported the workers' right to strike in the case of Commonwealth v. Hunt. The workplace was not the only area of American life that experienced unrest in the mid-19th century. Indeed, a series of religious and social reform movements went hand in hand with these economic changes.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•market revolution	•Samuel F. B. Morse	’Strike	-National Trades’ Union
•free enterprise	•Lowell textile mills	’immigration	•Commonwealth v. Hunt
•entrepreneurs
main idea
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a time line like the one below on which you label and date important developments in manufacturing during the early 19th century.
1807
Write a paragraph explaining which development was most important and why.
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING ISSUES
Do you think the positive effects of mechanizing the manufacturing process outweighed the negative effects? Why or why not?
Think About:
•	changes in job opportunities for unskilled laborers
•	changes in employer-employee relationships
•	working conditions in factories
•	the cost of manufactured goods
ANALYZING PRIMARY SOURCES
A 20th-century historian said of the 1820s: “It was the miraculous machinery of the times . . . which made it obvious that things were getting better all the time.” How do you think the people you have read about in this chapter would have responded to that statement?
Review Unit 143
Reforming American Society
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names

Throughout the mid-19th century, men and women embarked on a widespread effort to solve problems in American society.
A number of achievements from this period, including laws enacted and institutions established, still exist today.
OneAmerican'sStory
•abolition
•	Unitarians
•	Ralph Waldo Emerson
•	transcendentalism •William Lloyd
Garrison
•	Frederick
Douglass
•	Nat Turner
•	Elizabeth Cady
Stanton
•Seneca Falls convention •Sojourner Truth
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the historical events and key figures related to reforming American society in the 19th century.
James Forten's great-grandfather had been brought from Africa to the American colonies in chains, but James was born free. By the 1830s Forten had become a wealthy sailmaker. A leader of Philadelphia's free black community, Forten took an active role in a variety of political causes. When some people argued that free blacks should return to Africa, Forten disagreed and responded with sarcasm.
A
Personal Voice james forten “ Here I have dwelt until I am nearly sixty years of age, and have brought up and educated a family.... Yet some ingenious gentlemen have recently discovered that I am still an African; that a continent three thousand miles, and more, from the place where I was born, is my native country. And I am advised to go home. . . . Perhaps if I should only be set on the shore of that distant land, I should recognize all I might see there, and run at once to the old hut where my forefathers lived a hundred years ago/9 —quoted in Forging Freedom: The Formation of Philadelphia’s Black Community 1720-1840
Forten's unwavering belief that he was an American not only led him to oppose colonization—the effort to resettle free blacks in Africa—but also pushed him fervently to oppose slavery. Forten was joined in his opposition to slavery by a growing number of Americans in the 19th century. Abolition, the movement to abolish slavery, became the most important of a series of reform movements in America.
James Forten
A
Spiritual Awakening Inspires Reform Many of these movements had their roots in a spiritual awakening that swept the nation after 1790. People involved in these movements began to emphasize individual responsibility for seeking salvation and insisted that people could improve themselves and society. These religious attitudes were closely linked to
1
MAIN IDEA
Evaluating
How did the existence of separate black churches benefit the African-American community?
the ideas of Jacksonian democracy that stressed the importance and power of the common person.
THE SECOND GREAT AWAKENING
The Second Great Awakening was a widespread Christian movement to awaken religious sentiments that lasted from the 1790s to the 1830s. The primary forum for the movement was the revival meeting, where participants attempted to revive religious faith through impassioned preaching. Revival meetings might last for days as participants studied the Bible, reflected on their lives, and heard emotional sermons. Revivalism had a strong impact on the American public. According to one estimate, in 1800 just 1 in 15 Americans belonged to a church, but by 1850 1 in 6 was a member. UNITARIANS AND TRANSCENDENTALISTS
Another growing religious group was the Unitarians, who shared with revivalism a faith in the individual. But instead of appealing to emotions, Unitarians emphasized reason as the path to perfection. As the Second Great Awakening reached its maturity in the 1830s, another kind of awakening led by a writer, philosopher, and former Unitarian minister named Ralph Waldo Emerson began in New England. In 1831, Emerson traveled to England, where he discovered romanticism, an artistic and intellectual movement that emphasized nature, human emotions, and the imagination. From these romantic ideals, Emerson, along with other thinkers, developed a philosophy called transcendentalism, which emphasized that truth could be discovered intuitively by observing nature and relating it to one's own emotional and spiritual experience.
THE AFRICAN-AMERICAN CHURCH
The urge to reform was growing among African Americans, too. Slaves in the rural South heard the same sermons and sang the same hymns as did their owners, but they often interpreted the stories they heard, especially those describing the exodus from Egypt, as a promise of freedom. In the North, however, free African Americans were able to form their own churches. These churches often became political, cultural, and social centers for African Americans by providing schools and other services that whites denied free blacks. &
I
Slavery and Abolition
By the 1820s, abolition—the movement to free African Americans from slavery-had taken hold. More than 100 antislavery societies were advocating that African Americans be resettled in Africa. In 1817, the American Colonization Society had been founded to encourage black emigration. Other abolitionists, however, demanded that African Americans remain in the United States as free citizens. WILLIAM LLOYD GARRISON The most radical white abolitionist was a young editor named William Lloyd Garrison. Active in religious reform movements in Massachusetts, Garrison became the editor of an antislavery paper in 1828. Three years later he established his own paper, The Liberator, to deliver an uncompromising demand: immediate emancipation.
THI
OUA COUNTRY.
is THE Otm COUNTRYMEN ARE MXNKlNP.
1TOK
WILLIAM
[Saturday* May 28,1831.
Boston, Massachusetts.)
<4 William Lloyd Garrison’s The Liberator was published from 1831 to 1865. Its circulation never grew beyond 3,000.
I
HISTORY
VIDEO
Frederick Douglass
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
Before Garrison’s call for the immediate emancipation of slaves, suppor or that position had been limited. In the 1830s, however, that position game P port. Whites who opposed abolition hated Garrison. In 1835 a Boston mob paraded him through town at the end of a rope. Nevertheless, Garrison enjoyed widespread black support; three out of four early subscribers to The Liberator were African Americans.
FREDERICK DOUGLASS
One of those eager readers was Frederick Douglass, who escaped from bondage to become an eloquent and outspoken critic of slavery. Garrison heard him speak and was so impressed that he sponsored Douglass to speak for various anti-slavery organizations. Hoping that abolition could be achieved without violence, Douglass broke with Garrison, who believed that abolition justified whatever means were necessary to achieve it. In 1847, Douglass began his own antislavery newspaper. He named it The North Star, after the star that guided runaway slaves to freedom. LIFE UNDER SLAVERY
In the 18th century, most slaves were male, had recently arrived from the Caribbean or Africa, and spoke one of several languages other than English. By 1830, however, the numbers of male and female slaves had become more I consider it settled that the black	“!“a1' The ma>orlt5' had bMn born
and white people of America ought	!? Amer‘“ “d spoke . E"8“sh'
to share common destiny.	stant in the lives of slaves_hard
FREDERICK DOUGLASS, 1851
work and oppression. The number of slaves owned by individual masters varied widely across the South. Most slaves worked as house servants, farm hands, or in the fields. Some states allowed masters to free their slaves and even allowed slaves to purchase their freedom over time. But these "manumitted” or freed slaves were very few. The vast majority of African Americans in the South were enslaved and endured lives of suffering and constant degradation. (See "Southern Plantations” on page 147.)
TURNER’S REBELLION
Some slaves rebelled against their condition of bondage. One of the most prominent rebellions was led by Virginia slave Nat Turner. In August 1831, Turner and more than 50 followers attacked four plantations and killed about 60 whites. Whites eventually captured and executed many members of the group, including Turner. SLAVE OWNERS OPPOSE ABOLITION
The Turner rebellion frightened and outraged slaveholders. In some states, people argued that the only way to prevent slave revolts was through emancipation. Others, however, chose to tighten restrictions on all African Americans to prevent them from plotting insurrections. Some proslavery advocates began to argue that slavery was a benevolent institution. They used the Bible to defend slavery and cited passages that counseled servants to obey their masters. MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
jiy How would you describe the lives of enslaved African Americans in the 1830s?
146 Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Graphs According to the pie graph, what was the smallest group of African Americans living in the American South in 1860?
Nevertheless, opposition to slavery refused to disappear. Much of the strength of the abolition movement came from the efforts of women—many of whom contributed to other reform movements, including a women's rights movement.
Women and Reform
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing Issues
What were some of the areas of society that women worked to reform?
In the early 19th century, women faced limited options. Prevailing customs encouraged women to restrict their activities after marriage to the home and family. As a result, they were denied full participation in the larger community. WOMEN MOBILIZE FOR REFORM Despite such pressures, women actively participated in all the important reform movements of the 19th century. For many, their efforts to improve society had been inspired by the optimistic message of the Second Great Awakening. From abolition to education, women worked for reform
despite the cold reception they got from many men.
Perhaps the most important reform effort that women participated in was
abolition. Women abolitionists raised money, distributed literature, and collected
signatures for antislavery petitions to Congress.
Women also played key roles in the temperance movement, the effort to pro-
hibit the drinking of alcohol. Some women, most notably Dorothea Dix, fought to improve treatment for the mentally disabled. Dix also joined others in the effort to reform the nation's harsh and often inhumane prison system. Q
Review Unit 147
EDUCATION FOR WOMEN
Work for abolition and temperance accompanied gains in education for women. Until the 1820s, American girls had few educationa opportunities beyond elementary school. As Sarah Grimke complained in Letters on the Equality of the Sexes and the Condition of Woman (1838), a woman who knew "chemistry enough to keep the pot boiling, and geography enough to know the location of the different rooms in her house" was considered learned enough. Grimke believed that increased education for women was a better alternative. Still, throughout the 1800s, more and more educational institutions for women began to appear. In 1821 Emma Willard opened one of the nation s first academically-oriented schools for girls in Troy, New York. In addition to classes in domestic sciences, the Troy Female Seminary offered classes in math, history, geography, languages, art, music, writing, and literature. The Troy Female Seminary became the model for a new type of women's school. Despite tremendous ridicule—people mocked that "they will be educating cows next"—Willard's
Background
Sarah GrimkS and her sister Angelina were leading voices in the abolition and women’s rights movements.
school prospered.
ELIZABETH CADY STANTON 1815-1902
Stanton was an ardent abolitionist, and she timed her marriage in 1840 so that she and her new husband could travel together to London for the World’s Anti-Slavery Convention.
She also believed that women deserved the same rights as men and even persuaded the minister to omit the word “obey” from her vow in the marriage ceremony because she felt no need to “obey one with whom I supposed I was entering into an equal relation.”
At the antislavery convention, Stanton and the other women delegates were barred from participation in the convention and were forced to sit and listen from a curtained gallery. There she met Lucretia Mott. Stanton and Mott vowed “to hold a convention as soon as we returned home, and form a society to advocate the rights of women.” Eight years later, the Seneca Falls convention fulfilled that vow.
In 1833, the first class of Ohio's Oberlin College included four women, thus becoming the nation's first fully coeducational college. In 1837, Mary Lyon surmounted heated resistance to found another important institution of higher learning for women, Mount Holyoke Female Seminary (later Mount Holyoke College) in South Hadley, Massachusetts. JJ)
EDUCATION AND WOMEN’S HEALTH
Improvement in women's education began to improve women's lives, most notably in health reform. Elizabeth Blackwell, who in 1849 became the first woman to graduate from medical college, later opened the New York Infirmary for Women and Children. In the 1850s, Catharine Beecher, sister of novelist Harriet Beecher Stowe, and a respected educator in her own right, undertook a national survey of women's health. To her dismay, Beecher found three sick women for every healthy one. It was no wonder: women rarely bathed or exercised, and the fashionable women's clothing of the day included corsets so restrictive that breathing sometimes was difficult. Unfortunately, black women enjoyed even fewer educational opportunities than their white counterparts. In 1831 Prudence Crandall, a white Quaker, opened a school for girls in Canterbury, Connecticut. Two years later she admitted an African-American girl named Sarah Harris. The townspeople protested so vigorously that Crandall decided to enroll only African Americans. This aroused even more opposition, and in 1834 Crandall was forced to close the school and leave town. Only after the Civil War would the severely limited educational opportunities for black women slowly begin to expand.
WOMEN’S RIGHTS MOVEMENT EMERGES
The reform movements of the mid-19th century fed the growth of the women's movement by providing women with increased opportunities to act outside the home. Elizabeth Cady Stanton and Lucretia Mott had been ardent abolitionists. Male abolitionists discriminated against them at the World's Anti-Slavery Convention in 1840, so the pair resolved to hold a women's rights convention. In 1848, more than 300 women convened in Seneca Falls, New York. Before the convention started, Stanton and Mott composed an agenda and a detailed statement of grievances. MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
4J) What improvements in women’s education occurred in the 1820s and '30s?
Chapter 3 The Growth of a Young Nation
t
The participants at the Seneca Falls convention approved all parts of the declaration, including a resolution calling for women to have the right to vote. In spite of all the political activity among middle-class white women, African-American women found it difficult to gain recognition of their problems. A former slave named Sojourner Truth did not let that stop her, however. At a women's rights convention in 1851, Truth, an outspoken abolitionist, refuted the arguments that because she was a woman she was weak, and because she was black, she was not feminine.
^1
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
How did Sojourner Truth describe her life as an African-American woman?
A
Personal Voice sojourner truth 66 Look at me! Look at my arm! I have ploughed, and planted, and gathered into barns, and no man could head me! And ain’t I a woman? I could work as much and eat as much as a man—when I could get it—and bear the lash as well! And ain’t I a woman? I have borne thirteen children, and seen most all sold off to slavery, and when I cried out with my mother’s grief, none but Jesus heard me! And ain’t I a woman?”99 —quoted In Africa in the Days of Exploration
With her dignified bearing and powerful voice, Sojourner Truth made audiences snap to attention. Truth fought for women’s rights, abolition, prison reform, and temperance.
I
As Truth showed, hard work was a fact of life for most women. But she also pointed to the problem of slavery that continued to vex the nation. As abolitionists intensified their attacks, proslavery advocates strengthened their defenses. Before long the issue of slavery threatened to destroy the Union, jy
J-''’!
hi
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•abolition	.transcendentalism	*Nat Turner	*Seneca Falls convention
•	Unitarians	• William Lloyd Garrison	• Elizabeth Cady Stanton • Sojourner Truth
•	Ralph Waldo Emerson	• Frederick Douglass
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a diagram similar to the one shown, fill in historical events or key figures related to reforming American society in the 19th century.
Write a paragraph about one of the examples you chose, explaining its significance.
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	EVALUATING
Which do you think was a more effective strategy—violence or nonviolence—for eliminating slavery? Why? Think About:
•	Frederick Douglass
•	Nat Turner
•	William Lloyd Garrison
•	Sojourner Truth
MAKING INFERENCES
Consider the philosophical and religious ideas expressed during the Second Great Awakening. How did they influence the activities of 19th-century reformers? Think About:
•	concepts of individualism and Jacksonian democracy
•	the views of Emerson
•	the activities of Garrison,
Douglass, Stanton, and Truth
'! 'i
Review Unit 149
CITIZENSHIP SPOTLIGHT
Alexis de Tocqueville and America's Success
In 1831, Alexis de Tocqueville visited the United States in order to study the
nation's prison system for the French government. A Parisian aristocrat eager to
learn more about the United States, 25-year-old Tocqueville spent nine months
traveling throughout the country and recording his thoughts about American
society and politics. In 1835, he published his observations in the first volume of
Democracy in America; a second volume followed in 1840.
Through his writing, Tocqueville tried to identify the characteristics and
values that made the United States and its inhabitants unique or exceptional. He
wanted to explore why democracy succeeded in America. He wrote, "I confess that
in America I saw more than America; I sought the image of democracy itself, with
its inclinations, its character, its prejudices, and its passions, in order to learn what
we have to fear or to hope from its progress." Historians, political scientists, and
other observers have since used Tocqueville's writing to elaborate their own ideas
about the reasons for America's success as a constitutional republic.
LIBERTY
For Tocqueville, the key to democracy was balancing liberty with equality. Liberty, or the freedom of the individual to act and think as he or she chooses, had to be balanced against the needs of the nation. Tocqueville praised the Founders for their ability to find this balance when they drafted the U.S. Constitution, not allowing the concerns of the American Revolution to drive them too far toward liberty: “The chief cause of the superiority of the Federal Constitution lay in the character of the legislators who composed it. . . . They had all been nurtured at a time when the spirit of liberty was braced by a continual struggle against a powerful and predominant authority. . . . They had the courage to say what they believed to be true, because they were animated by a warm and sincere love of liberty; and they ventured to propose restrictions, because they were resolutely opposed to destruction.”
i ■! h
EGALITARIANISM
Egalitarianism, or equality, is the principle that all people possess a fundamental right to fair treatment under the law and equal opportunity in all aspects of life. Tocqueville deeply admired the widespread economic equality that he witnessed during his travels, viewing it as American democracy’s great promise. He wrote, “[N]othing struck me more forcibly than the general equality of conditions. ... it has no less empire over civil society than over the Government; it creates opinions, engenders sentiments, suggests the ordinary practices of life . . . [T]he equality of conditions is the fundamental fact from which all others seem to be derived. . . However, he also worried that equality could be a threat to liberty if the people gave too much power to the central government to achieve equality. For democracy to truly work, equality had to be kept in balance with liberty.
Chapter 3
INDIVIDUALISM
The characteristic of rugged individualism is one that many Americans point to with pride. In Tocqueville’s words, "As social conditions become more equal, the number of persons increases who, although they are neither rich enough nor powerful enough to exercise any great influence over their fellow-creatures, have nevertheless acquired or retained sufficient education and fortune to satisfy their own wants. They owe nothing to any man, they expect nothing from any man; they acquire the habit of always considering themselves as standing alone, and they are apt to imagine that their whole destiny is in their own hands." Tocqueville worried that too much individualism could detract from a vibrant and active civil society. However, he believed that Americans’ willingness to participate in local government and to form political associations could prevent this problem.
POPULISM
Populism is a political movement that champions the common person over the elite. Tocqueville never uses the word populism in Democracy in America because the concept did not exist then as it does now. However, he observed that unlike in Europe’s aristocracies, the equality of condition that he found in America made labor a noble pursuit: "Amongst a democratic people, where there is no hereditary wealth, every man works to earn a living, or has worked, or is born of parents who have worked. The notion of labor is therefore presented to the mind on every side as the necessary, natural, and honest condition of human existence. Not only is labor not dishonorable amongst such a people, but it is held in honor: the prejudice is not against it, but in its favor." In addition to this respect for labor, Tocqueville believed that the relatively equal distribution of property found in America compared to other nations helped to explain why the masses felt contempt for the elites.
LAISSEZ-FAIRE
The literal translation of the French term laissez-faire is "let to do." This is understood to mean being left alone, without interference. In explaining the continued success of the U.S. democratic republic, Tocqueville cited three main factors: the laws, the manners and customs of the people, and something that he referred to as the “peculiar and accidental situation in which Providence has placed the Americans.” By this, Tocqueville was referring to the fact that, unlike European nations, America had few neighbors to interfere with its affairs, which allowed democracy to continue relatively unchallenged. He declared, "A thousand circumstances, independent of the will of man, concur to facilitate the maintenance of a democratic republic in the United States. . . . The Americans have no neighbors, and consequently they have no great wars, or financial crises, or inroads, or conquest to dread; . . .”
The Growth of a Young Nation 151


REVIEW
CHAPTER
ASSESSMENT
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name below, write a sentence explain* ing its connection to the nation’s growth during the early and mid-1800s.
1.	Jeffersonian republicanism
2.	Monroe Doctrine
3.	Missouri Compromise
4.	Jacksonian democracy
5.	Trail of Tears
6.	Stephen F. Austin
7.	market revolution
8.	Lowell textile mills
9.	Frederick Douglass 10. Elizabeth Cady
Stanton
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
The Jeffersonian Era (pages 112-117)
1.	How did the Louisiana Purchase affect the United States?
2.	What did the Treaty of Ghent accomplish?
The Age of Jackson (pages 120-127)
3.	What changes occurred in the voting population and in voting patterns between the presidential elections of 1824 and 1828?
4.	Why did Jackson oppose the Bank of the United States?
Manifest Destiny (pages 130-138)
5.	Why was the concept of manifest destiny such an appealing one to Americans in the 1840s?
6.	Describe the battle of the Alamo and explain why it is an important symbol in U.S. history.
The Market Revolution (pages 139-143)
7.	How did the inventions and innovations of the mid-19th ' century help fuel the nation’s economy?
8.	Why did workers go on strike and begin to form trade unions in the 1830s?
Reforming American Society (pages 144-149)
9.	What new religious ideas set the stage for the reform movements of the mid-19th century?
10.	What was the purpose of the Seneca Falls convention?
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
What were America’s goals and ideals during this period of expansion and economic change? Draw a chart in which you list goals from the period, how they were achieved, and in what ways their effects were positive or negative. Goal	How Achieved	Positlve/Negatlve Effects
		
EVALUATING IMPACT
Review the historical impact of Marbury v. Madison on page 119. How can judicial interpretation as opposed to strict construction cause constitutional change? FORMING GENERALIZATIONS
Westward expansion helped shape the personal identity of Americans in the early 19th century. What values and traits characterized many Western settlers of this era? Think about Jim Beckwourth’s life (See the Historical Spotlight on page 131) and the rise of the common person during the Age of Jackson. VISUAL SUMMARY
The Growth of a Young Nation l
-
TERRITORIES AND EXPLORATION
•	National boundaries are extended in the North, West, and South.
•	Lewis and Clark expand knowledge of the Louisiana Territory.
•	The Oregon and Santa Fe trails extend exploration of and settlement in the Northwest and Southwest.
•	The California Gold Rush creates an influx of settlers in the West.
TECHNOLOGY AND COMMERCE
•	The telegraph expands the possibilities of communication.
•	Textile mills increase manufacturing in the North
•	The cotton gin allows for greater agricultural profits in the South.
•	Canals and railroads improve transportation throughout the country.
SOCIAL REFORMS
•	Voting rights are expanded in many states, although for males only.
•	National Trades’ Union calls for improved working conditions.
•	Women's institutions of higher education are founded.
•	Abolitionists call for the end of slavery.
Use the image below and your knowledge of U.S history to answer question 1.
,x,,.a,
TEXAS TEST PRACTICE

This print by Robert Cruikshank, entitled The President's Levee [reception], or All Creation Going to the White House, was issued in 1829. It is satirizing —
A the Louisiana Purchase.
B the California gold rush.
C
Jacksonian democracy. D the Indian Removal Act.
2.	The Supreme Court decision Marbury v. Madison is important for affirming which of the following principles?
F impressment G the “American System"
H popular sovereignty J judicial review
3.	The main effect of the Missouri Compromise was to —
A admit Missouri as a state.
B resolve disputes over slavery in the territories. C change the balance of free and slave states.
D incline Southerners toward secession.
4.	Between 1830 and 1850, the geographic area of the United States increased by about one third. Most of this land was acquired by —
F
G
war.
purchase.
H exchange.
J inciting rebellion.

71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
mvWriteSmart Think about the issues you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Now that you know more about nullification and the fight over tariffs and states’ rights, form small groups and discuss the following question: Would you have supported the federal or state government? Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write a paragraph summarizing your group’s discussion.
COLLABORATIVE LEARN
XCjBMTOKY
In a small group read and discuss the
feature on pages 150-151. What five values did Alexis de Tocqueville identify as crucial to America’s success as a constitutional republic? Have each group member select a different value and design a web page explaining the value and why it is significant. Then, as a group, create an introductory page that describes how the American values identified are different from those of other nations.
Imagine you are a member of Congress, and you believe that the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo is flawed. Write a different version of the treaty for Congress to adopt. For each main point in your treaty, compare it to the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo and explain why your version is better. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your treaty and explanation.
Review Unit 153
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Finding Main Ideas
DEFINING THE SKILL
Finding main ideas means identifying words that sum up the single most important thought in an entire paragraph or section. By finding the main idea of a passage, article, or speech, you will increase your understanding as you read about historical events, people, and places. Main ideas are supported by details and examples.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: IDENTIFY THE TOPIC AND SUPPORTING DETAILS
To find the main idea of a passage, identify the topic. Then, as you read, ask, What central idea do the many details explain or support? This passage is about the beginning of the women's rights movement at the Seneca Falls Convention. The diagram that follows identifies and organizes information in the passage. Women's Rights and the Seneca Falls Convention, 1848 ©
Q
Many people believe that the Seneca Falls Convention in 1848 was the beginning of the women's rights movement. The convention resulted from the work of Elizabeth Cady Stanton and ; Lucretia Mott.Their work for equity began as abolitionists. In 1840, they were not recognized as delegates at the World Anti-Slavery convention because of their gender. They were reminded of the injustices between men and women and resolved to fight for equal rights for women. ©Stanton and Mott wanted the public to become more aware of the injustices faced by women. ©In 1848, they decided to hold a convention to discuss the need for "social, civil, and religious ‘ condition and rights of women.'They wrote a detailed statement of grievance modeled on the Declaration of Independence. ©Their "Declaration of Sentiments" listed rights and privileges they believed women should have. Stanton even slipped in a measure about women's right to vote. On July 19 and 20th, more than 300 women and men gathered at Seneca Falls, New York. © Over 100 signed the declaration.
O
Identify the topic by looking at the title or subtitle, or by looking for key words. Look at the title of this passage. It helps you identify the topic of the passage as women’s rights. The passage discusses rights of women, equal rights, and women’s right to vote. © Look for a topic sentence. Ask whether any one sentence sums up the point of the whole passage. In this passage, the first sentence discusses the Seneca Falls Convention as the beginning of the women’s rights movement.
© Look for details or examples. The many examples support the idea that representatives at the Seneca Falls convention discussed the important ideas that marked the beginning of the women’s rights movement.
SKI
STRATEGY: MAKE A DIAGRAM
State the topic and list the supporting details in a chart. Use the information you record to help you state the main idea. APPLYING THE SKILL
Turn to Chapter 3, Section 5, p. 146 and read the passage headed "Life Under Slavery." Make a diagram, like the one above, to identify the topic, the most important details, and the main idea of the passage. Use what you have learned about identifying the main idea and details in a passage.
1.	Identify the topic of the passage.
What is this passage about?
2.	Identify the topic sentence.
Which sentence sums up the point of this section.
3.
Look for details that support the topic.
What details support the main idea? What do these life under slavery?
details tell you about
153 SK2
m»i ■ ILLL
HISTORY


/
and






5W3
In 1804 Meriwether Lewis, William Clark, and the 33-man Corps of Discovery began a 8,000-mile journey across uncharted territory. Under orders from President Thomas Jefferson, the expedition mapped a route across the Louisiana Purchase to the Pacific Ocean. From St. Louis, Missouri, they traveled west up the Missouri River, then across the Rocky Mountains, and to the Pacific. They met Native American peoples and cataloged geography,
plants, and animals. Not only was their mission one of history's greatest explorations, it also secured an American claim to the Pacific Coast and helped inspire millions to migrate west.
Explore entries from Lewis's journal and other primary sources online. You can find a wealth of information, video clips, activities, and more at
71 hmhsocialstudies.com






J

...the Indian wornon recogntzrd thepoint oj-a, high 'jdatn to our right which vhe infer need us was not very cUhtartfeein the summer retreat ofeher nation ok a. river beyond the ncountatns which rune to the west.
INTER ACTIVITIES
Underway on the Missouri
Watch the video to see how the Corps of Discovery sailed up the Missouri River to begin their expedition.
I860
USA
WORLD
		H f485l] The Great H * Exhibition opens H : in London.		
			: 148541 Charles Dickens’s •’ Hard Times is published.	: ‘1861 Russian serfs : emancipated by
' I				* Czar Alexander II.
Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
• 1863 Battles : of Gettysburg ...• and Vicksburg
1870
[i868| Ulysses S.
Grant is elected president.
1876 Hayes-Tilden presidential election results in deadlock.
1877 Rutherford B. Hayes is inaugurated.
[1877] Reconstruction ends.
: 1864
•	Maximilian of
•	Austria becomes : omperor of
: Mexico.
IM-t x t
1865i Civil War ends.
Fl865] Lincoln is assassinated;
Andrew Johnson becomes president.
1868 Cubans revolt against Spain.
: [l876j Japan forces : Korea to open ports ; to trade.
Review Unit 155
The Divisive Politics of Slavery
MAIN IDEA
Disagreements over slavery heightened regional tensions and led to the breakup of the Union.
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
The modern Democratic and Republican parties emerged from the political tensions of the mid~19th century.
Terms & Names
•secession
•	popular sovereignty
•	Underground Railroad
•	Harriet Tubman
•	Harriet Beecher Stowe
•	Franklin Pierce
•	Dred Scott
•	Stephen Douglas •Abraham Lincoln
•	Confederacy •Jefferson Davis

* hmhsodalstudies.com 1
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the events that heightened tensions between the North and the South.
Senator John C. Calhoun was a sick man, too sick to deliver his speech to the Senate. On March 4, 1850, Calhoun asked Senator James M. Mason of Virginia to read his speech for him.
A
Personal Voice john c. calhoun 661 have, Senators, believed from the first that the agitation of the subject of slavery would, if not prevented by some timely and effective measure, end in disunion.. .. The agitation has been permitted to proceed . .. until it has reached a period when it can no longer be disguised or denied that the Union is in danger. You have thus had forced upon you the greatest and the gravest question that can ever come under your consideration: How can the Union be preserved?” —quoted in The Compromise of 1850
As Senator Calhoun and other Southern legislators demanded the expansion of slavery, Northerners just as vehemently called for its abolition. Once again, the issue of slavery was deepening the gulf between the North and the South.
Differences Between North and South
John C. Calhoun
Over the centuries, the Northern and Southern sections of the United States had developed into two very different cultural and economic regions. The distinction between North and South had its roots in the early 17th century, when British colonists began settling Virginia in the South and Massachusetts in the North. Along with differences in geography and climate, the two regions were noticeably dissimilar in their religious and cultural traditions. However, it was the Southern dependence on the "peculiar institution" of slavery that increased tensions between the regions and that eventually brought them into conflict.
Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
Developing Historical Perspective
|| Why did Southerners want to increase the number of slave states?
The South, with its plantation economy, had come to rely on an enslaved labor force. The North, with its diversified industries, was less dependent on slavery. As the North industrialized, Northern opposition to slavery grew more intense. The controversy over slavery only worsened as new territories and states were admitted to the union. Supporters of slavery saw an opportunity to create more slave states, while opponents remained equally determined that slavery should not spread,
Slavery in the Territories
The issue of slavery in California and in the western territories led to heated debates in the halls of Congress, and eventually to a fragile compromise.
STATEHOOD FOR CALIFORNIA
Due in large part to the gold rush, California had grown quickly and applied for statehood in December 1850. California's new constitution forbade slavery, a fact that alarmed and angered many Southerners. They had assumed that because most of California lay south of the Missouri Compromise line of 36°30', the state would be open to slavery. Southerners wanted the 1820 compromise to apply to territories west of the Louisiana Purchase, thus ensuring that California would become a slave state. THE COMPROMISE OF 1850
As the 31st Congress opened in December 1849, the question of statehood for California topped the agenda. Of equal concern was the border dispute in which the slave state of Texas claimed the eastern half of the New Mexico Territory, where the issue of slavery had not yet been settled. As passions mounted, threats of Southern secession, the formal withdrawal of a state from the Union, became more frequent. Once again, Henry Clay worked to shape a compromise that both the North and the South could accept. After obtaining support of the powerful Massachusetts senator Daniel Webster, Clay presented to the Senate a series of resolutions later called the Compromise of 1850.
Clay's compromise contained provisions to appease Northerners as well as Southerners. To please the North, the compromise provided that California be
□ Daniel Webster i strongly supported
Clay’s compromise. He left the Senate before Stephen Douglas could engineer passage of all the bill’s provisions.
0 Henry Clay offered his compromise to the Senate in January 1850. In his efforts to save the Union, Clay earned for himself the name "the Great Compromiser."
I
El John C. Calhoun opposed the compromise. He died two months after Clay proposed it. 
admitted to the Union as a free state. To please the South, t e co p
posed a new and more effective fugitive slave law. To placate o si , sion allowed popular sovereignty, the right to vote for or agains s ave residents of the New Mexico and Utah territories.
Despite the efforts of Clay and Webster, the Senate rejected the proposed compromise in July. Tired, ill, and discouraged, Clay withdrew from the fig t an left Washington. Senator Stephen A. Douglas of Illinois picked up the pro corn promise reins. Douglas unbundled the package of resolutions and reintroduced them one at a time, hoping to obtain a majority vote for each measure individually. The death of President Taylor aided Douglas's efforts. Taylor s successor, Millard Fillmore, quickly made it clear that he supported the compromise.
At last, in September, after eight months of effort, the Compromise of 1850 became law. For the moment, the crisis over slavery in the territories had passed. However, relief was short-lived. Another crisis loomed on the horizon enforcement of the new fugitive slave law jy
Vocabulary fugitive: running away or fleeing
MAIN IDEA
Su in in arizing
Q
What was the compromise that allowed California to be admitted to the Union? Harriet Tubman was called “Moses” by those she helped escape on the Underground Railroad. In her later years, Tubman opened a home for elderly, orphaned, and needy African Americans, y
Protest, Resistance, and Violence
The harsh terms of the Fugitive Slave Act surprised many people. Under the law, alleged fugitive slaves were not entitled to a trial by jury. In addition, anyone convicted of helping a fugitive was liable for a fine of $1,000 and imprisonment for up to six months. Infuriated by the Fugitive Slave Act, some Northerners resisted it by organizing "vigilance committees" to send endangered African Americans to safety in Canada. Others resorted to violence to rescue fugitive slaves. Still others worked to help slaves escape from slavery.
THE UNDERGROUND RAILROAD
Attempting to escape from slavery was a dangerous process. It meant traveling on foot at night without any sense of distance or direction, except for the North Star and other natural signs. It meant avoiding patrols of armed men on horseback and struggling through forests and across rivers. Often it meant going without food for days at a time. As time went on, free African Americans and white abolitionists developed a secret network of people who would, at great risk to themselves, hide fugitive slaves. The system of escape routes they used became known as the Underground Railroad. "Conductors" on the routes hid fugitives in secret tunnels and false cupboards, provided them with food and clothing, and escorted or directed them to the next "station." Once fugitives reached the North, many chose to remain there. Others journeyed to Canada to be completely out of reach of their "owners.” C,
One of the most famous conductors was Harriet Tubman, born a slave in Maryland in 1820 or 1821. In 1849, after Tubman's owner died, she heard rumors that she was about to be sold. Fearing this possibility, Tubman decided to make a break for freedom and succeeded in reaching Philadelphia. Shortly after passage of the Fugitive Slave Act, Tubman resolved to become a conductor on the Underground Railroad. In all, she made 19 trips back to the South and is said to have helped 300 slaves—including her own parents—flee to freedom.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
& How did the Underground Railroad operate?
UNCLE TOM’S CABIN
Meanwhile, another woman brought the horrors of slavery into the homes of a great many Americans. In 1852, Harriet Beecher Stowe published her novel Uncle Tom's Cabin, which stressed that slavery was not just a political contest, but also a great moral strug-gle. As a young girl Stowe had watched boats filled with people on their way to be sold at slave mar' kets. Uncle Tom's Cabin expressed her lifetime hatred of slavery. The book stirred Northern abolitionists to increase their protests against the Fugitive Slave Act Chapter 4 The Union in Peril

The Underground Railroad, 1850-1860
LoNOflGANIZED *•. TERRITORY
A
□ □	Free states Slave states Areas with slave population of 50% or more in 1860
	Routes of the Underground Railroad
•	Station on Underground Railroad
0	100	200 miles
0	100	200 kilometers

L
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Movement What does this map tell you about the routes of the Underground Railroad?
2.	Place Name three cities that were destinations on the Underground Railroad.
3.	Location Why do you think these cities were destinations?
’ i S i

<4 pUnai ay slaves arrivirjg^t Levi Coffin’s farm in Indian i, alongtfteUnderground Railroad.
Review Unit 159
Free and Slave States and Territories, 1820-1854
The Missouri Compromise, 1820-1821
The Compromise of 1850
jP-.t»
■ Free states ■I Territory closed to slavery Ej Slave states ■I Territory open to slavery
The Kansas-Nebraska Act of 1854
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Place How did the number of slave states change between 1821 and 1854?
2.	Region How did the Kansas-Nebraska Act affect the amount of land that was open to slavery?
while Southerners criticized the book as an attack on the South. The furor over Uncle Tom's Cabin had barely begun to settle when the issue of slavery in the territories surfaced again. TENSION IN KANSAS AND NEBRASKA The Compromise of 1850 had provided for popular sovereignty in New Mexico and Utah. To Senator Stephen Douglas, popular sovereignty seemed like an excellent way to decide whether slavery would be allowed in the Nebraska Territory.
A
Personal Voice STEPHEN A. DOUGLAS
“ If the people of Kansas want a slaveholding state, let them have It, and if they want a free state they have a right to it, and it Is not for the people of Illinois, or Missouri, or New York, or Kentucky, to complain, whatever the decision of Kansas may be. ” —quoted in The Civil War by Geoffrey C. Ward
The only difficulty was that, unlike New Mexico and Utah, the Kansas and Nebraska territory lay north of the Missouri Compromise line of 36°30' and therefore was legally closed to slavery. Douglas introduced a bill in Congress on January 23, 1854, that would divide the area into two territories: Nebraska in the north and Kansas in the south. If passed, the bill would repeal the Missouri Compromise and establish popular sovereignty for both territories. Congressional debate was bitter. Some Northern congressmen saw the bill as part of a plot to turn the territories into slave states. Southerners strongly defended the proposed legislation. After months of struggle, the Kansas-Nebraska Act became law in 1854. Dy



KANSAS”
The race for Kansas was on. Both supporters and opponents of slavery attempted to populate Kansas in order to win the vote on slavery in the territory. By March 1855 Kansas had enough settlers to hold an election for a territorial legislature. However, thousands of “border ruffians” from the slave state of Missouri crossed into Kansas, voted illegally, and won a fraudulent majority for the proslavery candidates. A government was set up at Lecompton and promptly issued a series of proslavery acts. Furious over these events, abolitionists organized a rival government in Topeka in the fall of 1855. It wasn't long before bloody violence surfaced in the struggle for Kansas, earning the territory the name “Bleeding Kansas.” VIOLENCE IN THE SENATE
Violence was not restricted to Kansas. In May, Senator Charles Sumner of Massachusetts delivered an impassioned speech in the Senate, entitled “The Crime Against Kansas.” For two days he verbally attacked MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Events
Why was the debate over the Kansas-Nebraska Act so bitter?
Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
the South and slavery, singling out Senator Andrew P. Butler of South Carolina for his proslavery beliefs.
Soon after, Butler's nephew, Congressman Preston S. Brooks, walked into the Senate chamber and struck Sumner on the head repeatedly with a cane until the cane broke. Sumner suffered brain damage and did not return to his Senate seat for more than three years.
The widening gulf between the North and the South had far-reaching implications for party politics as well. As the two regions grew further apart, the old national parties ruptured, and new political parties emerged, including a party for antislavery Northerners.
A
This 1856 cartoon, with its ironic caption, gives the Northern view of Preston Brooks’s beating of Charles Sumner.


New Political Parties Emerge
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
What impact did the slavery issue have on the Democratic and Whig parties?
By the end of 1856, the nation's political landscape had a very different appearance than it had exhibited in 1848. The Whig Party had split over the issue of slavery and had lost support in both the North and the South. The Democratic Party, which had survived numerous crises in its history, was still alive, though scarred. A new Republican Party had formed and was moving within striking distance of the presidency. jy
SLAVERY DIVIDES WHIGS
In 1852 the Whig vote in the South fell dramatically, which helped produce a victory for the Democratic candidate, Franklin Pierce. In 1854 the Kansas-Nebraska Act completed the demise of the Whigs. Unable to agree on a national platform, the Southern faction splintered as its members looked for a proslavery, pro-Union party to join. At the same time, Whigs in the North sought a political alternative of their own. One alternative that appeared was the American Party, which soon became known as the Know-Nothing Party, because members were instructed to answer questions about their activities by saying, "I know nothing." The Know-Nothings supported nativism, the favoring of native-born people over immigrants. However, like the Whigs, the Know-Nothings split over the issue of slavery in the territories. Southern Know-Nothings looked for another alternative to the Democrats. Meanwhile Northern Know-Nothings began to edge toward the Republican Party.
Review Unit 161
'1

“ Free soil,
Free speech,
Free labor,
and Free men ”
FREE-SOILERS’ CAMPAIGN SLOGAN, 1848
Two antislavery parties had also emerged during the 1840s. The Liberty Party was formed for the purpose of pursuing the cause o a o 1 tion by passing new laws, but received only a small percentage of vo*es in the 1848 presidential election. In that same election, the Free-Soil arty, which opposed the extension of slavery into the territories, received ten percent of the popular vote in the presidential election. From this strong showing, it was clear that many Northerners opposed the extension of slavery in the territories.
THE FREE-SOILERS’ VOICE
Northern opposition to slavery in the territories was not necessarily based on positive feelings toward African Americans. It was not unusual for Northerners to be Free-Soilers without being abolitionists. Unlike abolitionists, a number of Northern Free-Soilers supported racist laws prohibiting settlement by blacks in their communities and denying them the right to vote.
What Free-Soilers primarily objected to was slavery’s competition with free white workers, or a wage-based labor force, upon which the North depended. They feared that such competition would drive down wages. Free-Soilers detected a dangerous pattern in such events as the passage of the Fugitive Slave Act and the repeal of the Missouri Compromise. They were convinced that a conspiracy existed on the part of the "diabolical slave power" to spread slavery throughout the United States.
THE NEW REPUBLICAN PARTY
In 1854 opponents of slavery in the territories formed a new political party, the Republican Party. The Republicans were united in opposing the Kansas-Nebraska Act and in keeping slavery out of the territories. Apart from these issues, however, the Republican party embraced a wide range of opinions. As the party grew, it took in Free-Soilers, antislavery Whigs and Democrats, and nativists, mostly from the North. The conservative faction hoped to resurrect the Missouri Compromise. At the opposite extreme were some radical abolitionists. During the election of 1856 the Republicans chose as their candidate John C. Fremont. The Democrats nominated James Buchanan of Pennsylvania. If Fremont had won, the South might have seceded then and there. However, Buchanan won, and the threat of secession was temporarily averted.
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
How did Free-Soilers differ from abolitionists?
Dred Scott’s Conflicts Lead to Secession
lawsuit set off
even more	Political conflicts only intensified after the election of President Buchanan. The
controversy over first slavery-related controversy arose on March 6, 1857, just two days after slavery, y	he took office
THE DRED SCOTT DECISION A
major Supreme Court decision was brought about by Dred Scott, a slave whose owner took him from the slave state of Missouri to free territory in Illinois and Wisconsin and back to Missouri. Scott appealed to the Supreme Court for his freedom on the grounds that living in a free state Illinois—and a free territory—Wisconsin had
made him a free man.
me case was in court for years. Finally, on March 6, 185 the Supreme Court ruled against Dred Scott. According’to tl ruling, Scott lacked any legal standing to sue in federal cou because he was not, and never could be, a citizen. Moreovc the Court ruled that being in free territory did not make a slm free. The Fifth Amendment protected property, includir s aves. For territories to exclude slavery would be to denrh slaveholders of their property.	F
Background
The Dred Scott case was only the second one In American history in which the Supreme Court reversed a federal legislative act.
Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
main idea
Comparing
,§1 Compare and contrast Lincoln’s and Douglas’s views on slavery.
Sectional passions exploded immediately. Many Northerners showered a torrent of abuse upon the Supreme Court, in part because a majority of its justices were Southerners. Warnings about the slave states’ influence on the national government spread. Southern slaveholders, on the other hand, were jubilant. In their interpretation, the Dred Scott decision not only permitted the extension of slavery but actually guaranteed it. (See Dred Scott v. Sandford on page 166.)
LINCOLN—DOUGLAS DEBATES
Several months after the Dred Scott decision, one of Illinois's greatest political contests got underway: the 1858 race for the U.S. Senate between Democratic incumbent Stephen Douglas and Republican challenger Congressman Abraham Lincoln. To many outsiders it must have seemed like an uneven match. Douglas was a well-known two-term senator with an outstanding record and a large campaign chest, while Lincoln was a self-educated man who had been elected to one term in Congress in 1846. To counteract Douglas, Lincoln challenged the man known as the "Little Giant" to a series of debates on the issue of slavery in the territories. Douglas accepted the challenge, and the stage was set for some of the most celebrated debates in U.S. history. The two men's positions were simple and consistent. Neither wanted slavery in
the territories, but they disagreed on how to keep it out. Douglas believed deeply in popular sovereignty. Lincoln, on the other hand, believed that slavery was immoral. However, he did not expect individuals to give up slavery unless Congress abolished slavery with an amendment.
In their second debate, Lincoln asked his opponent a crucial question: Could the settlers of a territory vote to exclude slavery before the territory became a state? Everyone knew that the Dred Scott decision said no—that territories could not exclude slavery.
Popular sovereignty, Lincoln implied, was thus an empty phrase.
Douglas replied that, if the people of a territory were Free-Soilers, then all they had to do was elect representatives who would not enforce slave property laws in that territory. In other words, people could get around Dred Scott.
Douglas won the Senate seat, but his response had widened the split in the Democratic Party. As for Lincoln, his attacks on the "vast moral evil" of slavery drew national attention, and some Republicans began thinking of him as an excellent candidate for the presidency in 1860. Jjy
HARPERS FERRY
While politicians debated the slavery issue, the abolitionist John Brown was studying the slave uprisings that had occurred in ancient Rome and, more recently, on the French island of Haiti. He believed that the time was ripe for similar uprisings in the United States. Brown secretly obtained financial backing from several prominent Northern abolitionists On the night of October 16, 1859, he led a band of 21 men, black and white, into Harpers Ferry, Virginia (now West Virginia). His aim was to seize the federal arsenal there and start a general slave uprising. A
Mathew Brady Studio photo of Stephen Douglas from 1860. (below) A photograph of Abraham Lincoln, also from 1860.
Review Unit 163
John Brown Going to His Hanging (1942), Horace Pippin. Oil on canvas, 24 1/8" x 30 1/4". Courtesy of the Museum of American Art of the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. John Lambert Fund [1943.11]
History Through
Art
JOHN BROWN GOING TO HIS HANGING
This painting by the African-American artist Horace Pippin shows John Brown being transported by wagon to his execution. The artist has focused our attention on the cruelty of Brown’s fate. The abolitionist is shown tied with the rope that will be used to hang him, sitting on the coffin that will receive his body after death. Brown’s dark shape is silhouetted by the large white building behind him, a structure that combines the features of both courthouse and prison.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Visual Sources 1.	Why do you think the African-American woman in the right-hand corner is looking away from the scene? How would you describe her expression?
2.	How has the artist expressed the hopelessness of the situation?
No such uprising occurred, however. Instead, troops put down the rebellion. Later, authorities tried Brown and put him to death. Public reaction to Brown's execution was immediate and intense in both sections of the country. In the North, bells tolled, guns fired salutes, and huge crowds gathered to hear fiery speakers denounce the South. The response was equally extreme in the South, where mobs assaulted whites who were suspected of holding antislavery views.
LINCOLN IS ELECTED PRESIDENT
As the 1860 presidential election approached, the Republicans nominated Abraham Lincoln. Lincoln appeared to be moderate in his views. Although he pledged to halt the further spread of slavery, he also tried to reassure Southerners that a Republican administration would not "interfere with their slaves, or with them, about their slaves." Nonetheless, many Southerners viewed him as an enemy. As the campaign developed, three major candidates besides Lincoln vied for office. The Democratic Party finally split over slavery. Northern Democrats rallied behind Douglas and his doctrine of popular sovereignty. Southern Democrats, who supported the Dred Scott decision, lined up behind Vice-President John C. Breckinridge of Kentucky. Former Know-Nothings and Whigs from the South organized the Constitutional Union Party and nominated John Bell of Tennessee as their candidate. Lincoln emerged as the winner with less than half the popular vote and with no electoral votes from the South. He did not even appear on the ballot in most of the slave states because of Southern hostility toward him. The outlook for the Union was grim, jy
SOUTHERN SECESSION
Lincoln's victory convinced Southerners—who had viewed the struggle over slavery partly as a conflict between the states' right of self-determination and federal government control—that they had lost their political voice in the national government. Some Southern states decided to act. South Carolina led the way, seceding from the Union on December 20, 1860. When the news reached Northern-born William Tecumseh Sherman, superintendent of the Louisiana State Seminary of Learning and Military Academy MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
$ What happened to the Democratic Party as the 1860 presidential election approached?
Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
(now Louisiana State University), he poured out his fears for the South.
HISTORICAL
A
Personal Voice william tecumseh sherman 6'This country will be drenched in blood. . . . [T]he people of the North . . . are not going to let this country be destroyed without a mighty effort to save it. . . . Besides, where are your men and appliances of war to contend against them? . . . You are rushing into war with one of the most powerful, ingeniously mechanical and determined people on earth—right at your doors. . . . Only in spirit and determination are you prepared for war. In all else you are totally unprepared.99
—quoted in None Died in Vain
Mississippi soon followed South Carolina's lead, as did Florida, Alabama, Georgia, Louisiana, and Texas. In February 1861, delegates from the secessionist states met in Montgomery, Alabama, where they formed the Confederate States of America, or Confederacy. They also drew up a constitution that closely resembled that of the United States, but with a few notable differences. The most important difference was that it "protected and recognized" slavery in new territories.
The Confederates then unanimously elected former senator Jefferson Davis of Mississippi as president. The North had heard threats of secession before. When it finally happened, no one was shocked. But one key question remained in everyone's mind: Would the North allow the South to leave the Union without a fight?
SPOTLIGHT
SECESSION AND THE BORDER STATES
Four slave states—Maryland, Kentucky, Missouri, and Delaware—were undecided about secession. Lincoln believed that these states would be essential to the success of the Union if war broke out. They had large populations, numerous factories, and strategic access to the Ohio River. Moreover, Maryland nearly surrounded Washington, D.C., the seat of government.
Lincoln faced a choice: free the slaves and make abolitionists happy, or ignore slavery for the moment to keep from alienating the border states. He chose the latter, but that did not prevent violent conflicts between secessionists and Unionists in Maryland, Kentucky, and Missouri. With the intervention of the militia, and some political maneuvering in those states’ legislatures, Lincoln kept the four border states in the Union.
i|
!
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•secession	.Harriet Tubman	-Dred Scott	-Confederacy
•popular sovereignty	-Harriet Beecher	Stowe	-Stephen Douglas	-Jefferson Davis
•Underground Railroad	-Franklin Pierce	-Abraham Lincoln
i
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a time line like the one below, showing the events that heightened the tensions between the North and the South.
Select one event and explain its significance.
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	HYPOTHESIZING
Review issues and events in this section that reflect the growing conflict between the North and the South. Do you think there were any points at which civil war might have been averted? Think About:
•	the Compromise of 1850, the Fugitive Slave Act, and the Kansas-Nebraska Act
•	the new political parties
•	the Supreme Court’s ruling in the Dred Scott decision
•	the election of Abraham Lincoln as president in 1860
EVALUATING LEADERSHIP
John Brown, Harriet Tubman,
Harriet Beecher Stowe, and Stephen Douglas all opposed slavery. Who do you think had the greatest impact on American history and why?
DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
How did the tension between states’ rights and national government authority manifest itself in the events leading up to the Civil War?
Review Unit 165
s
iS
v
A

DRED SCOTT
v. SANDFORD (1857) ORIGINS OF THE CASE
Dred Scott's slave master had brought him from the slave state of Missouri to live for a time in free territory and in the free state of Illinois. Eventually they returned to Missouri. Scott believed that because he had lived in free territory, he should be free. In 1854 he sued in federal court for his freedom. The court ruled against him, and he appealed to the Supreme Court. THE RULING
The Supreme Court ruled that African Americans were not and could never be citizens. Thus, Dred Scott had no right even to file a lawsuit and remained enslaved. LEGAL REASONING
The Court's decision, based primarily on Chief Justice Roger Taney's written opinion, made two key findings. First, it held that because Scott was a slave, he was not a citizen and had no right to sue in a United States court.
“ We think they [slaves] ... are not included, and were not intended to be included, under the word 'citizens’ in the Constitution, and can therefore claim none of the rights and privileges which that instrument provides for and secures to citizens of the United States.”
This could have been the end of the matter, but Taney went further. He said that by banning slavery, Congress was, in effect, taking away property. Such an action, he wrote, violated the Fifth Amendment, which guarantees the right not to be deprived of property without due process of law (such as a hearing). Thus, all congressional efforts to ban slavery in the territories were prohibited.
Justices John McLean and Benjamin Curtis strongly dissented on both points. They showed that the U.S. Constitution, state constitutions, and other laws had recognized African Americans as citizens. They also pointed to the clause in the Constitution giving Congress the power to "make all needful Rules and Regulations" to govern U.S. territories. In their view, this clause gave Congress the power to prohibit slavery in the territories.
Chief Justice Roger Taney
LEGAL SOURCES
U.S. CONSTITUTION
U.S. CONSTITUTION, ARTICLE 4, SECTION 2
(1789) “No Person held to Service or Labor in one State, . . . escaping into another, shall, in Consequence of any Law or Regulation therein, be discharged from such Service or Labor. ...”
U.S. CONSTITUTION, ARTICLE 4, SECTION 3
(1789) “The Congress shall have Power to dispose of and make all needful Rules and Regulations respecting the Territory or other Property belonging to the United States. ...”
U.S. CONSTITUTION,
FIFTH AMENDMENT
(1791) “No person shall be . . . deprived of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law. ...”
RELATED CASES
ABLEMAN v. BOOTH (1858)
The Court decided that the Fugitive Slave Act was c( stitutional and that laws passed in Northern states that prohibited the return of fugitive slaves were unconstitutional.


WHY IT MATTERED
Taney's opinion in Dred Scott had far-reaching consequences. Legally, the opinion greatly expanded the reach of slavery. Politically, it heightened the sectional tensions that would lead to the Civil War.
Before the Court decided Dred Scott, Americans widely accepted the idea that Congress and the states could limit slavery. As the dissenters argued, many previous acts of Congress had limited slavery—for example, the Northwest Ordinance had banned slavery in the Northwest Territory—and no one had claimed that those acts violated property rights.
Taney's opinion in Dred Scott, however, was a major change. This expansion of slaveholders' rights cast doubt on whether free states could prevent slave owners from bringing or even selling slaves into free areas.
As a result, Dred Scott intensified the slavery debate as no single event had before. In going beyond what was needed to settle the case before him, Taney's ruling became a political act, and threw into question the legitimacy of the Court. Further, Taney's opinion took the extreme proslavery position and installed it as the national law. It not only negated all the compromises made to date by pro- and antislavery forces, but it seemed to preclude any possible future compromises.
HISTORICAL IMPACT
It took four years of bitter civil war to find out if Taney's opinion would stand as the law of the land. It would not. Immediately after the Civil War, the federal government moved to abolish slavery with the Thirteenth Amendment (1865) and then to extend state and national citizenship with the Fourteenth Amendment (1868) to /z[a]ll persons born or naturalized in the United States." The wording of these amend-
Contemporary newspaper article
describing the Dred Scott case.
ments was expressly intended to nullify Dred Scott.
These amendments meant that Dred Scott would
no longer be used as a precedent—an earlier ruling that can be used to justify a current one. Instead, it is now pointed to as an important lesson on the limits of the Supreme Court's power, as a key step on the road to the Civil War, and as one of the worst decisions ever made by the Supreme Court.
THINKING CRITICALLY
CONNECT TO HISTORY
1. Developing Historical Perspective Use the library to find commentaries on Dred Scott written at the time the decision was made. Read two of these commentaries and identify which section—North or South the writer or speaker came from. Explain how each person s region shaped his or her views.
CONNECT TO TODAY
CmpuKY 2. Visit the links for Historic Decisions of the Supreme Court to research what it means to be a citizen of the United States and what rights that citizenship extends. Research which constitutional amendments, U.S. laws, and Supreme Court decisions guarantee the rights of citizens. Prepare an oral presentation or annotated display to summarize your findings.
I’/’T hmhsocialstudies.coml
INTERNET ACTIVITY
Review Unit 167
The Civil War Begins
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW

Terms & Names
Shortly after the nation’s Southern states seceded from the Union, war began between the North and South.
The nation’s identity was forged in part by the Civil War. Sectional divisions remain very strong today.
• Fort Sumter •Bull Run •Stonewall Jackson
S.
Grant •Robert E. Lee •Antietam •Emancipation Proclamation •conscription •Clara Barton •income tax
One American’si Story
* hmhsocialstudies.com
I TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on military actions and social and economic changes during the first two years of the Civil War.
On April 18, 1861, Major Robert Anderson was traveling by ship from Charleston, South Carolina, to New York City. That day, Anderson wrote a report to the secretary of war in which he described his most recent command.
A
Personal Voice Robert anderson “Having defended Fort Sumter for thirty-four hours, until the quarters were entirely burned, the main gates destroyed by fire,... the magazine surrounded by flames,. . . four barrels and three cartridges of powder only being available, and no provisions but pork remaining, I accepted terms of evacuation . . . and marched out of the fort. . . with colors flying and drums beating . . . and saluting my flag with fifty guns. ” —quoted in Fifty Basic Civil War Documents
Months earlier, as soon as the Confederacy was formed, Confederate soldiers in each secessionist state began seizing federal installations—especially forts. By the time of Lincoln's inauguration on March 4, 1861, only four Southern forts remained in Union hands. The most important was Fort Sumter, on an island in Charleston harbor.
Lincoln decided to neither abandon Fort Sumter nor reinforce it. He would merely send in "food for hungry men." At 4:30 a.m. on April 12, Confederate batteries began thundering away to the cheers of Charleston's citizens. The deadly struggle between North and South was under way.
▲
Major Robert Anderson observes the firing at Fort Sumter in 1861.
Union and Confederate Forces Clash
News of Fort Sumter's fall united the North. When Lincoln called for volunteers, the response throughout the Northern states was overwhelming. However, Lincoln's call for troops provoked a very different reaction in the states of the
iS8 Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
Northern and Southern Resources, 1861
Source: Times Atlas of World History, 1989
Military Strength
Naval Ship
Iron
Production
15 to 1
Firearms
Production
32 to 1
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Graphs 1.	Which side—North or South—had the advantage in terms of industrial production?
2.	What do the overall data suggest about the eventual outcome of the war?
Industrial Workers
Source: Battles and Leaders of the Civil War (1884-1888; reprinted ed., 1956)
Most Confederate soldiers fought to protect the South from Northern aggression.
▲
Most Union troops saw the war as a struggle to preserve the Union.
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
Why were Northern factories and railroads so advantageous to the Union’s war effort?
upper South. In April and May, Virginia, Arkansas, North Carolina, and Tennessee seceded, bringing the number of Confederate states to eleven. The western counties of Virginia opposed slavery, so they seceded from Virginia and were admitted into the Union as West Virginia in 1863. The four remaining slave states— Maryland, Delaware, Kentucky, and Missouri—remained in the Union.
STRENGTHS AND STRATEGIES
The Union and the Confederacy were unevenly matched. The Union enjoyed enormous advantages in resources over the South—more people, more factories, greater food production, and a more extensive railroad system. The Confederacy's advantages included "King Cotton," first-rate generals, and highly motivated soldiers. Both sides adopted military strategies suited to their objectives and resources. The Union, which had to conquer the South to win, devised a three-part plan:
•	The navy would blockade Southern ports, so they could neither export cotton nor import much-needed manufactured goods.
•	Union riverboats and armies would move down the Mississippi River and split the Confederacy in two.
•	Union armies would capture the Confederate capital at Richmond, Virginia.
The Confederacy's strategy was mostly defensive, although Southern leaders encouraged their generals to attack the North if the opportunity arose.
BULL RUN
The first bloodshed on the battlefield occurred about three months after Fort Sumter fell, near the little creek of Bull Run, just 25 miles from Washington, D.C. The battle was a seesaw affair. In the morning the Union army gained the upper hand, but the Confederates held firm, inspired by General Thomas J. Jackson. "There stands Jackson like a stone wall!” another general shouted coining the nickname Stonewall Jackson. In the afternoon Confederate reinforcements helped win the first Southern victory. Fortunately for the Union, the Confederates were too exhausted to follow up their victory with an attack on Washington. Still, Confederate morale soared. Many Confederate soldiers, confident that the war was over, left the army and went home. UNION ARMIES IN THE WEST
Lincoln responded to the defeat at Bull Run by stepping up enlistments. He also appointed General George McClellan to lead the Union forces encamped near Washington. While McClellan drilled his troops, the Union forces in the west began the fight for control of the Mississippi River. Review Unit 169
In February 1862 a Union army invaded western Tennessee. (See the Battles of the West map below.) At its head was General Ulysses S. Grant, a brave and decisive military commander. In just eleven days, Grant's forces captured two Confederate forts, Fort Henry on the Tennessee River and Fort Donelson on the Cumberland River. Two months later, Grant narrowly escaped disaster near Shiloh, a small church in Tennessee close to the Mississippi border. After Grant failed to have his troops dig trenches or set out adequate guards and patrols, thousands of Confederate soldiers carried out a surprise attack. Grant averted disaster by reorganizing his troops and driving the Confederate forces away the next day. However, Shiloh demonstrated what a bloody slaughter the war was becoming. Nearly one-fourth of the 100,000 men who fought there were killed, wounded, or captured.
As Grant pushed toward the Mississippi River, David G. Farragut, commanding a Union fleet of about 40 ships, seized New Orleans, the Confederacy's largest city and busiest port. (See the Fall of New Orleans map below.) By June, Farragut had taken control of much of the lower Mississippi. Between Grant and Farragut, the Union had nearly achieved its goal of cutting the Confederacy in two. Only Port Hudson, Louisiana, and Vicksburg, Mississippi, still stood in the way.
THE WAR FOR THE CAPITALS
In the spring of 1862, while McClellan was leading his army toward Richmond, he met a Confederate army commanded by General Joseph E. Johnston. (See the Battles of the East map on page 171.) After a series of battles, Johnston was wounded, and command of the army passed on to Robert E. Lee. Lee was very different from McClellan—modest rather than vain, and willing to go beyond military textbooks in his tactics. Determined to save the Confederate capital, Lee drove McClellan away from Richmond. MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
Why was control of the Mississippi River so important to the Union?

400 kilometers
Civil War, 1861-1862
Area controlled by Union Area won by Union, 1861-1862 Area controlled by Confederacy Union troop movements Confederate troop movements Union victory
Confederate victory
Fort
Capital
400 miles
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Region In which region of the country did Northern forces have the most success?
2.	Place In which states did Confederate troops attempt invasions of the North?
Vocabulary casualties: those who are injured, killed, captured, or missing in action
Now it was Lee's turn to move against Washington. In September his troops crossed the Potomac into the Union state of Maryland. At this point McClellan had an incredible stroke of luck. A Union corporal found a copy of Lee's orders wrapped around some cigars! The plan revealed that Lee's and Stonewall Jackson's armies were separated for the moment.
McClellan ordered his men to pursue Lee, and the two sides fought on September 17 near a creek called the Antietam (an-te'tem). The clash proved to be the bloodiest single-day battle in American history, with casualties totaling more than 26,000. The next day, instead of pursuing the battered Confederate army into Virginia and possibly ending the war, McClellan did nothing. As a result, Lincoln removed him from command.
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT




MAIN IDEA
Drawing
Conclusions
$ Why did both the Union and Confederacy care about British neutrality?
The Politics of War
After secession occurred, many Southerners believed that dependence on Southern cotton would force Great Britain to formally recognize the Confederacy as an independent nation. Unfortunately for the South, Britain had accumulated a huge cotton inventory just before the outbreak of war. Instead of importing Southern cotton, the British now needed Northern wheat and corn. Britain decided that neutrality was the best policy.
BOYS IN WAR
Both the Union and Confederate armies had soldiers who were under 18 years of age. Examination of some Confederate recruiting lists for 1861-1862 reveals that approximately 5 percent were 17 or younger—with some as young as 13. The percentage of boys in the Union army was lower, perhaps 1.5 percent. These figures, however, do not count the great number of boys who ran away to follow each army without officially enlisting.
Review Unit 171
KEY PLAYERS
ABRAHAM LINCOLN 1809-1865
People question why Lincoln believed so passionately in the Union. A possible answer lies in his life story. He was born into poverty, the son of illiterate parents. Lincoln once said that in his boyhood there was “absolutely nothing to excite ambition for educa-
tion,” yet he hungered for knowledge.
Apart from a year’s worth of school, Lincoln educated himself and, after working as rail-splitter, flatboatman, storekeeper, and surveyor, he taught himself to be a lawyer. This led to careers in politics and law—and eventually to the White House. Perhaps because of this upward mobility, Lincoln fought passionately to preserve the democracy he described as “the last best hope of earth.”
JEFFERSON DAVIS 1808-1889
Davis, who was named after Thomas Jefferson, was born in Kentucky but grew up in Mississippi. After graduating from West Point, he served in the military, then settled down as a planter, before going into politics. He served terms in the U.S. Senate.
His election as president of the Confederacy dismayed him. As his wife Varina wrote, “I thought his genius was military, but as a party manager he would not succeed. He did not know the arts of the politician . . .” Varina was right. Davis fought frequently with other Confederate leaders and was blamed for the refusal of many Southern states to put the Confederacy’s welfare above their own.
HISTORY
VIDEO
Emancipation
Proclamation
7\ hmhsocialstudies.com
PROCLAIMING EMANCIPATION
As Jefferson Davis's Confederacy struggled in vain to gain foreign recognition, abolitionist feeling grew in the North. Although Lincoln disliked slavery, he did not believe that the federal government had the power to abolish it where it already existed. As the war progressed, however, Lincoln did find a way to use his constitutional war powers to end slavery. The Confederacy used the labor of slaves to build fortifications and grow food. Lincoln's powers as commander in chief allowed him to order his troops to seize enemy resources. Therefore, he decided that, just as he could order the Union army to take Confederate supplies, he could also authorize the army to emancipate slaves. Emancipation was not just a moral issue; it became a weapon of war.
On January 1, 1863, Lincoln issued his Emancipation Proclamation. The following portion captured national attention.
from The Emancipation Proclamation abraham Lincoln
“I do order and declare that all persons held as slaves within these said designated States and parts of States are, and henceforward shall be free; and that the Executive Government of the United States, including the military and naval authorities thereof, will recognize and maintain the freedom of said persons.
And I hereby enjoin upon the people so declared to be free to abstain from all violence, unless in necessary self-defense; and I recommend to them, that in all cases, when allowed, they labor faithfully for reasonable wages.
And I further declare and make known that such persons of suitable condition will be received into the armed service of the United States to garrison forts, positions, stations, and other places, and to man vessels of all sorts in said service.
And, upon this, sincerely believed to be an act of justice, warranted by the Constitution, upon military necessity, I invoke the considerate Judgment of mankind and the gracious favor of Almighty God.”
—from The Emancipation Proclamation, January 1,1863
172 Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
I
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
In what way was the Emancipation Proclamation a part of Lincoln’s military strategy?
The proclamation did not free any slaves immediately because it applied only to areas behind Confederate lines, outside Union control. Nevertheless, for many, the proclamation gave the war a moral purpose by turning the struggle into a fight to free the slaves. It also ensured that compromise was no longer possible.
BOTH SIDES FACE POLITICAL DISSENT
Neither side in the Civil War was completely unified. The North harbored thousands of Confederate sympathizers, while the South had thousands of Union sympathizers. Lincoln dealt forcefully with disloyalty and dissent. He suspended the writ of habeas corpus, which prevents the government from holding citizens without formally charging them with crimes. Jefferson Davis also adopted this practice.
Life During Wartime
Vocabulary desertion: the act
of abandoning an assigned post or duty
The war led to social upheaval and political unrest in both the North and the South. As the fighting intensified, heavy casualties and widespread desertions led each side to impose conscription, a draft that forced men to serve in the army. In the North, conscription led to draft riots, the most violent of which took place in New York City. Sweeping changes occurred in the wartime economies of both sides as well as in the roles played by African Americans and women.
AFRICAN AMERICANS FIGHT FOR FREEDOM
Although African Americans made up only 1 percent of the North's population, by war's end about 180,000 African Americans had fought for the Union—about 10 percent of the Northern army. In spite of their dedication, African-American soldiers in the Union army suffered discrimination. They served in separate regiments commanded by white officers and earned lower pay for most of the war. SOLDIERS SUFFER ON BOTH SIDES
Both Union and Confederate soldiers had marched off to war thinking it would be a glorious affair. They were soon disillusioned, not just by heavy battlefield casualties but also by such unhealthy conditions as filthy surroundings, a limited diet, and inadequate medical care. In the 1860s, the technology of killing had outrun the technology of medical care. Except when fighting or marching, most soldiers lived amid heaps of rubbish and open latrines. As a result, body lice, dysentery, and diarrhea were common.
If conditions in the army camps were bad, those in war prisons were atrocious. The Confederate camps were especially overcrowded and unsanitary. The South's lack of food and tent canvas also contributed to the appalling conditions. Prison camps in the North were only slightly better. Northern prisons provided
Wounded Union troops recuperate after battle near a makeshift field hospital.
▼
more space and adequate amounts of food. However, thousands of Confederate prisoners, housed in quarters with little or no heat, contracted pneumonia and died. Historians estimate that 15 percent of Union prisoners in Southern prisons died, while 12 percent of Confederate prisoners died in Northern prisons.
WOMEN WORK TO IMPROVE CONDITIONS
Although women did not fight, thousands contributed to the war effort. Some 3,000 women served as Union army nurses. One dedicated Union nurse was Clara Barton, who went on to found the American Red Cross after the war. Barton cared for the sick and wounded, often at the front lines of battle. Thousands of Southern women also volunteered for nursing duty. Sally Tompkins, for example, performed so heroically in her hospital duties that she eventually was commissioned as a captain. Both sides benefited because women devoted so much time and energy to nursing. Women's help was desperately needed as a series of battles in the Mississippi Valley and in the East soon sent casualties flooding into Northern and Southern hospitals alike.
▲
Union nurses, such as Clara Barton (above) and Louisa May Alcott, faced the hazards of disease in field hospitals.
Background
After the war, Clara Barton became the first woman to head a U.S. government agency, whose employees helped family members to track down missing soldiers.
THE WAR AFFECTS REGIONAL ECONOMIES
In general, the war expanded the North's economy and shattered the South's. The Confederacy soon faced a food shortage due to the drain of manpower into the army, the Union occupation of food-growing areas, and the loss of enslaved field workers. Food prices skyrocketed, and the inflation rate rose 7,000 percent. Overall, the war's effect on the economy of the North was much more positive. The army's need for supplies supported woolen mills, steel foundries, and many other industries. The economic boom had a dark side, however. Wages did not keep up with prices, and many people's standard of living declined. When white male workers went out on strike, employees hired free blacks, immigrants, and women to replace them for lower wages. As the Northern economy grew, Congress decided to help pay for the war by collecting the nation's first income tax, a tax that takes a specified percentage of an individual's income.
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a chart like the one shown, listing the military actions and social and economic changes of the first two years of the Civil War.
Military Actions	Social & Economic Changes
1.	1.
2.	2.
What changes brought about by the war had the most effect on civilians in both the South and the North?
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING EFFECTS
What effects did the Civil War have on women and African Americans?
Think About:
•	the impact of the Emancipation Proclamation
•	women’s role in the war effort
4.	CONTRASTING
What advantages did the Union have over the South?
ANALYZING PRIMARY SOURCES
This medical kit was used during the Civil War. What difficulties would caregivers and patients have faced during this time?
174 Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
The North Takes Charge
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
After four years of bloody fighting, the Union wore down the Confederacy and won the war.
The Union victory confirmed the authority of the federal government over the states.
•Gettysburg •Gettysburg Address •Vicksburg •William Tecumseh Sherman
'Appomattox Court House 'Thirteenth Amendment John Wilkes Booth
OneAmerican'sStdry
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the consequences of the Civil War.
Mary Chesnut was the daughter of a South Carolina governor and the wife of a U.S. senator who resigned his office to serve in the Confederate government. During the war, she recorded her observations and thoughts in a diary. In 1864, Chesnut went to hear Benjamin H. Palmer, a minister and professor, speak about the war. In her diary, she described how Palmer's pessimistic words filled her with foreboding about the future of the Confederacy.
Mary Chesnut
A
Personal Voice mary chesnut “September 21st... I did not know before how utterly hopeless was our situation. This man is so eloquent. It was hard to listen and not give way. Despair was his word—and martyrdom. He offered us nothing more in this world than the mar* tyr’s crown. ... He spoke of these times of our agony. And then came the cry: ‘Help us, oh God. Vain is the help of man.’ And so we came away—shaken to the depths.
—quoted in Mary Chesnut’s Civil War
By September 1864, the Northern armies had won several decisive battles. Mary Chesnut must already have had some idea of the threat posed to her way of life, however. In 1863 she wrote that the South, "the only world we cared for," had been "literally kicked to pieces."
The Tide Turns
The year 1863 actually had begun well for the South. In December 1862, Lee's army had defeated the Union Army of the Potomac at Fredericksburg, Virginia. Then in May the South defeated the North again at Chancellorsville, Virginia.
Review Unit 175
The North's only consolation after Chancellorsville came as the result of an accident. As General Stonewall Jackson returned from a patrol on May 2, Confederate guards accidentally shot him in the left arm. A surgeon amputated his arm the following day. When Lee heard the news, he exclaimed, "He has lost his left arm but I have lost my right." The true loss was still to come; Jackson caught pneumonia and died on May 10.
Despite Jackson's death, Lee decided to press his military advantage and invade the North. He needed supplies and he thought that a major Confederate victory on Northern soil might tip the balance of public opinion in the Union to the proslavery politicians. Accordingly, he crossed the Potomac into Maryland and then pushed on into Pennsylvania.
THE BATTLE OF GETTYSBURG
Near the sleepy town of Gettysburg, in southern Pennsylvania, the most decisive battle of the war was fought. The Battle of Gettysburg began on July 1 when Confederate soldiers led by A. P. Hill encountered several brigades of Union cavalry under the command of John Buford, an experienced officer from Illinois. Buford ordered his men to take defensive positions on the hills and ridges surrounding the town. When Hill's troops marched toward the town from the west, Buford's men were waiting. The shooting attracted more troops and both sides called for reinforcements. By the end of the first day of fighting, 90,000 Union troops under the command of General George Meade had taken the field against 75,000 Confederates, led by General Lee.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
What did Lee hope to gain by invading the North?
76 Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
Why was the Battle of Gettysburg a disaster for the South?
MAIN IDEA
Forming
Generalizations
What ideas about the United States did Lincoln express in the Gettysburg Address?
By the second day of battle, the Confederates had driven the Union troops from Gettysburg and had taken control of the town. However, the North still held positions on Cemetery Ridge, the high ground south of Gettysburg. On July 2, Lee ordered General James Longstreet to attack Cemetery Ridge. At about 4:00 p.m., Longstreet s troops advanced from Seminary Ridge, where they were positioned in a peach orchard and wheat field that stood between them and most of the Union army on Cemetery Ridge. The Confederates repeatedly attacked the Union lines. Although the Union troops were forced to concede some territory, their lines withheld the withering Confederate onslaught.
On July 3, Lee ordered an artillery barrage on the center of the Union lines on Cemetery Ridge. For two hours, the two armies fired at one another in a vicious exchange that could be heard in Pittsburgh. Believing they had silenced the Union guns, the Confederates then charged the lines. Confederate forces marched across the farmland between their position and the Union high ground. Suddenly, Northern artillery renewed its barrage, and the infantry fired on the rebels as well. Devastated, the Confederates staggered back to their lines. After the battle, Lee gave up any hopes of invading the North and led his army back to Virginia.
The three-day battle produced staggering losses: 23,000 Union men and 28,000 Confederates were killed or wounded. Total casualties were more than 30 percent. Despite the devastation, Northerners were enthusiastic about breaking "the charm of Robert Lee's invincibility." &
THE GETTYSBURG ADDRESS
In November 1863, a ceremony was held to dedicate a cemetery in Gettysburg. There, President Lincoln spoke for a little more than two minutes. According to some contemporary historians, Lincoln's Gettysburg Address "remade America." Before Lincoln's speech, people said, "The United States are ..." Afterward, they said, "The United States is ..." In other words, the speech helped the country to realize that it was not just a collection of individual states; it was one unified nation. The Gettysburg Address abraham Lincoln Four score and seven years ago our fathers brought forth on this continent a new nation, conceived in Liberty and dedicated to the proposition that all men are created equal.
Now we are engaged in a great civil war, testing whether that nation, or any nation so conceived and so dedicated, can long endure. We are met on a great battle-field of that war. We have come to dedicate a portion of that field, as a final resting-place for those who here gave their lives that that nation might live. It is altogether fitting and proper that we should do this.
But, In a larger sense, we can not dedicate—we can not consecrate—we can not hallow—this ground. The brave men, living and dead, who struggled here, have consecrated it, far above our poor power to add or detract. The world will little note, nor long remember what we say here, but it can never forget what they did here. It Is for us the living, rather, to be dedicated here to the unfinished work which they who fought here have thus far so nobly advanced. It Is rather for us to be here dedicated to the great task remaining before us—that from these honored dead we take increased devotion to that cause for which they gave the last full measure of devotion—that we here highly resolve that these dead shall not have died in vain—that this nation, under God, shall have a new birth of freedom—and that government of the people,’ by the people, for the people, shall not perish from the earth
—“The Gettysburg Address,” November 19,1863
t, 1
HISTORY
VIDEO
Gettysburg
Address
insn
Review Unit 177
History Through
Photojournalism j-
MATHEW BRADY’S PHOTOGRAPHS
The Civil War marked the first time in United States history that photography, a resource since 1839, played a major role in a military conflict. Hundreds of photographers traveled with the troops, working both privately and for the military. The most famous Civil War photographer was Mathew Brady, who employed about 20 photographers to meet the public demand for pictures from the battlefront. This was the beginning of American news photography, or photojournalism.
Many of Brady’s photographs are a mix of realism and artificiality. Due to the primitive level of photographic technology, subjects had to be carefully posed and remain still during the long exposure times.
In this 1864 photograph Brady posed a kneeling soldier, offering a canteen of water, beside a wounded soldier with his arm in a sling. Images like this, showing the wounded or the dead, brought home the harsh reality of war to the civilian population.
“Encampment of the Army of the Potomac” (May 1862). Few photographs of the Civil War are as convincing in their naturalism as this view over a Union encampment. Simply by positioning the camera behind the soldiers, the photographer draws the viewer into the composition. Although we cannot see the soldiers’ faces, we are compelled to see through their eyes.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Visual Sources 1- What elements in the smaller photograph seem posed or contrived? What elements are more realistic?
2. How do these photographs compare with more heroic imagery of traditional history painting?
178 Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
$ Why was the Union so intent on gaining control of the Mississippi River?
GRANT WINS AT VICKSBURG
While Meade's Army of the Potomac was destroying Confederate hopes in Gettysburg, Union general Ulysses S. Grant fought to take Vicksburg, one of the two remaining Confederate strongholds on the Mississippi River. Vicksburg itself was particularly important because it rested on bluffs above the river from which guns could control all water traffic. In the winter of 1862-1863, Grant tried several schemes to reach Vicksburg and take it from the Confederates. Nothing seemed to work—until the spring of 1863. Grant began by weakening the Confederate defenses that protected Vicksburg. He sent Benjamin Grierson to lead his cavalry brigade through the heart of Mississippi. Grierson succeeded in destroying rail lines and distracting Confederate forces from Union infantry working its way toward Vicksburg. Grant was able to land his troops south of Vicksburg on April 30 and immediately sent his men in search of Confederate troops in Mississippi. In 18 days, Union forces had sacked Jackson, the capital of the state.
Their confidence growing with every victory, Grant and his troops rushed to Vicksburg, hoping to take the city while the rebels were reeling from their losses. Grant ordered two frontal attacks on Vicksburg, neither of which succeeded. So, in the last week of May 1863, Grant settled in for a siege. He set up a steady barrage of artillery, shelling the city from both the river and the land for several hours a day, forcing the city's residents into caves that they dug out of the yellow clay hillsides.
After food supplies ran so low that people were reduced to eating dogs and mules, the Confederate command of Vicksburg asked Grant for terms of surrender. The city fell on July 4. Five days later Port Hudson, Louisiana, the last Confederate holdout on the Mississippi, also fell. The Union had achieved another of its major military objectives, and the Confederacy was cut in two.

MW
ii
Review Unit 179
The Confederacy Wears Down
The twin defeats at Gettysburg and Vicksburg cost the South much of its limited
manpower. The Confederacy was already low on food, shoes, uniforms, guns, and
ammunition. No longer able to attack, it could hope only to hang on long
enough to destroy Northern morale and work toward an armistice.
nhn nrnvpH increasing-
Vocabulary armistice: truce
key players
ULYSSES S. GRANT 1822-1885
Born Hiram Ulysses Grant, the future president did not correct a clerk at West Point who recorded his name as Ulysses Simpson Grant. Thereafter, he went by the name U. S. Grant.
Grant once said of himself, “A military life had no charms for me.” Yet a military man was what he was destined to be. He fought in the war with Mexico—even though he termed it “wicked”—because he believed his duty was to serve his country. His next post was in the West, where Grant grew so lonely for his family that he resigned.
When the Civil War broke out, the Illinois governor made Grant a colonel of volunteers because George McClellan had been too busy to see him! However, once Grant began fighting in Tennessee, Lincoln was quick to recognize his special strength. When newspapers demanded Grant’s dismissal after Shiloh, Lincoln replied firmly, “I can’t spare this man. He fights.”
ROBERT E. LEE 1807-1870
Lee was an aristocrat, related to some of Virginia’s leading families. In fact, his father had been one of George Washington’s favorite lieutenants, and his wife, Mary Ann Randolph Custis, was the great-granddaughter of Martha Washington. His sense of family honor may have contributed to his allegiance to his state. As a man who believed slavery was evil, Lee fought for the Confederacy only because of his loyalty to his beloved Virginia. “I did only what my duty demanded. I could have taken no other course without dishonor,” he said.
As a general, Lee was tactically brilliant, but he seldom challenged Confederate civilian leaders about their failure to provide his army with adequate food, clothing, or weapons. On the other hand, his soldiers almost worshiped him because he never abused them and always insisted on sharing their hardships. His men called him “Uncle Robert,” just as the Union troops called Grant Uncle Sam.
ly unrealistic, however, in part because Southern morale was weakening. Many Confederate soliders had deserted, while newspapers, state legislatures, and individuals throughout the South began to call openly for peace. Worse yet for the Confederacy, Lincoln finally found not just one but two generals who would fight.
TOTAL WAR
In March 1864, President Lincoln appointed Ulysses S. Grant commander of all Union armies. Grant in turn appointed William Tecumseh Sherman as commander of the military division of the Mississippi. These two appointments would change the course of the war. Old friends and comrades in arms, both men believed in waging total war. They reasoned that it was the strength of the people's will that was keeping the war going. If the Union could destroy the Southern population's will to fight, the Confederacy would collapse.
Grant's overall strategy was to decimate Lee's army in Virginia while Sherman raided Georgia. Even if his casualties ran twice as high as those of Lee— and they did—the North could afford it; the South could not. jy
SHERMAN’S MARCH
In the spring of 1864, Sherman began his march southeast through Georgia to the sea, creating a wide path of destruction. His army burned almost every house in its path and destroyed livestock and railroads. Sherman was determined to make Southerners
I MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
jy Why did Sherman and Grant want to wage “total war
Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
MAIN IDEA
Evaluating
F;
Do you think that Sherman’s destructive march to the sea was necessary? Why or why not? "so sick of war that generations would pass away before they would again appeal to it." By mid-November he had burned most of Atlanta. After reaching the ocean, Sherman's forces—followed by 25,000 former slaves—turned north to help Grant "wipe out Lee."
THE ELECTION OF 1864
Despite the war, politics in the Union went on as usual. As the 1864 presidential election approached, Lincoln faced heavy opposition from the Democrats and from a faction within his own party. A number of Northerners were dismayed at the war's length and its high casualty rates. Lincoln was pessimistic about his chances. "I am going to be beaten," he said in August, "and unless some great change takes place, badly beaten." However, some great change did take place. News of General Sherman's victories inspired the North and helped Lincoln win reelection.
THE SURRENDER AT APPOMATTOX
On April 3, 1865, Union troops conquered Richmond, the Confederate capital. Southerners had abandoned the city the day before, setting it afire to keep the Northerners from taking it. On April 9, 1865, in a Virginia town called Appomattox (ap'a-maUaks) Court House, Lee and Grant met at a private home to arrange a Confederate surrender. At Lincoln's request, the terms were generous. Grant paroled Lee's soldiers and sent them home with their possessions and three days' worth of rations. Officers were permitted to keep their side arms. Within a month all remaining Confederate resistance collapsed. After four long years, the Civil War was over. The War Changes the Nation
The Civil War caused tremendous political, economic, technological, and social change in the United States. It also exacted a high price in terms of human life. Approximately 360,000 Union soldiers and 260,000 Confederates died, nearly as many American combat deaths as in all other American wars combined.
Thomas Lovell’s Surrender at Appomattox is a modern rendering of Lee’s surrender to Grant. This is Lovell’s version of the scene—no photographs of the event exist.
▼

The Costs of the Civil War
Civil War: Other Major Confederacy U.S. Wars
Source: Warfare and Armed Conflicts: A Statistical Reference to Casualty and Other Figures, 1500-2000: U.S. Department of Defense
Economic Costs
•	Union war costs totaled $2.3 billion. •Confederate war costs ran to $1 billion.
•	Union war costs increased the national debt from $65 million in 1860 to $2.7 billion in 1865.
•	Confederate debt ran over $1.8 billion in 1864.
•	Union inflation peaked at 182% in 1864. •Confederate inflation rose to 7,000%.
▲
Though many Union and Confederate soldiers were lucky to escape the war with their lives, thousands— like this young amputee—faced an uncertain future.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Data 1.	Based on the bar graph, how did the combined Union and Confederate losses compare with those of other wars?
2.	Why was inflation worse in the Confederacy than in the Union?
POLITICAL AND ECONOMIC CHANGES
The Civil War greatly increased the federal government's power and authority. During the war, the federal government passed laws, including income tax and conscription laws, that gave it much more control over individual citizens. And after the war, no state ever threatened secession again. Economically, the Civil War dramatically widened the gap between North and South. During the war, the economy of the Northern states boomed. The Southern economy, on the other hand, was devastated. The war not only marked the end of slavery as a labor system but also wrecked most of the region's industry and farmland. The economic gulf between the regions would not diminish until the 20th century.
A REVOLUTION IN WARFARE
Because of developments in technology, the Civil War has been called the last old-fashioned war, or the first modern war. The two deadliest technological improvements were the rifle and the minie ball, a soft lead bullet that was more destructive than earlier bullets. Two other weapons that became more lethal were hand grenades and land mines. Another technological improvement was the ironclad ship, which could splinter wooden ships by ramming them, withstand cannon fire, and resist burning. On March 9, 1862, every wooden warship in the world became obsolete after the North's ironclad Monitor exchanged fire with the South's ironclad Merrimack.
The War Changes Lives
The war not only revolutionized weaponry but also changed people's lives. Perhaps the biggest change came for African Americans.
THE THIRTEENTH AMENDMENT
The Emancipation Proclamation freed only those slaves who lived in states that were behind Confederate lines and not yet under Union control. The government had to decide what to do about the border states, where slavery still existed. The president believed that the only solu-tion was a constitutional amendment abolishing slavery 7 Background
Many tycoons of the late 19th century launched their careers during the war. War profiteering helped men like John D. Rockefeller become rich.
MAIN IDE*
j Analyzing
Effects
How did
technology aW the Civil War?
182 Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
MAIN IDEA
Developing
Historical
Perspective
H/
Do you think that the Union would take revenge on the Southern states after the war is over? After some political maneuvering, the Thirteenth Amendment was ratified at the end of 1865. The U.S. Constitution now stated, "Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude, except as a punishment for crime whereof the party shall have been duly convicted, shall exist within the United States."
LINCOLN IS ASSASSINATED
Whatever further plans Lincoln had to reunify the
nation after the war, he never got to imple-
ment them. On April 14, 1865, five days after
Lee surrendered to Grant at Appomattox,
Lincoln and his wife went to Ford's Theatre
in Washington to see a British comedy, Our
American Cousin. During its third act, a man
crept up behind Lincoln and shot the presi-
dent in the back of his head.
Lincoln, who never regained consciousness, died on April 15. It was the first time a president of the United States had been assassinated. After the shooting, the assassin, John Wilkes Booth—a 26-year-old actor and Southern sympathizer-then leaped down from the presidential box to the stage and escaped. Twelve days later, Union cavalry trapped him in a Virginia tobacco shed and shot him dead.
The funeral train that carried Lincoln's body from Washington to his hometown of Springfield, Illinois, took 14 days for its journey. Approximately 7 million Americans, or almost one-third of the entire Union population, turned out to mourn publicly their martyred leader.
The Civil War had ended. Slavery and secession were no more. Now the country faced two new problems: how to restore the Southern states to the Union and how to integrate approximately 4 million newly freed African Americans into national life.
Lincoln’s body lies in state in 1865.
ASSESSMENT
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Gettysburg •Gettysburg Address •Vicksburg
•William Tecumseh Sherman •Appomattox Court House
•Thirteenth Amendment •John Wilkes Booth
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Copy the multiple-effects chart below on your paper and fill it in with consequences of the Civil War.
Which consequence of the Civil War do you think has had the most impact on modern life?
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING ISSUES
Grant and Sherman used the strategy of total war. Do you think the end justifies the means? That is, did defeating the Confederacy justify harming civilians? Explain. Think About:
•	their reasons for targeting the civilian population
•	Sherman’s remark about Georgia quoted on page 181
•	Sherman’s march through Georgia
4.	SUMMARIZING
How did Lincoln abolish slavery in all states?
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
Why did the Union’s victory strengthen the power of the national government?
Review Unit 183

I
Reconstruction Its Effects
MAIN IDEA
" r
ml ■«ss*
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
in
After the Civil War, the nation embarked on a period known as Reconstruction, during which attempts were made to readmit the South to the Union.
The Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments, passed as part of Reconstruction, gave civil rights to Americans of all races.
•Freedmen’s
Bureau
• Reconstruction •Radical Republicans •Andrew Johnson •Fourteenth Amendment
•Fifteenth
Amendment
•scalawag •carpetbagger •Hiram Revels •sharecropping •Ku Klux Kian (KKK)

TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on problems facing the South after the Civil War and solutions that were offered for those problems.

Robert G. Fitzgerald was born a free African American in Delaware in 1840. During the Civil War, he served in both the U.S. Army and the U.S. Navy. In 1866, he taught former slaves in a small Virginia town. A year after his arrival in Virginia, Fitzgerald looked back on what he had accomplished.
A
Personal Voice Robert g. Fitzgerald “I came to Virginia one year ago on the 22nd of this month.
Erected a school, organized and named the Freedman’s Chapel School. Now (June 29th) have about 60 who have been for several months engaged in the study of arithmetic, writing, etc. etc.
This morning sent in my report accompanied with compositions from about 12 of my advanced writers instructed from the Alphabet up to their [present] condition, their progress has been surprisingly rapid. ”
—quoted in Proud Shoes
Fitzgerald was working for the Freedmen's Bureau, which had been established by Congress to provide food, clothing, hospitals, legal protection, and education for former slaves and poor whites in the South in 1865.
▲
Robert Fitzgerald
The Politics of Reconstruction
The need to help former slaves was just one of many issues the nation confronted after the war. In addition, the government, led by Andrew Johnson, Lincoln's vice-president and eventual successor, had to determine how to bring the Confederate states back into the Union. Reconstruction, the period during which the United States began to rebuild after the Civil War, lasted from 1865 to 1877. The term also refers to the process the federal government used to readmit
Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
Vocabulary amnesty: a
general pardon by a government, usually for political offenses
the defeated Confederate states to the Union. Complicating the process was the fact that Abraham Lincoln, Andrew Johnson, and the members of Congress all had different ideas about how Reconstruction should be handled.
LINCOLN'S PLAN
Lincoln made it clear that he favored a lenient Reconstruction policy. In December 1863, Lincoln announced his Proclamation of Amnesty and Reconstruction, also known as the Ten-Percent Plan. Under this plan, the government would pardon all Confederates—except high-ranking officials and those accused of crimes against prisoners of war—who would swear allegiance to the Union. As soon as ten percent of those who had voted in 1860 took this oath of allegiance, a Confederate state could form a new state government and send representatives and senators to Congress. Under Lincoln's terms, four states—Arkansas, Louisiana, Tennessee, and Virginia—moved toward readmission to the Union.
However, Lincoln's Reconstruction plan angered a minority of Republicans in Congress, known as Radical Republicans. The Radicals, led by Senator Charles Sumner of Massachusetts and Representative Thaddeus Stevens of Pennsylvania, wanted to destroy the political power of former slaveholders. Most of all, they wanted African Americans to be given full citizenship and the right to vote.
▲
Clearing battlefields of human remains was just one of many tasks facing
Reconstruction
governments.
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
$ How did the views of Presidents Lincoln and Johnson on Reconstruction differ from the views of the Radical Republicans?
JOHNSON'S PLAN FOR RECONSTRUCTION
Lincoln was assassinated before he could fully implement his Reconstruction plan. In May 1865, his successor, Andrew Johnson, announced his own plan. Johnson's plan differed little from Lincoln's. The major difference was that Johnson tried to break the planters' power by excluding high-ranking Confederates and wealthy Southern landowners from taking the oath needed for voting privileges. However, Johnson also pardoned more than 13,000 former Confederates because he believed that "white men alone must manage the South." Aj The seven remaining ex-Confederate states quickly agreed to Johnson's terms. In the following months, these states—except for Texas—set up new state governments and elected representatives to Congress. In December 1865, the newly elected Southern legislators arrived in Washington to take their seats. Congress, however, refused to admit the new Southern legislators. At the same time, moderate Republicans pushed for new laws to remedy weaknesses they saw in Johnson's plan. In 1866, Congress voted to enlarge the Freedmen's Bureau and passed the Civil Rights Act of 1866. That law gave African Americans citizenship and forbade states from passing discriminatory laws—black codes—that severely restricted African Americans' lives. Johnson shocked everyone when he vetoed both the Freedmen's Bureau Act and the Civil Rights Act. Congress, Johnson contended, had gone far beyond anything "contemplated by the authors of the Constitution."
CONGRESSIONAL RECONSTRUCTION
Angered by Johnson's actions, radical and moderate Republican factions decided to work together to shift the control of the Reconstruction process from the executive branch to the legislature. In mid-1866 they overrode the president's vetoes of the Civil Rights Act and Freedmen's Bureau Act. In addition, Congress drafted the Fourteenth Amendment, which prevented states from denying rights and privileges to any U S^ citizen, now defined as “all persons born or naturalized in the United States. This definition was expressly intended to overrule and nullify the Dred Scott decision. Review Unit 185
In the 1866 elections, moderate and radical Republicans gained control of Congress. They joined together to pass the Reconstruction Act of 1867, which did not recognize state governments—except Tennessee—formed under the Lincoln and Johnson plans.
The act divided the former Confederate states into five military districts. The states were required to grant African-American men the vote and to ratify the Fourteenth Amendment in order to reenter the Union. When Johnson vetoed the Reconstruction legislation, Congress promptly overrode the veto.
JOHNSON IMPEACHED
Because the Radicals thought Johnson was blocking Reconstruction, they looked for grounds on which to impeach him. They found grounds when Johnson removed Secretary of War Edwin Stanton from office in 1868. Johnson's removal of the cabinet member violated the Tenure of Office Act, which stated that a president could not remove cabinet officers during the term of the president who had appointed them without the Senate's approval. The House impeached Johnson, but he remained in office after the Senate voted not to convict. U. S„ GRANT ELECTED
In the 1868 presidential election, the Civil War hero Ulysses S. Grant won by a margin of only 306,000 votes out of almost 6 million ballots cast. More than 500,000 Southern African Americans had voted. Of this number, 9 out of 10 voted for Grant. The importance of the African-American vote to the Republican Party was obvious. After the election, the Radicals introduced the Fifteenth Amendment, which states that no one can be kept from voting
leaders, punishment.” because of "race, color, or previous condition of servitude." The ANDREW JOHNSON	Fifteenth Amendment, which was ratified by the states in 1870, was
an important victory for the Radicals.
I say, as to the
Reconstructing Society
Under the congressional Reconstruction program, state constitutional conventions met and Southern voters elected new, Republican-dominated governments. By 1870, all of the former Confederate states had completed the process. However, even after all the states were back in the Union, the Republicans did not end the process of Reconstruction because they wanted to make economic changes in the South.
CONDITIONS IN THE POSTWAR SOUTH
The war had devastated the South economically. Southern planters returned home to find that the value of their property had plummeted. Throughout the South, many small farms were ruined. The region's population was also devastated. Hundreds of thousands of Southern men had died in the war. The Republican governments began public works programs to repair the physical damage and to provide social services. POLITICS IN THE POSTWAR SOUTH
Another difficulty facing the new Republican governments was that the three groups that constituted the Republican Party in the South—scalawags, carpetbaggers, and African Americans—often had conflicting goals. Scalawags were white Southerners who joined the Republican Party Manv were small farmers who wanted to improve their economic position and did not want the former wealthy planters to regain power. Carpetbaggers were Northerners who moved to the South after the war. This negative name came from the misconception that they arrived with so few belongings that thev car ried everything in small traveling bags made of carpeting	Y
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
How did the election of 1866 affect the process of Reconstruction?
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
Why was the African-American vote so important to the
Republicans?
hapter 4 The Union in Peril
Analyzing
Political Cartoons )-
UNWELCOME GUEST
Of all the political cartoonists of the 19th century, Thomas Nast (1840-1902) had the greatest and most long-lasting influence. Nast created or popularized symbols that have become part of America’s visual heritage, symbols that include the Democratic donkey, the Republican elephant, Uncle Sam, and Santa Claus.
This cartoon from a Southern Democratic newspaper depicts Carl Schurz, a liberal Republican who advocated legal equality for African Americans. Schurz is shown as a carpetbagger trudging down a dusty Southern road as a crowd of people watch his arrival.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons 1.	Is Schurz shown in a positive or negative light? How can you tell?
2.	Why do you think the cartoonist chose to place the crowd of onlookers at such a great distance from Schurz?
a carpet bag
The third and largest group of Southern Republicans—African Americans—gained voting rights as a result of the Fifteenth Amendment. During Reconstruction, African-American men registered to vote for the first time; nine out of ten of them supported the Republican Party. Although many former slaves could neither read nor write and were politically inexperienced, they were eager to exercise their voting rights.
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
5/ Why did scalawags, carpetbaggers, and African Americans support the Republicans?
A
Personal Voice william beverly nash “We are not prepared for this suffrage. But we can learn. Give a man tools and let him commence to use them and in time he will earn a trade. So it is with voting. We may not understand it at the start, but in time we shall learn to do our duty.99
—quoted in The Trouble They Seen: Black People Tell the Story of Reconstruction
The differing goals of scalawags, carpetbaggers, and African Americans led to a lack of unity in the Republican Party. In particular, few scalawags shared the Republican commitment to civil rights for African Americans.
The new status of African Americans required fundamental changes in the attitudes of most Southern whites. However, many white Southerners refused to accept blacks' new status and resisted the idea of equal rights, Q
FORMER SLAVES IMPROVE THEIR LIVES
Before the Civil War, African Americans had been denied full membership in many churches. During Reconstruction African Americans founded their own churches, which often became the center of the African American community, and the only institutions that African Americans fully controlled. Many African American ministers emerged as influential community leaders who also played an important role in the broader political life of the country.
With 95% of former slaves illiterate, former slaves required education to become economically self-sufficient. In most of the Southern states, the first public school systems were established by the Reconstruction governments. The new African American churches, aided by missionaries from Northern churches and by $6 million from the Freedmen's Bureau, worked to create and run these and other
Review Unit 187
Til£ W7	SfiWOT /TO
HIRAM REVELS 1822-1901
schools. Atlanta, Fisk, and Howard Universities, for instance, were all founded by religious groups such as the American Missionary Association.
Thousands of African Americans also took advantage of their new freedom by migrating to reunite with family members or to find jobs in Southern towns and cities.
AFRICAN AMERICANS IN RECONSTRUCTION
After the war, African Americans took an active role in the political process. Not only did they vote, but for the first time they held office in local, state, and federal government. Nevertheless, even though there were almost as many black citizens as white citizens in the South, African-American officeholders remained in the minority. Out of 125 Southerners elected to the U.S. Congress during congressional Reconstruction, only 16 were African Americans. Among these was Hiram Revels, the first African-
MAIN IDEA
Hiram Revels of Mississippi, pictured above on the far left, was born of free parents in Fayetteville, North Carolina. Because he could not obtain an education in the South, he attended Knox College in Illinois. As an African Methodist Episcopal minister, he recruited African Americans to fight for the Union during the Civil War and also served as an army chaplain.
In 1865, Revels settled in Mississippi, where he helped organize African-American schools and churches. He served on the Natchez city council and then was elected to Mississippi’s state senate in 1869. In 1870, Revels became the first African American elected to the U.S. Senate.
land for cash and
American senator. African Americans also served in political offices on the state and local levels.
In January 1865, General Sherman had promised the former slaves who followed his army 40 acres per family and the use of army mules. For the most part, however, former slaves received no land. Most Republicans considered private property a basic American right, and thus refused to help redistribute it. As a result, many plantation owners in the South retained their land.
SHARECROPPING AND TENANT FARMING
Without their own land, freed African Americans, as well as poor white farmers, could not grow crops to sell or to use to feed their families. Therefore, economic necessity forced many former slaves and impoverished whites to become sharecroppers. In the system of sharecropping, landowners divided their land and assigned each head of household a few acres, along with seed and tools. Sharecroppers kept a small share of their crops and gave the rest to the landowners. In theory, "croppers" who saved a little might even rent keep all their harvest in a system known as tenant farming.
Forming
Generalizations
How did
Southern African Americans respond to their new status?
The Collapse of Reconstruction
Most white Southerners swallowed whatever resentment they felt over African American suffrage and participation in government. Some whites expressed thei feelings by refusing to register to vote. Others were frustrated by their loss of polit ical power and by the South's economic stagnation. These were the people wh< formed vigilante groups and used violence to intimidate African Americans.
OPPOSITION TO RECONSTRUCTION
The most notorious and widespread of th Southern vigilante groups was the Ku Klux Kian (KKK). The Kian's goals were t< destroy the Republican Party, to throw out the Reconstruction governments, to ai< the planter class, and to prevent African Americans from exercising their politica rights. To achieve these goals, the Kian and other groups killed perhaps 20,001 men, women, and children. In addition to violence, some white Southerner refused to hire or do business with African Americans who voted Republican. To curtail Kian violence and Democratic intimidation, Congress passed ■ series of Enforcement Acts in 1870 and 1871. One act provided for the federa
Vocabulary vigilante: one
who takes law enforcement into one’s own hands
.88 Chapter 4 The Union in Peril
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
How did Southern
Democrats regain political power?
Background
The Twelfth Amendment (1804) gives the House of Representatives the power to elect the president if no candidate has a majority of electoral votes.
supervision of elections in Southern states. Another act gave the president the power to use federal troops in areas where the Kian was active.
Although Congress seemed to shore up Republican power with the Enforcement Acts, it soon passed legislation that severely weakened the power of the Republican Party in the South. In May 1872, Congress passed the Amnesty Act, which returned the right to vote and the right to hold federal and state offices to about 150,000 former Confederates. In the same year Congress allowed the Freedmen's Bureau to expire. These actions allowed Southern Democrats to regain political power.
SUPPORT FOR RECONSTRUCTION FADES
Eventually, support for Reconstruction weakened. The breakdown of Republican unity made it even harder for the Radicals to continue to impose their Reconstruction plan on the South. In addition, a series of bank failures known as the panic of 1873 triggered a five-year depression, which diverted attention in the North away from the South's problems. The Supreme Court also began to undo some of the social and political changes that the Radicals had made. Although political violence continued in the South and African Americans were denied civil and political rights, Republicans slowly retreated from the policies of Reconstruction. DEMOCRATS “REDEEM” THE SOUTH
As the Republicans' hold on the South loosened, Southern Democrats began to regain control of the region. As a result of "redemption"—as the Democrats called their return to power—and a political deal made during the national election of 1876, congressional Reconstruction came to an end. In the election of 1876, Democratic candidate Samuel J. Tilden won the popular vote, but was one vote short of the electoral victory. Southern Democrats in Congress agreed to accept Hayes if federal troops were withdrawn from the South. After Republican leaders agreed to the demands, Hayes was elected, and Reconstruction ended in the South.
Reconstruction ended without much real progress in the battle against discrimination. However, the Thirteenth, Fourteenth, and Fifteenth Amendments remained part of the Constitution. In the 20th century, these amendments provided the necessary constitutional foundation for important civil rights legislation.
QJ\ ASSESSMENT
Andrew Johnson Fourteenth Amendment Fifteenth Amendment
•scalawag •carpetbagger •Hiram Revels
•sharecropping •Ku Klux Kian (KKK)
1.	TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Freedmen’s Bureau • Reconstruction •Radical Republicans
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Use a table like the one below to list five problems facing the South after the Civil War. Then describe the solution that was attempted for each problem.
Problem	Attempted Solution
1.	
2.	
3.	
4.	
5.	
CRITICAL THINKING
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
Do you think that Reconstruction had positive effects on Southern society? Why or why not?
Think About:
•	the formation of the Ku Klux Kian
. the establishment of African American churches and schools
•	why so many African Americans turned to sharecropping
4.	SUMMARIZING
How did the Radical Republicans hope to reconstruct the South?
ANALYZING PRIMARY SOURCES
This humorous ticket was printed around the time of the Hayes-Tilden presidential election. What does it tell you about popular attitudes toward the candidates?

OF THE TWO EVILS
Review Unit
ASSESSMENT
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its significance to the Civil War and Reconstruction.
1. Underground Railroad Harriet Beecher Stowe
3. Dred Scott Bull Run
Emancipation Proclamation
6. Clara Barton
Gettysburg
William Tecumseh Sherman
7.
8.
9. Fifteenth Amendment 10. Ku Klux Kian
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
The Divisive Politics of Slavery (pages 156-165)
1.	What was the Compromise of 1850?
2.	Who supported the Republican Party that was formed in 1854?
The Civil War Begins (pages 168-174)
3.	What were the military strategies of the North and the South at the onset of the Civil War?
4.	What role did African Americans and women play in the Civil War?
The North Takes Charge (pages 175-183)
5.	Which Northern tactic helped destroy morale in the South after the defeats at Gettysburg and Vicksburg?
6.	What effect did the war have on the economies of the North and the South?
Reconstruction and Its Effects (pages 184-189)
7.	Why did the Radicals want to impeach Andrew Johnson?
8.	In what ways did emancipated slaves exercise their freedom?
9.	How did Southern whites regain political power during Reconstruction?
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one shown, list the results and the significance of the national elections of 1856, 1860, 1866, 1868, and 1876. Election Year	Results	Significance
1856		
1860		
1866		
1868		
1876		
DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
How close did African Americans come to gaining full civil rights during Reconstruction? Explain your answer. INTERPRETING MAPS
Look at the maps on pages 170-171’ What was the most important river in the Union’s tactic of splitting the Confederacy in two? What city became essential to this goal after the fall of New Orleans? Use the information in the passage and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer questions 1 and 2.
“In these days men have learned the art of sinning expertly and genteelly, so as not to shock the eyes and senses of respectable society. Human property Is high in the market; and is, therefore, well fed, well cleaned, tended, and looked after, that it may come to sale sleek, and strong, and shining.99
—Harriet Beecher Stowe, Uncle Tom’s Cabin
1.	In the mid-19th century, Harriet Beecher Stowe was a leader in the struggle for —
A abolition.
B women’s rights.
C better working conditions.
D tax-supported public schools.
2.	Uncle Tom's Cabin was written in response to —
F the raid on Harpers Ferry.
G the Lincoln-Douglas debates.
H the Fugitive Slave Act.
J the Dred Scott decision.
Grant’s siege of Vicksburg was part of the Union’s strategy to —
A destroy Southern morale.
B C D
blockade Southern ports, split the Confederacy in two. capture the Confederate capital.
In the Reconstruction Act of 1867, Congress set requirements for readmission of former Confederate states into the Union. Which of the following problems did the act address?
F
Southern states did not allow African Americans to vote. G
Southern states had little money to pay for public works projects. H
Former slaves needed education. J
Confederate bonds and money were worthless. 71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
^WriteSmart COLLABORATIVE LEARNIN
Recall the issues that you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Suppose you are a British tourist traveling through the United States in 1860. Write a letter to your friends at home describing the political climate in America. Give your opinion about the possibility of saving the Union. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your letter.
Vgentuhy
In a small group read and discuss the “One American’s Story" at the beginning of Sections 3 and 4. Imagine that Mary Chesnut and Robert Fitzgerald met to discuss their beliefs. As a group, write a dialogue that might have taken place between the two. Take turns role-playing the pair to establish their personalities and clarify their ideas.
"VWriteSmart
Imagine that you are a U.S. citizen living during the Civil War, and the Emancipation Proclamation has just been issued. Decide whether you think the proclamation was effective. Write a newspaper editorial expressing your point of view. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your editorial.
Review Unit 191
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Comparing and Contrasting
DEFINING THE SKILL
Comparing involves looking at the similarities and differences between two or more people, places, or events. Contrasting means examining only the differences between them. Historians might compare and contrast events, personalities, beliefs, institutions, works of art, or many other types of things in order to give them a context for the period of history they are studying.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: LOOK FOR SIMILARITIES AND DIFFERENCES
To compare and contrast identify similarities and differences in the text. The following passage identifies similarities and differences between the Confederacy and the Union during the Civil War. The diagram that follows organizes this information. The Union and the Confederacy
Although originally part of the same country, the Union and Confederacy soon found many differences between them. ©Twenty-three states stayed in the Union, whereas the Confederacy was made up of 11 former states. ©This uneven distribution of states meant that the Union had a much larger population, (t also resulted in an uneven distribution of resources. ©The Union had many natural resources to help it fight the war, while the smaller Confederacy contained few factories and fewer sources of food production.
The Confederacy was led by Jefferson Davis, who entered the war with experience as both a soldier and former secretary of war. ©By contrast, the Union was led by President Abraham Lincoln, who had very little experience in the military and limited political experience. ©Both men suffered setbacks as they chose ineffective commanders. Lincoln, however, eventually found a successful leader in Ulysses S. Grant, while Davis found it difficult to delegate authority.
©Both the Union and the Confederacy attracted soldiers committed to their ideals. ©The Confederate army was made up of about 800,000 soldiers. ©But the populous Union had almost twice as many soldiers—about 1,556,000.©Both the Union and the Confederacy relied on volunteers at the onset of the war. © By 1862, the Confederacy began relying on conscription to fill the ranks. On the other hand, the Union did not begin conscription until 1863. ©Throughout the war, both the Union and Confederacy suffered enormous casualties. ©The Union lost almost SO percent more: it suffered 634,703 casualties compared to the Confederacy's 483,000.
O
Compare: Identify similarities in the reading. Look for clue words indicating that two things are alike. Clue words include also, both, all, like, as, likewise, and similarly. 0 Contrast: Identify differences in the reading. Look for clue words that show how two things differ. Clue words include different, differ, unlike, by contrast, however, but, and on the other hand.
O
Analyze the information. Look for features that the two things have in common. Identify relationships between similarities and differences in the text to draw conclusions. In the text above, one may conclude that there was a strong relationship between the size of the region, amount of resources, population, army size and number of casualties for each side. ’ 1 SKI
STRATEGY: MAKE A VENN DIAGRAM
Use the two ovals to contrast the Union and Confederacy and the overlapping area to show what the two regions have in common. Confederacy
z5ize:11 states; smaller population,
Union
goth
'Leadership: Jefferson Pavis, experienced in war, challenged in delegating /
Army; 300,000 soldiers;
conscription first in 1362,' 433,000 casualties
'Leadership:Leaders chose\ ineffective commanders Army: Kelied on volunteers at onset of war, then moved to conscription Casualties: Suffered ^enormous casualties
Size: 23 states; large population
Leadership: Abraham Lincoln,
limited experience in military or politics
Army: 1,553,000 soldiers; conscription in 1363, 634,703 casualties

APPLYING THE SKILL
Turn to Chapter 4, Section 1, page 163, and read the passage headed "Lincoln-Douglas Debates." Pay special attention to the descriptions of Lincoln's and Douglas's views on slavery. Make a Venn diagram that shows the ideas on which the two men differed and on which they agreed.
1.	Compare: Identify similarities.
On what ideas did Lincoln and Douglas agree?
2.	Contrast: Identify differences.
On what ideas did they differ?
3.	Analyze the information.
What do these similarities and differences tell you about what the important issues were during this election?
191 SK2
HISTORY
MULTIMEDIA CONNECTIONS
7 W sawcety recked the front door, wdon, ok toofdn^ the tired, T kuo zopko ofr the ww ok korseb&ck...
i/fW a korrUde tiykt!...
twtffrdty forwodod that tho	kad aobuolly
(W oti lad. What they Kroodd do with uo woo ol feoorfrd ytetifOK tO Wj/yOtMV] KUnd ..."
— Tnise Pierce, age 15

CLICK THROUGH
INTER ACTIVITIES
hmhsocialstudies.com
A
Citizen-Soldier Watch the video to meet John Burns, the man who would come to be called the "Citizen Hero of Gettysburg."
Ol A Family's Story
Watch the video to discover the story of courage and commitment exhibited by one Gettysburg family.
<r .*•. '

,	-4	-	•!
Jf J
The National Cemetery
Watch the video to learn about the Soldiers' National Cemetery and the speech President Lincoln gave there.
THE GETTYSBURG CIVILIANS 191 MC2
MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS OF U.S. HISTORY
Historians tend to consider past events within a series of historical eras that they have identified. Different historians may define these eras differently, but in general this approach helps them to place events within the larger context of the time in which they occurred. Doing so can enable historians to understand the ideas and beliefs of the past in the way the participants might have. For each era, historians can apply a broad set of characteristics to help understand the connections between time, events, places, and people. Throughout this textbook, you will find opportunities to apply the characteristics identified below to eras and events to make those connections and to help you grasp the larger patterns of history.
o W tin WOMEN HAVE NOW M Will.


Civil Rights and Government
The government of the United States is based on several founding principles, such as human equality, limited government, and democratic representation. The U.S. Constitution was intended to ensure that individual rights are protected from government interference. Notions such as separation of powers and checks and balances protect citizens by keeping any one branch from abusing its power. As the nation has developed, political and civil rights have been expanded to encompass more people and to ensure that all Americans can count on fair treatment and equal protection from the government.
■
Economic Development
As a result of fertile land and abundant natural resources, a free enterprise economic system, and government regulation protecting both private property and the public good, the United States has long been a land of economic success and opportunity. The promise of social mobility and economic opportunity through hard work has inspired Americans from all walks of life to struggle to improve their prospects just as it has drawn immigrants from around the world to the United States.
Involvement in Global Affairs
No matter its level of involvement in the affairs of other nations, the United States has been influenced by those nations and has influenced them in return. Early American foreign policy reflected the country's colonial roots, as the nation tried to remain isolated from the concerns and affairs of Europe. By the 1900s, however, the United States emerged as a world superpower, with allies and responsibilities around the world driving its greater involvement in global affairs. Major Characteristics of U.S. History


Movement
Americans have come from numerous places around the world to form a nation united by the common bond of standing for certain self-evident truths: equality and the right to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness. People from many nations, representing an extraordinary range of racial, ethnic, and religious groups, have come to the United States and become American citizens, shaping American society and culture in the process. People have also migrated within the country's borders, often in search of new opportunities and a better way of life.
B I
8 8
*
Discovery and Innovation
A spirit of discovery and a drive for innovation in science and technology has had a tremendous effect on the economy and culture of the United States. Throughout our nation's history, Americans have developed transformative new inventions and technologies that have vastly improved quality of life and standards of living not only here but across the globe. Such developments continue to shape American society in new and sometimes unexpected ways.
I



Cultural Expression
Cultural expression often reflects the characteristics and issues of the period in which it occurs. Our diverse nation has given rise to a diverse culture, which draws on the heritage and traditions of many different groups. The blending and remixing of cultural expression among racial, ethnic, and religious groups can be the source of tremendous creativity but can also lead to conflict.
MAJOR ERAS IN U.S. HISTORY, 1877 TO THE PRESENT
Westward Expansion
Industrialization and Urbanization
Progressive Era and American Expansionism
OVERVIEW
In the late 1800s, Americans moved west in increasing numbers. The government promoted the settlement of the West by offering free or cheap land to those willing to establish productive farms and by supporting railroad development. Settlers were also drawn west by economic opportunities, such as ranching and mining. Native Americans resisted, but westward expansion settlement continued, threatening their traditional way of life. MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS
MOVEMENT
As thousands of settlers streamed westward, Native Americans were displaced from their native territory.
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
The growth of railroads made travel west easier and faster.
DISCOVERY AND INNOVATION
New technologies helped settlers to confront the hardships of life and work on the Plains.
OVERVIEW
Innovations in business and industry occurred at a rapid pace in the late 1800s. Business leaders made huge sums of money, but ordinary workers continued to live and work in dangerous conditions. Immigrants moved to the nation's growing cities in search of new opportunities. The cities, often controlled by corrupt political machines, offered challenges as well as opportunity. MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
The growth of the oil and steel industries and the completion of the Transcontinental Railroad fueled the nation's economy.
DISCOVERY AND INNOVATION
New inventions, such as the skyscraper, the telephone, and electricity, changed how Americans lived and worked.
MOVEMENT
Many immigrants, encouraged by optimism about a better life in American, traveled to the United States.
>4 Major Eras in U.S. History
OVERVIEW
The Progressive movement arose to redress the negative impact of industrialization, Progressives achieved many wide-reaching reforms that affected American political, social, and economic life. At the same time, global competition for empire led the nation into war against Spain and into military conflicts in Mexico. The United States emerged as a new world power. MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS
CIVIL RIGHTS AND GOVERNMENT
Movements for social and political change prompted by industrialization and urbanization led to expansion of suffrage to women and other Progressive reforms that gave Americans more of a voice in government.
INVOLVEMENT IN GLOBAL AFFAIRS
The United States grew more involved in foreign affairs, claiming new territories after the Spanish-American War.
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Claiming Alaska, Hawaii, and new territories in the Pacific made the United States a growing economic power.
1914-1919
1920-1929
1929-1941
World War I
The Roaring Twenties
The Great Depression
OVERVIEW
When rivalries among European nations led to the outbreak of war in 1914, the United States remained neutral. Hostile German acts soon convinced President Wilson and Congress that war was inevitable. After the United States joined the Allies in 1917, the U.S. government quickly mobilized the economy and built public support for the war effort. However, some efforts to minimize dissent infringed on individual rights. major characteristics
involvement in global affairs
Despite Americans' best efforts to stay neutral in the face of war in Europe, Germany's hostile actions brought an end to any hope for peace.
CIVIL rights and government The Espionage Act and the Sedition Act limited antiwar speech, which some saw as a violation of their First Amendment rights.
OVERVIEW
The years following World War I brought unease over the apparent spread of radical influences in the United States. The American people sought leaders who promised a return to peaceful times. They also eagerly contributed to a booming, consumer-driven economy. The 1920s were also a time of widespread cultural change, as women took on new roles, urbanization increased, and music, art, and literature reflected characteristics and issues of the period. MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Government policies, increased production efficiencies, and the increasing availability of consumer goods fueled a period of prosperity.
CULTURAL EXPRESSION
The artists, musicians, and writers of the Lost Generation and the Harlem Renaissance created works that reflected postwar feelings and expectations.
OVERVIEW
Following an era of apparent prosperity, the Great Depression began in 1929. Soon, millions of Americans were suffering and the political landscape of the United States stood on the brink of great change. Following his election in 1932, President Roosevelt pushed forward a series of programs called the New Deal. Intended to solve the nation's economic troubles, the New Deal had mixed results. MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
The prosperity of the 1920s came to an abrupt end as the stock market crashed and unemployment skyrocketed.
CIVIL RIGHTS AND GOVERNMENT
The New Deal met with some success as well as some criticism, but it unquestionably changed the relationship between the people and their government.
MOVEMENT
Millions of residents left the Great Plains in search of economic opportunity in the wake of the Dust Bowl.
Review Unit 195
MAJOR ERAS IN U.S. HISTORY, 1877 TO THE PRESENT
1939-1945
1945-1959
1954-1975
1954-1975
World War II
Postwar America
Civil Rights and Social Change
The Vietnam War
(W
It H
*
1968-1992
A
Conservative Resurgence 1992-Present
Entering the 21st Century

OVERVIEW
Unsettled conditions after World War I led to the rise of ruthless dictators. Their aggression led Europe into another great war in 1939. The United States was eventually drawn into World War II after being attacked by Japan. Americans at home worked hard to support the war and millions went off to fight overseas. Hard fighting by the Allies brought victory first in Europe and then in the Pacific. MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS
INVOLVEMENT IN GLOBAL AFFAIRS
Following a period of isolationism, the United States joined the other Allied nations to defeat the Axis Powers.
CIVIL RIGHTS AND GOVERNMENT
The United States fought against regimes that opposed democracy, and minorities began to expect increased civil rights in return for their wartime contributions.
MOVEMENT
World War II triggered one of the greatest internal migrations in American history as millions moved in search of wartime employment.
Major Eras in U.S. History
OVERVIEW
After World War II, the United States took its place as a world leader and an adversary of the Soviet Union in the Cold War. The conflict and tensions during this time period worried many Americans. However, they also experienced a period of economic prosperity, as consumers were once again able to purchase goods and services to fulfill wants and needs that had accumulated during the war. MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
In the wake of a conversion back to a peacetime economy, median family income, home ownership, and savings all increased steadily during the 1950s.
INVOLVEMENT IN GLOBAL AFFAIRS
Tensions between the United States and its former ally, the Soviet Union, led to a prolonged Cold War.
DISCOVERY AND INNOVATION
This period witnessed the development of new consumer goods as well as new military technologies.
OVERVIEW
During this period, many groups fought for expanded civil and political rights. The African-American civil rights movement won key victories in gaining racial equality. Inspired by their gains, women, Mexican Americans, and Native Americans also pushed for greater equality. Presidents Kennedy and Johnson supported these efforts, passing key civil rights and voting rights legislation in the 1960s. President Johnson also implemented his Great Society plan in an effort to reduce poverty. MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS
CIVIL RIGHTS AND GOVERNMENT
Citizens called for social and political reforms, racial equality for African Americans and other minorities and gender equality for women.
CULTURAL EXPRESSION
During this period, a counterculture developed to challenge the tradi-tional American ideals and lifestyle-
OVERVIEW
Concern about the spread of communism during the Cold War led the United States to become increasingly involved in Vietnam. President Johnson sent the first U.S. fighting troops to the region in 1965, and the war escalated as U.S. troop strength increased in the years that followed. As the war dragged on, however, more and more Americans began to question U.S. involvement, reflecting deep divisions within American society. President Nixon eventually ended U.S. involvement in Vietnam, but the war had lasting effects. major characteristics
INVOLVEMENT IN GLOBAL AFFAIRS
The desire to contain communism and prevent it from spreading caused the United States to become involved in the Vietnam War.
CIVIL RIGHTS AND GOVERNMENT
Television images of the war caused many Americans to ques-tion U.S. involvement, and those °Pposed formed a protest move-ment to express their views to the §overnment. OVERVIEW
Frustration with the counterculture and the social change of the 1960s led to a conservative backlash in the 1970s and 1980s. Despite President Nixon's notable successes in foreign relations, the Watergate scandal ultimately led to his resignation. Still, four of the five presidents who followed him also supported conservative policies and values. Many Americans embraced the message of smaller government that Presidents Reagan and Bush advocated during the 1980s. MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS
CIVIL RIGHTS AND GOVERNMENT
The Watergate scandal caused some people to question their faith in government, and later administrations worked to reduce the size of government.
INVOLVEMENT IN GLOBAL AFFAIRS
President Nixon improved relations with China and the Soviet Union, President Carter worked toward Middle East peace, and President Reagan oversaw the end of the Cold War.
OVERVIEW
In the wake of the Cold War, Americans faced the 21st century with hope, determination, and a readiness to confront challenges at home and abroad. The economy has experienced periods of growth and recession. The period brought new enemies, as the United States became the target of international terrorists on September 11, 2001. While confronting these and other challenges, society has changed as a result of a more diverse population and new advances in technology. MAJOR CHARACTERISTICS
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Economic gains disappeared as the global economy began to slow down around the turn of the 21st century.
INVOLVEMENT IN GLOBAL AFFAIRS
The United States worked with other nations to confront the threat of global terrorism.
DISCOVERY AND INNOVATION
Innovations such as the Internet have affected nearly all areas of American life.
Review Unit 197
I
ll!
UNIT
